We visited last night for the last time. Service was horrible. It's like the bartender did not want to be there. He refilled his own drink while my husbands glass was completely empty. He did not write our order down and had to come back to make sure he had remembered it correctly. Then when the food came, we did not have napkins or silverware. He did not offer to refill my drink when it was empty,..I had to ask. And we were sitting at the bar...right in front of the drink station. The sweet potato tater tots should be a dessert or let guests know that they are not a savory and salty side for you burger. Ugh, this was a waste of $40.
Just visited Clear Blue Car Wash & Detailing. They only wash the car & wheels. Detailing is done by you. Under new management too. They're not going to make any money like that. Lost my business.
Would not recomment this restaurant to anyone visiting. Service was horrible and my children‘s meals were horrible. Fish tasted like poop. The steak was horrible and I would not trust them to make me french fries without screwing that up.
Lost two customers after terrible service. Stopped by with a friend to show her the burritos I had been talking about. After waiting 45 minutes we were brought the wrong food and our server apologized for messing up the order. He brought out 3 samples of soup in tiny sauce containers to somehow make up for the error. There was no apology and they stilled tried to charge us full price after making us wait.
My wife had a test for inactive Thyroid which came back positive for inactivity , She had the test done 5 weeks earlier , she had to called Holly the OM to find out the results . It was sitting on Misty , DR. Roach medical assistant desk. She mailed results to us , The results we sitting on the desk for 4 weeks . My wife had to call the office to get the results sent to us !
This place is awful - they will rip you off in a heartbeat. Took a flat tire in to get fixed and was told that it's "company policy" to replace it. Didn't even take a look to evaluate if it could be fixed, just wanted to sell me a new tire, the cheapest being $150. Took it to another place to have it looked at and turns out IT DIDN'T EVEN NEED TO BE FIXED. The cold had caused it to go flat - just needed some air and I was good to go.
The management and customer service at this store is absolutely dismal. Never before have I been treated with such little respect from a store manager. I have insurance for my iPhone that was sold to me by verizon and the replacement phone that I was sent (for $199) apparently had parts missing on the inside that prevented the apple store from being able to replace its battery, which it needed (the tab needed to pull out/replace the battery wasn't there). When I came in and relayed the information that I had gotten from the apple store (where I had initially gone when my phone would no longer hold a charge), the staff was rude and dismissive, making a spectacle of me in the store, calling over other staff, and repeatedly telling me that they were not responsible. This was even before I had asked for it to be fixed or replaced. They were absolutely so preoccupied with deflecting blame onto me that I couldn't even finish telling them what was on the report I had brought from the apple store nor did they offer to provide me any contact information, etc to the insurance company. Instead, I was lectured. It was as if I was an idiot for asking them for help. They finally agreed to do me a "favor" and give me an "upgrade" which would replace my phone (with a 2-year extension of my contract, mind you) for $.99 plus a $29 upgrade fee. However, they did not have my phone in stock, and the only equivalent memory-wise was the 5s (I had a 4s), which would cost $299 plus the upgrade fee. Wanting to get everything over and done with, I agreed to their "favor." As I was rung up, the staff member asked me if I wanted a case, and I said know. The manager, Christian, overhearing this, interrogated me as to why I didn't want a case, rolling his eyes and asking, "where?" when I said I could buy them cheaper elsewhere. When the same issue came up about insurance, he acted as if I was a complete idiot for not wanting insurance on the phone. I said again, no thanks, but I was given a "You a really telling me you don't want insurance on this phone??" I said no, that I didn't want to pay for an insurance policy that sends defective phones that cannot be repaired. He then BERATED me for my attitude and my decision not to have insurance, despite the fact that I had already experienced a half hour of his staff being rude, dismissive, and condescending, while paying out of pocket over three hundred dollars to replace a phone that never had all of its parts anyways. I then was yelled at again when I asked for his district manager's contact information. Frustrated to the point of tears, I left the store with my new phone. If there are any issues with this one, I will be taking my business elsewhere. My advice? I would never step foot into this store if you can help it, especially not if Christian is the manager on duty. I have never experienced worse customer service in my life.
I went to this place because of all the positive reviews. Im not really sure how this place has good reviews. The shop is like a dusty, dirty tourist trap. This was my first tattoo and I was already very nervous. By the end of the session when I look at my arm I felt sick I mean even from a distance you can see that my lines are extremely jagged in almost every place. also this dude obviously has no skill in relation to shading. idk how to even explain how simple shading could be so uneven and messy. ugh. im super dissatisfied especially for the price which was 150 which is near the same as black cat tattoo ( a shop a friend recommended i go to after the fact :[ ) would charge. now i just have to spend another 100 to get it this shit fixed. I cant remember the artists name but he seemed not totally confident in his work. and he was super impressed with what he did to my arm which makes me curious what his other tattoos look like.
My experience was good with this pub, up until I went to the bathroom. I walked out of the bathroom and found my table cleared, my bear/food gone, and no bar tender to be found. I ordered, paid for a beer, then this sad excuse of a pub cleared my table, tossed my beer before I could even drink it, and expected me to leave the pub because they wanted to close since there were no other customers at 9:00 PM. What a sad excuse of a pub.
Very deceptive. Don't lie to your prospective clients to get a sale.
Oh my God how is this company in business???? I can honestly say in all 38 years of my life this is one of the worst company I have ever dwelt with. If you order something on-line and you see the shipping carrier is YRC cancel your order immediately. Everyday I get a 9am-1pm time frame for delivery and every time they call at 1:30 or 3:15pm and now 4pm and tell me they are running late and will have to reschedule. Yesterday the excuse was they forgot to load it on the truck. Three separate times and NO package. I am beside myself. This type of company actually really makes you appreciate UPS, USPS & Fed-X
I should have read the reviews posted on several websites before traveling 2 hours to visit Nitsas with my daughter. It was a complete waste of time. My daughter was shopping for a wedding dress. We tried to make an appointment the week before, however, we could not get anyone on the phone. So we decided to check it out anyway. They did not have one customer in the store and we were told that she could not try on any wedding dresses. Their was one employee at the register and three ladies in the back eating and talking. I explained that we tried to make an appointment and we had traveled quite a distance but she did not care. I own a large retail business and I would say this is the worst customer service I have personally encountered. The day ended well after visiting Hayden Olivia, where my daughter found her dress. I would not recommend this place to anyone.
Encargue pastel y nunca me informaron si estaba listo o no y resulto que jamas me lo hicieron echaron a perder mi fiesta estos idiotas infelices si no disponen de tiempo o no son capaces de hacerlo por lo menos avisen por que asi con sus cosas tal vez haya algun otro que si disponga de tiempo y deseos de trabajar en quienes nesecitamos de un pastel cuando estos no pueden no no se les da su gana antes avisaban que ya esta listo el pastel que encargan pero que extraño que ami ni me avisaron y mucho menos me dijeron que no lo podian hacer y para cuando fui los muy ya habian cerrado y solo alcanze a ver a 2tipos bien borrachotes adentro que ovbio jamas salieron a por lo menos dignarse a decir que no lo hicieron y para colmo no solo fui yo tambien fue otra persona que se encontro con la misma situacion lo unico bueno es que hacen buenos pasteles pero su calidad de trabajo es nefasta
DO NOT store your stuff here! Several reasons: 1. The gate stays open for what seems like about 5 minutes after entering or exiting, letting anyone come through. 2. The ONLY security camera is at the front gate. Anyone that gets on the lot can do anything they want to your vehicle stored there or any of the units and there is NO security. This means your loss. The back lot where vehicles contains all kinds of vehicles that have been trashed - looks like a junk yard. 3. I had a vehicle stored here that got broken into and on another date had about $35 in gas syphoned out of the tank. What did they say up front? "Oh, sorry, but there's nothing we can do." 4. The late fees are assessed on the 7th and for the space I rent, the late fee is more than the month's rent. 5. Plus, they have the signs all over for the $1 for the first month's rent special, BUT that is 'subject to availability' - which means that it's a crap shoot on whether or not you get the deal or pay full price. Overall, this place is the WORST in my opinion and I am getting my stuff out before this month ends.
Lots of stuff, poor prices and horrible customer service.
the right address is Fulya Mah. Senol Sok. #4 Gayrettepe, Ist.
It is the most horriblest grocery store ever. my mother has been calling the pharmacy since 10 I am horribly sick with a cold it is now 7:30 and noone has still PICKED UP THE PHONE never deal with heb killeen. The harker heights heb would have had my medicine already. -.-
One of the worst hotel. Location is crap, very far from what it shows on google. Out of mount abu. No shampoo, soap etc provided. Just a guest house standard
None
Worst experience Ever. 4 and 1/2 inch pregnant roach came into my room through the huge crack in the door. When I called the front desk to ask for bug spray, the lady was rude and didn't even apologize. Finally managed to kill it. So gross. I just wanted a cheap room and I can handle most anything but not huge roaches. Took a shower and checked out...was there maybe 4 hours. They wouldn't refund my money. And when I called to speak to the manager, he was even rude. DO NOT STAY HERE! unless you don't mind roaches.
Wow, worst Chili's ever, waiter was mediocre, drinks were horrible, paid extra for rice that wasn't even cooked
He was a good doctor but his receptionist lacks in responsibilities (ignorance isn't an excuse) Dr.Harter is a pill pusher to many people that sells their meds on the streets. After looking into this allegations Dr. Harter has made some of bad moves that isnt fair to his minority patients. urine samples are never sealed,so any urine sample can become contaminated along the way to the lab. Patients are asked to leave sample in rest room with no labels no way to know whose urine is in which cup. This doctor wouldn't make it with any medical group with these practices. i was discharged from this doctor cause I know hes a dirty doctor and its just a matter of time before someone else challenges him in a court of law. True story Dr. Harter gave 2 gentleman prostate exams in exchange for Norco 7.5 one patient didnt have any medical records to support any claims of being in pain or to receive any pain meds. Fell sorry for the guys that was violated but they was also busted for pain meds Dr. Harter provided to them
I am a professional from out of state working here in Columbia and decided to go out for a drink with a few co workers after work. I was rather enjoying myself listening to the mediocre band and sipping my overpriced poorly mixed drink when I decided to go outside to get some air with a co worker. My co worker finished his cigarette and we were headed back into the bar when a Nottingham's bouncer with a Napoleon Complex and too much to prove decided to not let me back into the bar. I begged and pleaded for an explanation as i hadn't been there long enough to tie one on when all of a sudden I was strangled and restrained to point where I could not breath then thrown to the ground. Needless to say this was assault and will be addressed by the authorities. Moral of the review, if you want to get assaulted by a 5'4 bouncer with "little man syndrome", this is place for you.
Look @ other reviews, I'm not alone....it's a shame, he is the only jet ski business around Columbus Mike has all the answers, if you live in 1985. He is not current on his knowledge of high performance PWC's. He will site examples of tips, and parts he recommends, I'll take that to my Jet Ski forums w/ professional Jet ski builders, and riders: They laugh!. ie. a new $275 impeller, can be improved by 'setting it back', closer to the stator vane. He said to 'add a hook' at the trailing edge,...and the kid, is mentally somewhere else
I was there Wednesday night and saw five cockroaches in the time it took me to do my laundry. Not to mention the large crack that runs through the center of the facility that looks fairly dangerous. Definitely nowhere I will ever go again.
NOTE TO SELF: Do NOT eat here again. Service is terrible.
None
Target apparently doesn't want American workers to have jobs. Everything in Target is made in China or anywhere else in the world except the USA. And in the last year I've bought clothes, , tools, appliances, you name it, at Target and many of the items (made in China) break or come apart and have to be replaced.
TERRIBLE SERVICE, overpriced food, don't waste your time or money! We waited twice as long as they said, staff was rude and didn't care about doing their jobs. We had to ask for a server twice before anybody showed up to our table. Not worth it, there are so many better places to go downtown.
I don't feel I can trust them! Beat and switch! Almost 7 hours to install a set of tires with a Scheduled appointment !! Read my version of the story. Brought my 2 year old car in for a Oil change. "Sir you have a delaminated tire on your car would you like to see it!" Of course I wanted to see it and of course I wanted new tires installed. Showed me some tires, picked out a set of Michelin tires. He tells me it going to take a few hours to install. I was in a hurry and scheduled an appointment for 9 A.M next morning. I made my scheduled appointment (Early) sat around for 2 hours and I asked how much longer. "Should be about a hour or so, we had several people in front of you". But I pre-paid for my tires and had an Appointment for 9 A.M?. I was in the process of Moving and had a ton of things to do so walked Home, 4 hours later they call, "Mr. Alati I sorry to inform you but we were not able to get your tire delivered here today (this was a Saturday), can't get them until Monday, but I have an upgraded tire I can install at no extra charge, Smooth ride, 80,000 mile tire but it's a Big O Brand instead of Michelin tires" - Ya Ok fine, I needed my car. Two weeks latter I go back, tell them the car is pulling to the left and seams to run a little warmer than normal. There was 25 PSI in the Left front and down a quart of oil. I mentioned about how the ride wasn't as smooth as I was expecting "Oh, you should have gotten the Big-O xxx tire, they sold me good tires and installed a cheaper line!!
None
Very bad attitude
Dear Friends, New Shores( NIME) is a fake institute who takes admission stating they are running a college, instead it is just a learning center – blacklisted learning center who is running a MBA course by Punjab Technical University. NIME claims to give 3 types of MBA course – Executive MBA, Global MBA and diploma in MBA. All this is fake – if you call PTU directly, you will get to know these are names given by New Shores( NIME) and not by PTU. Any student gets admitted in New Shores( NIME) to pursue MBA will be divided into 3 groups designed by New Shores( NIME) . As per the groups the fees is charged to the student. Example: 3, 80000/- is the fees for Global MBA – they promise a laptop and industrial trip and what not – All is crap – after the fee payment – they say college is going through ruff phase and have no funds to give out the said facility – this is real and happened with my fellow mates at New Shores( NIME) . Actual fee designed by PTU is Rs. 11200/- only and the course is MBA( does not have different fees or different categories) adding to that, these guys do not have complete faculty to start the course on time and at the end they either skip the topics or say that it can be left as we will have options in Question paper. Another instance where admission for MBA is done( Rs. 20, 000), and its been 2years where a student has still not received the date for class commencement. When called, either the contact person is changed, or New Shores( NIME) is busy with fake collaborations or they blame on PTU for not starting the course on time – if these does not work – student is blamed for not contacting New Shores( NIME) regarding admissions. All MBA aspirants out there, be aware of this institution. Never Join. Never recommend. Never Choose – New Shores( NIME) Spread the word and save your friends. All the best.
By all standards, Marcus Lemonis is a mensch - because I would have punched this guy Hank right on the air for all to see. Hank's mother should be ashamed of herself - if she had any respect for her late husband she would immediately fire her jerk of a son. I would go as far as to say I wouldn't even hire Hank as a janitor. I am embarrassed for the employees to have to work for this idiot.
I had a horrible experience the waitress there are rude and mean and pretty stuck up. Only a one good waitress try to help us out after she saw that our actually waitress was just ignoring us the entire time. We end up leaving because we had already waited for more than an hour for our food and the stupid manager blamed on the kitchen. But it was the waitress cause I saw my food being there ready for more than 15 minutes sucks for them cause I normally tip at least 8 dollars cause I have a kid of 2 years and I know they not easy but for ones my daughter behave and the place was in his worse. NEVER would I eat here again
Terrible staff and very rude security. I would never go hear and would go at your own risk. The site looks nice on the inside. We went there late into one evening and found the place completely empty. Bouncers were rude to us and they wouldn't serve us food at the end of the night. I've never had such a bad experience at a restaurant/bar in my life. Go at your own risk.
If I could rate it with a 0, I would. The actual amenities and apartments are decent, but the management is absolutely horrible. When I moved into my apartment, there was hair in the shower, old charcoal and cleaning supplies from the previous owner in the laundry room, one or two things in the fridge, and crumbs all over - never been cleaned. I got my key, then had to process into Fort Lee. By the time I returned and got to my apartment to move in, they were gone for the day, so I couldn't do anything about the issue. I cleaned it myself because it was so filthy and reported it the next day. They said there was nothing they could do because I had no way to prove it and I shouldn't have cleaned it up myself. Why would I make something like that up and report it to them!? I wasn't even asking them for anything, I said, "I just want to bring to your attention that my apartment was like this and you may want to keep an eye out that nobody else moves into a place like that." They had a nasty attitude to respond and got very defensive saying I couldn't prove it. Whatever. I have finally moved out and refuse to move into another Independence Place due to my experience at the Fort Lee one. I don't even want to visit someone that lives at one. I hate IP. They have owed me a few hundred dollars for overpaying my rent before moving out at the end of May 2013. It is now November 2013 and they still have not sent me the check, despite me calling at least once a week. Each time I call, they listen to my story as if they hadn't heard it before and say, "Oh, I think I remember you... I'm so sorry, what's a good address to mail it to you and a phone number to reach you at?" They have never contacted me and I still do not have the check. I am taking them to court if I do not get the check soon. They stole my money.
Why don't they tell per lb cost? Their chicken @ ~$22 / lb are really great! You will do break even with "Whole Foods Market" cost after 70-80% discount. Direct to home delivery and saving distribution cost is "myth" with Passanante. Sales guy was very pushy. Complete waste of 2+ hours with him. Another 10 minutes here in writing this review. Hope it helps you.
None
I made the reservation online. I used a credit card that had my married name on it. Upon check in, when the clerk looked at my drivers' license that had my maiden name, she didn't want to accept it, even though my first name was on both cards, and I showed her other cards with my maiden name on them. She kept saying it was for my "protection". Bull caca! My husband finally talked her into letting us check in. I had told her I am a member of the Marriott Rewards Club, but it didn't matter. No one in a hotel has ever been this rude. For pusishment, she put us in a room that looked like it had not been repaired since Hurricane Katrina! Horrible smells of mold and obvious water damage. We waited until the next day when that clerk was not on duty, and asked to be switched. After the inconvenience of having to repack and wait for the new room to be cleaned, as well as the ugly treatment from the front desk, I doubt if I will be staying at a Marriott again.
Was refused service at 4am even though they are 24 hours. Employees sitting in the restaurant refusing to serve us
Do NOT rent a boat from this marina. We just came back from a week long experience where we were given a boat that, to my mind, was unsafe. The Carbon Monoxide detectors went off every time we turned on the generator (which we were told should be left on at least 16 hours a day....how convenient....uses a gallon of gas an hour). Every carbon monoxide detector went off in the boat. We had someone come out (who we had to call on our phones because the ship to shore radio didn't work) and they told us it was just weak batteries. Then another person came out and told us to ask for an upgrade. When I turned the boat in I spoke to the manager and she said "mam, these detectors are very sensitive, you were never in any danger." Really? SO I should have just gone to bed with three carbon monoxide detectors going off? This is a tragic accident waiting to happen.
This company is just another one of America's terrible Internet Service Providers. Terrible fees everywhere, horrible customer service, and absurd data limits for anyone who does more than email.
Avoid it. There are better and CLEANER places to spend your money. Leaking windows have bred mould on the carpet.
Had a vehicle inspected there and it failed for a license plate bulb and the horn not working. We corrected the issues ourselves and they charged us $15 for fixing the issue ourselves and not paying them to do it.
Drove 70 miles for a pound of decent coffee and asked the gal to grind it for a "Pour Over" filter design. She ground it way too course. It's probably for a French Press but definitely not a Pour Over. Suggest additional training for the staff.
RIP OFF, @^%$#* NEVER BUY FROM THESE PEOPLE!!!! YOU WILL GET JACKED, I REPEAT!!! YOU WILL GET JACKED!!!!
I am writing about an absolutely terrible sales experience my wife and I experienced at Pinehurst Kia on 26 NOV 2013. I will never do business with this dealership again and will ensure that my friends go somewhere else to get a car. Additionally I fully plan on writing online reviews detailing the time wasting, high pressure, near hostage taking tactics used by this dealer. On 22 NOV 2013, my wife and I were intent on getting a more fuel efficient Kia so my wife went to Pinehurst Kia and was offered a 2013 Kia Optima to test drive while they assessed the value of our 2012 Kia Sorento SX. The sales team was unable to give us a value assessment on our vehicle until Monday and due to unforeseen circumstances we were unable to return the car until Tuesday. Upon arriving Tuesday my wife spoke with Galo BiondiFernandez and was told that he would be with her shortly and he would go over the numbers for the Sorento and Optima with her. He then proceeded to disappear for 40 minutes. During this 40 minute period with no explanation my wife repeatedly asked employees for her keys and they refused to acknowledge my wife's request. She also requested to speak with a manager and was also denied. Following nearly an hour of asking for her keys Mr. Galo BiondiFernandez returned with the paperwork and made an offer for our car. Unsatisfied with the offer my wife said no thank you and again asked for her keys. He refused to acknowledge her request for the keys and continued to try and make a sale. I called my wife wondering how it was going and was told that they would not return her keys, following this Mr. Galo BiondiFernandez asked to speak with me. Even after I calmly and clearly repeatedly requested that he give my wife her keys back he again ignored the request and continued to attempt to make a sale. We made it abundantly clear multiple times that due to the time we waited and the low offer that we were not interested in conducting any further business and he finally relented and went to the office to get the keys. The office that he went to had clear glass windows and my wife observed him in the office continuing to not get her keys. After a few minutes my wife then had to get up go to the office and ask for her keys herself. After my wife left I was then called by Mr. Galo BiondiFernandez telling me that he is the best salesmen that Pinehurst Kia has and that no review or complaint I had would make a difference to him. He additionally insinuated that my wife had lied about asking for her keys and attempted to shift blame for the poor experience onto us. It is unbelievable that Pinehurst Kia employs sales people that have so little regard for their customers and believe that they can treat them in this manner. I am a active duty US Veteran and a repeat customer of KIA but this horrible service makes me hesitate to return to this dealer for anything let alone purchasing a car knowing the kind of people employed on the sales team.
This company took pictures from our website and posted them on their company website representing our actors as their own without our permission. We have asked them to take our pictures down but have never heard back from anyone.
Very Bad Service. Had gone to today to apply for a Duplicate SIm and they asked me to go to other Customer Care as their ID is blocked. N it takes 5 to 6 days for solving their issue. I guess the Customer Care itself requires a Support from Airtel. Very Bad Service and Employees dont even bother to us to solve the problem. Don't go to this Customer Care
Worst dining experience ever! Saturday Night at 7pm. Waited 30 min.. to seat a group of 15 in a half empty restaurant. 1 hour just to get our salads,[], had to order drinks 3 times to get them. My meal was the New York Strip for 17.99. The steak was obviously from the freezer. Also, an hour after ordering we were told they were out of meatballs, potato soup and only had 1 Ribeye. One of the kids with us had his pizza completely forgotten. When we complained to the manager he really didn't care. Avoid this place. 2.5 hours of my life wasted for bad service and really bad food!
Never on given time
Even with appointment staff was rude and not helpful. They need to take a lesson in the customer is always right. Doubt they will be in business very long.
I bought $7000 worth of furnishings and there was nothing that went right with the order. Quantities were not right. Shipping items as they arrived in their warehouse was not followed up on. I had to call periodically to see if items were ready to ship. I am still waiting on 2 bar stools which were bought almost 6 months ago. 3 were bought, one was ordered from the manufacturer. There were items such as ordering 2 pairs of pillows but getting one pair. The quantities for the pillows were correct on my order form but was not ordered that way from the manufacturer. If you purchase anything there I would suggest that you take delivery immediately. THERE ARE NO CHECKS AND BALANCES BETWEEN THE PURCHASE INVOICE AND THE ITEMS THEY THINK THEY OWE YOU. Do not put yourself in a position of waiting for them to order it and deliver it.
Delivery: Watch out: Buyer beware: Order Shrimp with Veg and Chicken with Broc. and Wonton Soup. Got 2 chicken dishes. When called about order, they did Nothing. Very Poor Customer Service.
2:06 P.M. ANOTHER UPDATE: OKAY, I CALLED AT 7:30 A.M. AND IT IS 2:06 AND THE MANAGER--NICOLE HAS NOT CALLED ME BACK. SO, AN UPSET CUSTOMER AND NOT ONE WORD FROM MANAGEMENT. IT HAS BEEN HOURS. THIS IS UNPROFESSIONAL. I HAVE BEEN VERY POLITE AND NOT ONE RESPONSE PHONE CALL. I CALLED AVEDA CORPORATE AND THEY SAID THIS IS A PRIVATELY OWNED SALON AND THEREFORE THEY CANNOT DO ANYTHING. SOMEONE OUGHT TO LET THEM KNOW THAT LETTING SOMEONE HANG FOR THIS LONG IS VERY DISRESPECTFUL. I HAVE ZERO ISSUES WITH WRITING THIS KIND OF REVIEW AT THIS POINT. IF YOU HAVE A COMPLAINT THESE FOLKS DO NOTHING TO RECTIFY THE SITUATION. 11:36 A.M. This is an update, and I will continue to update--depending on what the salon does. I am asking that Aveda please call me back. I have a call into Nicole and she is going to call me back this afternoon. I spoke to one gentleman and he was very nice. I am certain that the salon will do the right thing. When they do, I will write a glowing review. Let us see what they decide to do. I wonder if they can put hair back on! 7:30 A.M. Hello Columbus. I had the single worst haircut I have ever received from this salon. I asked to have 1/4 inch off of my hair. I asked that the stylist put in long layers and long bangs. Throughout the haircut, she kept telling me that she could not see my hair. You see, she had blown it out so she could cover the mess she had made. I could see it and had to cut the haircut short, so I would not walk out with even shorter hair. The right side of my hair has layers and the left side of my hair does not. The right side is exactly two inches shorter than the rest of my hair. The solution she had was to keep cutting my hair off. She just kept cutting. Then she suggested I just wear my hair back. "Just pull your hair back." She looked on the floor and said "wow we took alot of hair off". I was polite, I left a tip (everyone needs to eat), and I left. This is not my first bad experience there. Overall, their service is terrible. They do not follow-up, they do not offer a refund, and they do not ever try to fix things. Cutting more hair off is not a solution. I have a huge meeting in about ten minutes and I would like Nurtur the Salon to know that I have, in fact, pulled my hair into a ponytail, because that is currently the only solution. I am heartbroken. I have never left a review of any product or service in my life. I have never taken the time to do so. I would warn anyone from going there. I apologize, in advance, for writing a review this scathing. I am just that dissatisfied with their work, and I have been to two people there. I let the first disaster go. I thought it was just a fluke. I will say that their waxing team is excellent and I cannot speak to their other services. They appear to not care, and they are not going to call me back or fix this. BTW, the only solution is a full bob or hair extensions. A bob is not an option. I am so sorry to all the folks who make their living there. I am not a mean person. I just do not want anyone to feel like I feel now.
Its 3 a.m.. im on a quick break from work. For the second time I have sat in this drive thru for over 20 minutes after ordering. You never hear sorry for the wait, you're never given anything for the inconveniences, and you are looked at like you're an idiot for getting a little pissed off that it takes 20 minutes to make one single egg McMuffin. The first time I drove off after 15 minutes. I tried this is the second time hoping that maybe it was just a bad night, but apparently this place sucks! Avoid! Let me mention that it didn't even taste good, either. Fail on mcdonalds! Also, since I have worked fast food I pay attention to details and I'm noticing that they are not even putting in the orders into the computer until after you get to the window ( and you don't pay until right before your food gets out )so that their time doesn't look bad to human resources! Smh
I booked it from Expedia (~$170 for 3 days). Then when I came to the counter after a long flight, the guy told me a lot of things in a very low voice (now I realize that's a trick). First, the damage waiver is NOT insurance, but they would never tell you this but only put it in a manual in a very samll fontsize, and give you that manual AFTER you sign everything. I had thought that this was the insurance i paid via Expedia, but it's not!! ~$30 a day for that bullshit!! Second, refuel by yourself, never choose their fuel option. They charged you for the whole tank at the beginning: if you don't use it up, they don't refund for the remaining gas; if you use it up and refill, what's left is theirs and they don't refund. So at the end I found they charged me ~$200 (separate from the $170 charged by the Expedia). Again, the guy spoke in such a low voice, with the purpose of not alarming you of any surcharges, and never meant to explain to you anything clearly, but just wanted to charge you more when your mind is not clear.. FXXK!!!
None
None
Went in for lunch with five others. Took twenty minutes to get a beer, first request was out, took ten minutes plus to get second request. Five of us ordered appetizers and all hot food came out cold, not even warm! Took another ten minutes to get microwaved food back. Management was sent took ten minutes for manager to come to table. We will not come back EVER!
Avoid, rude and impossible to get an appointment. Vince S your spot on
I have bought several vehicles over the years here but never again. I told them I wanted my credit union to do the financing. The sales manager told me he could do a "soft inquiry" just to see if he could beat them. MONSTER mistake on my part. I just got my 7th notice of HARD credit inquiries. I emailed and called them to give them the opportunity to correct their "mistake." They will not respond. I just bought two vehicles from another dealer. Bummer. They have a great service department.
NO VOTARÈ POR NADIE, POR ABANDONAR EL CONGRESO, Y ELSEÑOR PRESIDENTE LA SALUD EN Colombia, abandonada totalmente
Just left after sitting outside for 10+ minutes with no service. Don't care how good the food supposedly is as I will never know now. Don't plan on trying again.
I went there to buy music book and flute cleaning rod. One young male was helped me to find it and gave me the price. The price was on the tag also. I took both to the counter and an young lady rang the items. Rod rang as $6.29 but the tag said $5.99. I mentioned that price difference and asked why. The lady checked the inventory and told me that $6.29 is the right price and the price just went up, do you still want it? I think that is cheating (displaying one price and charging another). I went ahead and bought it but that is my last trip to that store. I have a photo with tag and receipt. I think the MO state recently sued Walgreens for similar issue.
None
Very dirty and poor service. We seated ourselves and had to wait a long time to order. Not sure there was a manager on duty. The building is nice and well furnished.
Went yesterday with my family. They are more than happy to charge full price for admittance, but half of the park was closed, including most stores and several rides. 8 dollars just to park. We will not be returning.
Just Drains is an unethical and inept company. They don't stand by their extremely unsatisfactory service, attempt to over charge, and when caught in a lie will deny any and all responsibility. They are a horrendous company to work with. If you do contact them expect unsatisfactory work, unprofessional demeanor, and costly damages.
Two years post-operation for Bunion surgery I'm having nothing but trouble with my foot. Bunion is back along with severe Morton's Neuroma. The Doctor Carreira was very handsome and pleasant. Hospital aftercare was atrocious (they sent me home with the wrong boot and I ended up with a terrible infection in my foot.) Visiting this office is a nightmare as the front office staff are very disrespectful and blatantly rude. I suggest that you seek a second opinion before you undergo surgery with this doctor.
The people working there were nice enough, but didn't fully know what they were talking about, and had they admitted to it, I would've been OK. Instead they tried to BS me. I ended up buying a kit for my step mom, which was their starter kit. Not sure how well it works because my step mom never really stuck to using it. I also purchased two replacement kanger heads, and this is what made me really angry. I asked for two kanger heads, 1.8ohm. Instead, what I got was two rip-off clone heads, at 2.2ohm. Basically, they staff deliberately scammed me, or they have no idea at all what they're talking about. In either case, you're much better off shopping online, unless you have a serious time crunch.
Associates have little knowledge of products. It seems like it must be their first Day on The job
BUYER BEWARE!!! BUYER BEWARE!!! We traded in a $11000 car with $7000 left to pay on it. They said they would pay our loan off and take the trade in for another car. Its been 3 months and they still have not paid off the loan. In the meantime we are sitting here getting harassing phone calls from our lender saying they have not received a payment. On top of that, the motor of the car that we got from them blew up in less than a month. They said they would fix it for $1500, so we got everything in order to get it fixed and now they're saying it will be more. Needless to say, we are done with them and we're not paying anything else. They've ruined our credit and now we are without a car. We're still dealing with this headache and they are not cooperating. They are crooks and con artists in the business of ripping people off.
I have first hand seen the decline of this property. It was pretty nice in 2009 during our first year so we decided to return in Jan 2013. The tenants have become younger and very disrespectful. The common areas of the property have been damaged and left unfixed. But the worst part are the staff. They will lie and use every and any opportunity and excuse to take your money with fines during move out. This is a clear desperation because their property is falling apart and they're trying to stay afloat. I could go on in detail but there is no need. My advice is do not go here. The apartments are NOT nice enough for the price.
At the Mall on Veteran's Day, and Decided to eat at Dairy Queen. We got the Most Horrible Service EVER, should have requested a refund. I took the Managers name and called to leave a message and never got a call back. Positively will never eat there EVER again. AND going to give the mall a bad review also.
I am always so shocked when I see this place get any kind of good review for absolutely anything. I did read a ton of bad reviews on the service at this place but I figured we'd try it anyway. I met up with some girlfriends (I'm signed in under my husband's account) for a girl's night out. We each showed up with a bottle of wine each, clearly showing we were in no hurry. The waitress gave us no intro, no "Hi. Welcome..." Nothing. Just a "what can I get you?" She was short with us, no smile...it was as if we were actually bothering her by requesting to be waited upon. Her service was bad, her attitude was worse. And this is the overall attitude of all the servers. After bad food and bad service she brought us over one large check, never even asked if we wanted it split, even though it was clear we were on a gal's night out and would probably need a split check. Since she barely ever returned to our table after tossing down our subpar meals I asked another waitress passing by if she could notify our waitress that we needed split checks. Her eyebrows went up and a look of "Oh I can't wait to see how this turns out!" came across her face as she said "Oh I'll tell her" with a lick of snide. The waitress came back over and without a word tossed down our checks. I had enough. I said to her "Is there a problem?" She said no. I said "Well it's as if you're having a hard time waiting on us. As if we're bothering you in some way." She just said "No. I don't know what you're talking about." Well we women did so for 4 checks totaling over $200 she got a $0 tip and at least 4 women that will never return to this establishment. Even if the food was outstanding I might be able to swallow poor service but the food was so bland and so bad. Pittsburgh has so many awesome restaurants definitely save your money and go elsewhere.
I was in their store this week and tried to buy 2 wine stoppers. The cashier helping me just kept running my card through their machine telling me it didn't go through. I realized she really didn't know what she was doing, very poor attitude and I needed to find a ladies room since their store doesn't allow their customers to use their facilities. So I told her to never mind ringing me up and I left their store without a purchase but now I have 2 charges on my credit card in the amount of $19.15 each. I printed everything out so I could go to their store and correct their mistake but my luck they are closed on Sunday, needless to say, very unpleasant experience. I will be in their store 1 more time to get my money back and then never again. Poor customer service, be sure to check your bank records if you don't use cash.
They had good food but the service was horrible, both at the bar and at dinner. It took just under twenty min to get a hold of a waiter and we never got our appetizer; despite asking about it 3 times.
A reason why I hate going to aasu. I never go in there anymore
None
None
None
I have to give a A for atmosphere, however a D for product and service. My girlfriend and I took a half day at work to get a mani and pedi combo. I paid for the Signature combo and she paid for the Deluxe. We were both very disappointed. Signature was to include Nail trimming & shaping - didn't happen, not on my feet and not on my hands; cuticle grooming - got it on my feet only; buffing & conditioning, callus smoother treatment - if that consisted of "Lisa" taking a purple scrubby pad to the bottoms of my feet for approximately 5 seconds, then I guess that happened; warm lotion massage and hot towel wrap - got it. I've got the same tufft of dry skin and same calluses in the same spot I walked in there with on Friday afternoon. Our "relaxing spa experience" lasted a whole 20 minutes total, then an additional 10 under the hand a feet dryer with no explaination of how long to sit there, do we use the nail dryind spray, etc. Also, I paid in cash, Maria used her card. When "Lisa" brought back my change and I didn't immediately tip her, she started talking in her native language with Maria's gal with attitude. This made me quite uncomfortable. Why would I tip before my service is compeltely over? Maybe I should have tipped only on the service that I had received up to that point. At one point I tried to make conversation with Lisa, asking her if she had been there a while and she was not interested in returning the conversation, actually I got the feeling that she hated her job, hated the fact that some girl had come in there for a service at the place that she worked. The polish on my hands have air bubble on 3 of the fingers of my left hand. Also, my cuticles are still ugly considering she didn't perform that service. I'd go back if it was offered to me for a re-do of the service, other than that, I doubt it. Taking the time off work to have an afternoon with my girlfriend at what seemed like a nice reputable place, we sure were disappointed, its a shame considering we are in that area at Rookwood at least once a month and were looking for a "go-to" place to do our girl thing together.
Beware of inexperienced sales associates - one opened a credit card in my name without my approval! My girlfriend, her family and I went in to buy her mom a b-day present. The item she wanted ( a North Face jacket) was a part of the annual Anniversary Pre-Sale, whose items are only available for purchase to those that have a Nordstrom credit or debit card. I offered to sign up for a Nordstrom Debit card so that we could purchase an item. First off - I made it VERY clear that I wanted a debit. The associate even said I did. She asked me the questions on the application one by one and then presented me with an approval form for me to sign. As I was scanning it I noticed that it said "credit card" in a few places. I looked up to ask the associate why it said that and she said "oh oops I accidentally signed you up for a credit card". I asked her to switch to debit to which she replied "I already submitted the application". !!!! EXCUSE ME!? I had not even given you the authorization to do so! I did not sign the approval form and you already took financial action in my name?! This was not a slight blunder! At this point, the application had been sent to the Nordstrom bank and a hard credit check was conducted in my name. This affects my credit score negatively for upwards of two years, during which I am very likely to buy a car! I was fuurious and all that the customer service ppl offered to do was have me come back and see the store manager the following morning. At this point I figured I would come back the next morning to deal with the credit card situation and just wanted to purchase the jacket so that my gf and her family wouldn't have to wait longer. I asked if I may please purchase the jacket without having to re-sign up for the debit card, because of this terrible mistake that was just made. The sales associates said I couldn't. Seriously?! You just opened a credit line in my name without my consent! I could sue Nordstrom if I wanted to! They continued to claim that there was nothing they could do... "Ok," I said "can I just buy the jacket at full price - I don't care about the $40 savings anymore". Their response? No you may not. Are you f-ing kidding me? You wouldn't let me buy an item at full price after what just happened? Literally one of the most asinine things I've ever heard. We left the store furious at the pure idiocy of the situation. I came back the next morning to speak with the store manager, Todd Buntin. The guy comes out with the jacket in hand, cheesin. I figure that he'll offer me a deeper discount or something because of what happened the night before. Instead he just goes - "You will have to sign up for a debit or credit card to buy this jacket." I stood there, speechless. Suffice it to say I will no longer shop at Nordstrom. Todd, I suggest you re-evaluate your store policies.
I checked and double-checked their website to make sure that they would be open, since it's quite a diversion from any main destinations. The website said that the Maison should be open outside its limited hours during the Christmas season. I thought it was safe to assume that "Christmas season" included the week before Christmas, which is when we went. The sign on the outside of the building said the same thing. It didn't look promising when we got there, but a man pulled in next to our car and went into the building beside the main entrance. When we asked him if it was open, he said yes, just knock. We knock. And knock. And knock some more, all while making eye contact with a man inside the main building. He looked away, ignoring us, and the first man had to come around and open it up to let us in. Once inside, he got a staff member, some woman who came out with an espresso cup in her hand and a fat wad of bread in her mouth and other hand. Still chewing, she asks us what we want. "We were wondering if the Maison was open?" "If WHAT is open? We are many things: a brewery, a hotel, a restaurant..." "Pardon, the guided tour for the brewery." "No, it's closed." "So no part of the building is open for us to just see and maybe take a picture?" "No, and I have things to do!" I dearly wish I could have doused her with the espresso! She said that to us, verbatim. Not a civil "no, I'm sorry for the confusion." I would have been okay if she just said again, "I am sorry, please come back another time." At least she deigned to let us buy something from the gift shop, though she didn't even turn on the lights for us to see the products. She offered to get a new box for my sister instead of the display one, but came back after disappearing into the storage area for ten seconds to say (again, verbatim, and utterly lacking in manners): "The box is very far, so just this (display) one." I don't know if management reads reviews, but good God this was one of the worst "conversations" I've ever had with a person.
Lines to long, under staffed!!
Crap
I went today around 2:00 and ordered Kung Pao Chicken and chicken wings. Both were dry and terrible -- did not taste fresh; more like reheated. The chicken wings were hard and had dried black blood on them. Usually I order chicken chow mein at Oriental restaurants, but noticed two almost full plates of it on an empty table when we walked in, so figured that must not be good. I wondered if they had perhaps just warmed up in the oven what was leftover from the buffet earlier.... maybe we came at the wrong time? I did not eat my meal, and was afraid to order another. At least was not charged for it. The plastic cup I drank out of also had two chips in it and were sharp on my mouth. I told the waiter about it and he didn't seem to give a s---. I suggested he retire the glass. My friend ordered sweet & sour chicken; she said it was OK but did not have much flavor. We will not be visiting this place again.
I went there recently with a groupon I purchased. I havent been there in several months due to the consist management changes....no one could seem to get there SH$%^ together...but I find a groupon and thought I would give them another chance. To say the least, I was ONCE again disappointed. I was told they would NOT accept the groupon. The girl was curt, and rude, saying I can use it at the Pompano store. When it CLEARLY states on it for the coral springs store! I explained to her that I purchased it for this store, because I lived less than 2 miles away. She didnt seem to care. Nor did she even offer anything in exchange for making it up...EX: A small discount of some sort... A purchase with maybe a free one......NOTHING! POOR CUSTOMER SERVICE!! I own my own retail store, and I would have gladly at least "Tried" to make it up to the customer! Well, I drove over to their competitor and "They" took the groupon! Needless to say, I WILL NEVER GO BACK TO BOCA TANNING! HORRIBLE CUSTOMER SERVICE!!!
None
Currently hating it. The staff is nice and friendly when trying to sign you up for a membership. I remember them calling me 2 or 3 times a day to come back in - even on Sundays. Now I've been a member for a few months and the club is just going down the drain. Don't get me wrong, they have nice large new facilities. Towels, electronic lockers (no lock needed, just a combo), and pool. The problem is that recently there are no towels, half of the electronic lockers don't work (forcing members to leave stuff unlocked) and the pool was closed for a while for some unknown reason. To make it worse my billing is wrong and no matter how many times I try to fix it I get NO response. It's the classic bait and switch - treat 'em great when trying to sign them up and them provide no customer service. The cleanliness has also become an issue and it is obvious that this place is understaffed from front desk staff to cleaning staff. Not to mention the front desk staff changes every week and has no clue what's going on. The owner of this gym should worry, this place is falling apart fast. I would think twice about joining this gym - find a place that's nice AND properly maintained.
I don't give out negative feedback lightly, in fact this is the only time I have taken the time to rate anything negatively online. That being said, TR Lawing are the slumlords of Charlotte and have proven their status over and over again. With cheap, temporary fixes to major problems and general disregard toward those that are under contract with them, these cats just don't care. They give swift call-backs to work order requests under the guise of taking care of the issue swiftly, but you find yourself waiting all day for the promised work to be completed. When someone finally does show up, you are lucky to have an actual solution worked out. Typically it is some cheap fix. We moved out of our last place in order to get away from TR Lawing, but they ended up buying our building anyway. The issues that we have brought to their attention have received NO work, nor have they addressed us about any of it. Currently I am sitting with no AC because of work their guys did on another unit. Somehow they managed to bust mine up and not return to fix it. I called this morning to have them come back out and take care of their mistake.... it is now 5pm. Guess our already breezy windows will have to stay open tonight... Avoid if at all possible
Although this is a nice looking motel we had a bad experience. The laundry room was locked at 9:30 10 min before I went to get our cloths out. When the dryer electronics would not restart the next morning, the woman running the place claimed my laundry had wrecked her dryer and tried to get me to pay for repairs. Being an electrical engineer I suspect turning the dryer of while still drying my clothes may be the real culprit. Anyway we had to leave with a load of wet laundry that had sat in the dryer all night. In their defence a sign did ask us not to use the dryer after 9:30 and suggest that half loads worked best in the rather under powered non commercial dryer. However nothing was said about the power being shut off and the door being locked! In addition $2 for an undisclosed but quite short amount of drying time seemed excessive.
Bad service and lack of quality
The food was cold the service was slow the atmosphere... A hive of scum and villainy. The value... May have been okay if they paid me. Over all the memory of how poor the experience was will scar me profoundly.
None
Polaris has nothing to do with ford!!!! WTF
We've been here 3 times and never been greeted. It wasn't even a busy Saturday those days. They also don't deal over email so you can't cut out all the BS sales talk and just get a price. Very backwards thinking, annoying dealer. They also put a really annoying Gary Lang sticker on your bumper if you were buy a car from them, just so you know.
I strongly recommend going somewhere else for whatever it is you need. I was told by an employee in the cell phone department that sometimes they lie to make a sale. Doesn't sound like anywhere anyone should do business. Not a good motto: lets lie to them just to make a buck and disappointment them later when we tell them we lied to get them to make a purchase"
Would NEVER recommend this place. I have had 30+ years dealing with different vets, had numerous dogs. They should be ashamed of themselves, especially Dr. Hassinger, one of the owners. I had a $10,000 experience here. won t go into all the details here. Feel free to e-mail me and I will. Simply stated, my estimated costs finally were billed at THOUSANDS above. I had to pay the bill before I was allowed to take my dog home, and then he died 3 hours later. When I called and asked to speak with Dr. Hassinger to discuss all my concerns about extremely poor treatment received at this clinic, he refused to speak with me and filtered me through their admin manager. I even tried writing him a certified letter. Still refused to speak with me, but did send a response with an offer to lower my final bill amount AND an agreement to sign to dismiss them from all other claims. Are you kidding? It s ultimately all about money here. My credit card company agreed and refunded over $2500. UNETHICAL, IMMORAL AND SHAMEFUL! It s been a year since I have even been able to write this review, it was so painful. Shame on you, Dr. Hassinger and Northeast Veterinary! Do yourself a favor, and in an emergency, make the drive to the clinic in S. Abington. Stellar service and compassion there....world s apart from the treatment your beloved pet will receive here. btw, I have proof in writing from my credit card company of the $2,732.14 REFUNDED to me! Email me and I can provide proof and tell you more about all the lies and shortcomings. Northeast can TRY to tell a good story and it s a shame that it s left up to office staff to handle and not the doctors who are actually charged with the care of our beloved pets.
not wanting to sound like i'm over-exaggerating, but the reviews from those prior are spot on - this is a shoddy and lousy service. made a phone booking the night before in which they took my arrival details and gave me clear instructions on where to wait. stood waiting for one hour for the shuttle to come when i arrived but an absolute no show. fortunately did not provide any payment or credit card details and got a ride with a different shuttle service. book at own risk!
essa porra ai,[],não EXISTE E NUNCA EXISTIU ,[],[],
i was sold a wrong piece again. sales staff are to high to know anything
Roaches everywhere. Worst Baymont Inn I have ever been in. Disgusting.
None
It sucks how so many attorneys can't be trusted nowadays. You can add Seppi Esfandi to that list. He is just looking to take your money and hand your case over to some newbie attorney who has no idea what he is doing. I was given all this bull about Seppi's reputation and his record, but you won't even get him as a lawyer. This is the a bait and switch operation they will sell you an attorney with experience and as soon as you pay they switch you to an attorney who only cares about getting paid.
Requested an oil change which was told to me over the phone to be $37 not including a $10 sale bringing it to 27. I arrive and they requote me 10% instead of $10. I agree anyways and left my phone number (in case something else was wrong) and my car there and went back to work. After work i arrived to a bill of $119 and a mechanic telling me "The things were broken, and needed replacing". He claimed to try to call but didnt get ahold of me because he did not write down my phone number right. I asked, and literally he said that it made sense to do the work anyways even as i had clearly stated call for conformation before doing anything. They wiped the labor fee, and he tried fiddling with numbers to screw me out of more money, he said he'd take another 20% off. I noticed he never took the original 10% off which he had quoted. At this point he was fumbling for answers and seemed to be making things up as he went to why things happend as they were. Absolutely avoid this place. It is not worth it, go to any other local oil change spot.
Relentlessly incompetent printing staff. They didn't process our order, then tried to overcharge us. This is the last time we will print something there. Avoid them if you want your print job done properly.
The staff is rude at best. If it were not for the fact that the bride loved the bridesmaids dresses so much we would have went elsewhere and in the long run we should have!! One of the dresses came in the wrong color, the wedding is in 2 weeks and we still don't have the dress. They keep us on hold for at least 20-30 min EVERY TIME we call and when they finally get back on the line they are rude and condescending. Mistakes happen and I am not a complainer normally BUT they are so rude about the situation and given that weddings are stressful enough I would NOT recommend anyone getting there dresses here!!
My daughter bought a ticket for Logan Airport and was told it was $45. She expressed surprise but paid in cash and later saw that the one-way ticket was only $25. She phoned us, we went back 10 minutes later with a pdf of the ticket and the woman who sold her the ticket said first that it was the cost of a round trip ticket, then when we showed her the pdf denied that she would have sold her a one-way ticket for $45. Nothing to be done. $20 not returned. Buyer beware. The prices are not posted anywhere--look it up ahead of time. An unscrupulous teller can easily pocket some extra cash this way.
This place sucks
lixo
I can't wait for my lease to be up this spring. It's a horrible place. I don't blame the maintenance for being slow, it's because the apartments are not taken care of in the first place from management. The maintenance staff is always running around trying to keep up the best that they can. For example during this Polar Vortex there have been several apartments without heat. A friend of mine lives a few buildings over and she's been without heat for 3 days now; they had to buy space heaters themselves to stay warm... So their most recent solution to fix heating (because they ran out of replacement valves for heaters) was to take existing valves from vacant apartments to use as replacements. Well those vacant apartments had no heat and pipes burst. The vacant apartment next to mine had its pipe burst. It sounded like a river when I came home last night after work. My kitchen was flooded with 2 inches of dirty brown water. And my hallway was soaked. I called the main office several times and no one answered and eventually had to run over there and tell someone about the problem. Maintenance came right over (Really nice guys) and shut the water off next door. I was told there shouldn't be any issue and that I could clean up the water (no mop and bucket was given to me) luckily I had a wet-vacuum. Water kept seeping over to my apartment and dirty brown puddles kept forming. I tried to call maintenance (after hours around 530PM) per the emergency line and left a voice mail. No one got back to me and no call back at all today. I spent all night vacuuming the water that kept seeping over. I finally call the office today while at work and expressed my concern about the soaked hallway carpet, kitchen floor that had standing water and questioned the wall that I shared with my neighbor that had water running under it all night… My concern is of mold… and I was told that they would have maintenance look at my apartment then they would decide if carpet can be replaced. She also told me they had multiple pipes burst throughout the complex. I can foresee that this will be a LONG battle with a horrible management staff. Prior to this problem, it took management 2 months to fix a moldy ceiling in my bathroom that I requested be repaired multiple times ( I eventually had to go to the office for 2 weeks straight and request in person to have something done). The outside light has been broken for 2 months, despite my request of having it repaired so that it is easier to find my keys and unlock my door when I come home late from work. You’re better off fixing broken closet doors yourself. It is the cheapest place to rent in Odenton, but you get what you pay for. I would not recommend this complex to friends and families. Before this flood thing happened, I still was not satisfied by how the complex was managed or the upkeep of my actual apartment. They showed me a lovely model apartment and told me I could have one of the renovated ones but by the time I had to sign a lease they told me “they were all out”. I was moving back to MD from out of state and had a deadline to start a new job so I just took what they had. BIG MISTAKE. Save yourself a headache and look somewhere else.
None
None
Horrible service, pizza is like eating a frozen digorno
I was surprised to see all these good reviews about this restaurant..Me and my husband have decided to have some indian food for dinner at this place. Food was so flavorless that at some point i had to ask for some salt and pepper.
They are charging very high rate. I compared myself with many other shop who sales the same thing in far lesser price. For a top filter they are charging 1300Rs having same spec same company filter the actual price I found in many places around 650-700Rs. I found many other discrepancies in price. To me they are not at all a good seller.
Just absolutely hate every bit of the service offered at this location under relatively new manager.
Ordered what was supposed to be steak with garlic prawns, steak was full of grizzle and was as tough has shoe leather. Our prawns turned into what were clearly shrimps in a greasy tasteless sauce. The table was sticky, staff just looked bored without any motivation will definitely not visit again. The worst meal I've had since school dinner days.
Sav lamentable....Enseigne à éviter!
Do NOT take your jacket off and put it on the back of your chair, here or anywhere in the city. I was here last night and had coffee with a few friends. There were only a few people there but someone managed to steal my wallet out of my zipped jacket pocket.
None
Date of visit: 03/22/2012. First, let me say I have written over 250 published restaurant reviews. This place has to rate in 250th place. The worst buffet I have ever been to. It has gone downhill faster than skier Pickaboo Street. The food was awful. The wonton soup broth tasted like tap water. The wontons were brown on the top. You needed a microscope to find any chicken in the Chicken with Broccoli.. I even waited until a new tray was brought out. The beef in the Mongolian Beef was like rubber with no taste. The lo mein was greasy. The string beens were shriveled up and overcooked. Despite being a Thursday night, the food trays were empty most of the time. (this could have been a good thing) There was a sign by the ice cream saying "It tastes better on a cone" but there were no cones available. There were people eating from their plates while still at the food area...very unhealthy and even one person that literally finished his plate BEFORE he got back to his table. The manager/hostess was verbally fighting with the chef the entire time we were there. When she wasn't arguing, she was actually falling asleep standing up most of the night.. The ONLY bright spot was the friendly servers, which after reading other reviews is an improvement. I would advise you to try the other two buffets in Middletown but they are also below par. I would avoid Jumbo buffet at all costs. It was really horrible. Steve K.
Quite honestly-this is the worst place you could imagine living. The management doesn't care. They will undercut you at every turn. I paid a $224 for my application and 'deposit'-which was only supposed to be $99 due to an online deal at the time, but they didn't honor it. I paid for my brother to live here and paid for his deposit and application fee and got NOTHING back for his deposit. He passed final inspection and was supposed to receive his full deposit back. When I asked the people in the office about it (trust me, this is a joke because no one who is employed there has even the tiniest clue as to what is going on) they forwarded me the account manager. After over two weeks of arguing and asking for his final statement from them, I looked at it and it had a $100 'fee' on there. No specification as to why that fee was there or what it was for. I asked them multiple times and sent more emails than I should have asking for clarification and nothing got resolved...so if you want to know how they have all these 'awesome' activities, it's because they are perfectly ok ripping off everyone they can. I also was promised a $150 credit to my rent due to resigning on a certain date. Never saw that money either. And if the fact that these shysters are money hungry lazy jerks doesn't steer you away, there's also the crappy ventilation (my roommate had to ask them for over six months to fix her window which leaked water onto her bed every time it snowed and rained and my other roommate literally has a hole in her window that they told her was 'unfixable'), the tiny tiny parking spaces (i know a girl who got her car towed the other day WITH A PARKING STICKER ON IT!), the creepy people that they just let live there, and the cleaning checks that rarely happen in the time period allotted and when they do happen, you might fail for no reason (last month the guy didn't go into my room and the month before I failed for 'not cleaning' a job that wasn't even on my assignment list.) In other words-don't bother. This places sucks your soul almost as fast as it sucks your money.
None
Photographed a wedding here. Awful management, amp blew, crowded and disrespectful service.
Comida de calidad justita, las vistas de Barcelona no son muy buenas y el precio es demasiado alto.
I wouldn't work for this company. Their ads are misleading, when I went to their job fair, all it mentioned was Amazon so I'm thinking I would work for Amazon. Come to find out its only a temp job, not permanent. Also, I was never told to bring in education proof. All I was told was to call in 2 weeks. That whole scene was like a cattle call, no organization whatsoever! I have told SMX I am not interested in working for a temp agency but I still am getting robo calls from them. I have talked to 3 people and told them the same thing yet, I'm still getting the calls!
Not good experience. I feel like I didn't get what I paid for. I posted what happened with my course and they keep deleting it. I will repost as others has right to know what happened to me. Class was okay , but I feel that there was too many stories, and there was not enough learning. The teacher went off topic and would let students get into some longer talks and not keep on topic. It would get boring then as I didn't find I could relate that to what we were trying to learn. Some more driving education videos would have been good choice over the stories. We did get to leave early both days as it was the holiday weekend and steve had to leave as he said he had dinner plans. I was disappointed that I didn't pass my road test, even though manndeep had said I was ready and I would have had a bit more driving if she didn't take the breaks in most of my lessons. I was out for just 2 hrs, and couldn't you take your coffee breaks before or after you had come for me for my lessons. I didn't like sitting having to wait for you for taking your coffee breaks and also several times Manndeep was on the phone talking in punjabee to her son, and I had to park waiting for her at the curb for her to finish her talks. I didn't make you ever have to wait for me. I did get to drive a nice car, it was a new honda, but she was always on the brake and I was getting kind of annoyed at manndeep, as I didn't think it was needed at all and I have driven lots before lessons. I will practice with my family and then try to do another road test as I didn't pass. The road test can only be done at one registry and only one day specifically. No choices in the registry to do the test or the day that you want to do the test.
Todella ala-arvoista palvelua, kymmeniä "myyjiä" haahuilee tokkuroissaan edestakaisin. Jos erehdyt kysymään jotain saat vain vihaisen katseen, rahat tuskin päätyvät mihinkään hyvään tarkoitukseen.
ALEC: toxic corporate propaganda on steroids. All taxpayer subsidized. #StopALEC
None
None
Waited over an hour for food and ended up asking for our money back.
I'm posting to voice my displeasure regarding Staple's business practices and how it treats its customers.Today, I went to the store to return my laptop (OS was not running ) and I was told by the manager that, In order to take it back, the PC must have to work. Why would somebody return something that still works . She also told me that , Its look like its been used more than two days, even though the PC run time is less then 24 Hrs (according to the OS). Needless to say, I will be taking my business elsewhere in the future.
This location is closed. Sign does not say why they closed.
This apartment complex is completely HORRID. Never have I lived in a place where they make you feel like you are not at home. I certainly think that paying $1000 a month for a studio means that you should provide the utmost service when necessary. Instead this location likes to milk you even more through ridiculous fees, like being charged $100 if you get locked out of your apartment after hours. Also, don't even think you could have friends spend the night without a penalty. There are about 5 visitor spots, per every two buildings, and if your friend is not in one of those parking spots then prepare to pay $400 the next day for them to get their car back because they will tow cars overnight, like creeps. To add on to this unforgettable disaster, I have breakfast with roaches because this place is infested. I regret moving out of my parents house, for this! I mean come on its Rancho!
None
This company is so bad won't pay Richmond staff for medical benefits the sons are taking over and are greedy pigs . making billions paying employees nothing billion dollar company needs to keep staff happy. Happy staff better performance less turnover equals more net profit. Can't throw out old employees higher new ones at 9 bucks can't buy experience
Third world medicine!
I've worked there before.... its the dirtiest place I've ever seen, for who ever is going to eat there, i recommend you not to..... they left out there bacon for two weeks beside the dish washing machine and sometimes food goes on the bacon witch makes it very dirty.. isn't that crazy !!!!!
First,let me say that I found the place to be clean. The room was small but we had plenty of room to sleep and we would have showered IF THERE WAS HOT WATER!!! We arrived on a Friday afternoon, as someone was yelling at Patrick, the manager about there not being any hot water. The man threw his key at Patrick. We inquired and he said it was "being fixed as we speak". He invited us to check out the room before we checked in and then he gave is a small discount ( $30 off entire stay) "because we were nice". We came back that evening, hoping to shower and there was still no hot water. The woman at the front desk said they had called someone to fix it and they were coming. She must not have known that Patrick had told us in the afternoon that they were already there fixing it. Hmmm... 24 hours later, there was still no hot water and we had an event to attend that evening. We went downstairs and asked Patrick about it again and he said it was fixed. We had just left the room and the water was stone cold. We told him that we thought an additional discount was in order because of the lack of hot water. He flew into a rage and told us he already gave us one discount and why did we think we deserved another one and did we want him to lose his job. My friend stayed downstairs talking with him while I went up to check the water and it was still cold. He started screaming at my friend, kicked her out of the building and called the police on us!!! When I came downstairs, he told me that he felt threatened by us, he was concerned for his safety, we had to leave and the police had been called. I told him we would stand outside and wait for the police. When the NYPD arrived and realized that we were the problem, they thought it was pretty laughable that this big burly guy felt threatened by these 2 middle-aged women! He told us that we had a right to have hot water and a right to stay there because we had paid for the room and if we discover that our stuff is gone from the room when we return, we were to call 911 and they would help us. We returned to the room at 5pm and there finally was hot water. However, it was scalding hot and very difficult to control. It took me about 15 minutes to get it to usable temperature and then there was very poor water pressure. But at least we could finally shower! It's too bad. I would have stayed there again since it was clean and convenient. But Patrick either needs anger management classes or he needs to find a new line of work. I work in the hotel industry as does my friend, who used to own a motel. There was no need for him to react the way he did. His anger was misplaced. Perhaps if he had been more forceful with the plumbers and less obnoxious to the guests, the whole issue would have been resolved to everyone's satisfaction!
Absolutely terrible. First, the decor would be nice and elegant if this were 1992. Second, the musty stench everywhere. Like a wet dog in every hallway. Third. Location by the freeway is convenient but very loud. Louder than average for a hotel near a freeway. The flyover interchange is eye level with our fifth floor room. Woken up at 3:30am by what sounded like a jackhammer in our wall. Called front desk, they said they'd send up a security guard. 30 minutes and two calls later, the security guard arrives and confirms we have an intolerably loud noise from inside the wall, not caused by the room next door (unoccupied). Asked front desk if she could move us to a different room. She said 'no, we're all full'. She then stated she would double check and call me back. She did not call back. The security guard came back to the room about 10 minutes later with keys for a different room. Surprise, not as sold out as stated. Got to our new room at 4:30am, the key cards don't unlock the door. Call down to the front desk, she says she'll be right up. Security guard show up, let's us into the room. This was the only night of the past year where I actually needed a great nights sleep and no stress. Glad we got that taken care of, Crowne Plaza. Do yourselves a favor. One, don't pay their normal rate online, it's a joke. Two, it's not worth the hotwire price of $75/night, even without our nightmare noise issues. Just don't stay here, period.
Uncontrolled ,Terrible reviews section , especially fake reviews are not controlled by Google. Despite our warnings google did not do anything about it. FAKE reviews from competitors are so obvious and you cant do nothing about that. Bad Job By google.
Owner is very rude to employees in front of people. And we can hear it out in dining room. Slams things on counters when people are in sitting in dining rooms. They are not very nice people.
Ordered my pizzas but no one was at store fifteen minutes later after I drove there in sub zero temperatures.
Hey Bruce, why did you even have to write a review!! You got your product back and an explanation. The dealings I had with Louisville Geek have been more than positive. When one tech couldn't figure it out another tech got on my computer without even coming in to solve the problem. Sometimes I feel people who like to complain, complain about EVERYTHING! I GIVE YOU ONE STAR on ratings.
The wait time is longer that it should be for small services like tire changes and oil changes. They have really smooth talking and convincing salespeople/mechanics that will try to upsell you on everything. They will say they perform a extensive inspection on your car and come back with all sorts of things that need to be fixed but it's just a way to get more money. On one of there "inspections" they said one of my belts needed to be replaced immediately. I refused and a couple months later had no choice to go there again for an oil change. During that "inspection" they didn't see anything wrong with my belt but did notice that my rack and pinions needed to be replaced...See what I mean.
Paying for 25 Mbps, receiving 0.4 Mbps. Constantly disconnects. Call for service and they say it's not their problem.
I called them yesterday evening because I needed some work done on an circuit breaker panel as well as a hot water heater. They said that they could do all of that and scheduled someone to come out the following morning. I then called them back to confirm that the person would be a certified electrician, and they said that they would be. The next morning, at the time the guy was supposed to have been here, I get a call from Mr. Handyman stating that they don't have licensed plumbers or electricians so can't do either of the jobs I asked about. I ask him why they then said that they do, and he said that was their "answering service". Add in the fact that they charge $146 for the first hour and $96/hour after that, which is a lot for not even being licensed plumbers or electricians, and Mr. Handyman definitely gets a 1 star...
Food was good as usual, but I was shocked with Racist behaviour of the staff. Me and My wife (we are Indians) went there on Friday evening at around 8:30 couple of weeks back. As we enter there were two tables free on front side of the restaurant adjacent to front Glass. We requested that we would like to sit on one of those table, waiter told us that area is getting closed and asked us to sit area behind near the back side of the restaurant. We agreed and "co-incidentally" were made to sit next to another India couple. We still did not suspect anything. But as time went on and we ordered and yet we realised area where we initially requested to sit was given to new customer not to mention all white skinned. We finished at 10 and that area was still full with new customers eating happily. I was really furious and asked the same waiter why he did not let me sit there and he had not proper answer. These things really make you feel sick after living in London for 7 years you still has to face such a racial behaviour.
Horrible customer service. Ran into financial issues, all my neighbors are receiving services at a lesser rate. Rep said she could give me a better rate once my contract was up...REALLY DUH. Of course you are going to give me a better rate when my contract is up to try and keep me...that's a given. Wouldn't do anything to help me now. I would not recommend this service provider at all. I am telling EVERYONE I know. Social media is a great thing! Don't use or sign their three year contract!
The worst experience of my moms life. Phoned Knights plumbing and heating about furnace broke down. Its minus 35 outside. Tech showed up inspected the furnace said it needs both motors replaced so he replaced both and the furnace still did not work, said he would have to get a new switch and left for the day with no heat. My mother is 68 years old. Returned the next day and said he could not find the switch but taped together the old one and said everything should work. Well the house got back up to temp and when the furnace shot off it never restarted. charged her $506 dollars. When she phoned back to say it was not working they would not even pick up the phone. Phoned a new company and they said she needed a new furnace and Knight should of informed her of this. Very bad business practice.
I call and order a Hawaiian Pizza for Delivery at 5:00 pm, It is 6:43 pm adn my pizza hasn't arrived, I call them to ask about the delivery, the guy said It was on its way and that it was going to be in my apartment in 5 -10 mins. 15 mins have passed and still nothing, no PIZZA at all. Worse Pizza Place EVER, don't waste your money and time, customer service is a crap
expencive and terrible staff specially bodyguards of clubs are not friendly at all... if you read this review, dont go to soho bar...
I agree with the other reviewer, but I will not be anonymous. I had great service from MIKE. He's the only one you should work with in my opinion, the other female employees and the manager should take customer service classes. I was lied to by an employee and the manager as well. I had to pick up a quick gel mask replacement before a trip and I was charged $75. They gave me just the blue part of the 2 part gel piece, so after I returned, I had to pretty much had to fight to get the pieces I bought for $75, (On eBay btw...for under $20!). Then I found out I was overcharged for the part when I complained and they said it was $55, they just got an email about the "new prices" and the employee wasn't aware. I asked if the employee read her company emails, especially ones that pertained to her job. The manager the looked at the employee and said, "Um, we had a meeting about this" and then I was thinking "What??" and said, "So the employee just didn't care" and the manager gave me $20. Very uncool. Nightmare of a mess and with the drama, my bill is still inaccurate. Overall, I was lied to 2x, I was overcharged and got wrong equipment.
Cedar House you need to work on your customer service. After we ordered it took forever for us to get our food. I think our wait staff felt bad so they just started avoiding us. When I tried to take to management about the problem he was extremely rude. I would suggest that if you are looking for a dinner out that you find other choices in the Hollister area.
This place is horrible. I moved my stuff out. Everything was covered in mold. Rat dropping everywhere. Stay away from this place.
When we arrived the hostess was cold and disinterested. At the first visit the waiter did not offer to get us drinks. The second visit he took our drink and food order. He was knowledgable about the menu. We did not see him again until dinner was served and never offered to refill our drinks. He stopped once to check on our meal and for about 20 minutes after our plates from dinner were served he finally asked us if we would like dessert. When he asked he did not have the dessert menu with him and assumed we had the menu memorized. He only asked one of the three of us in our party if they would like an after dinner drink, and once that person said yes he left to prepare the drink. As for the food it was very disappointing. I had the Union Square Louie. The hard boiled eggs were overdone so the yolks were green because of the released ferric oxide. The prawns were simply steamed and did not have any seasoning-- plus they were overcooked and chewy. The lettuce was drenched in dressing. Beyond overpriced for the quality. I will not return and I would not recommend anyone to this restaurant.
Sub-Par. How hard is it to cook a steak really? Decided to visit this place for a birthday lunch. What a mistake. The staff have no interest in serving you. In fact you feel like you are a inconvenience to their day. The place had 4 tables and a few other bar guests. No very busy. Perhaps that should have been an indicator for us. After ordering some meals A Sub Cheese Burger $19, Fish & Chips $20 and a $29 Rump steak Medium Rare with nothing else but a sauce on the side. After making a point about the sauce on the side it arrived smothered in it, When asked to have it without the sauce was greeted with an indignant response. The Steak was then returned 10 min later (same Steak) When it was cut into it was well done, very well done. After attempting to attract a wait staff. We decided to take the steak back to the kitchen opening. Needless to say that the kitchen staff huffed their irritation. No apology no acknowledgment nothing. By this stage the other guests were 2/3rds through their meal. When I approached the wait staff about it they seemed completely put out. At this point I suggested that they refund me for the steak. Still no apology just "sooo you like don't want the steak?" Once our guests finished their meals (They were not very impressed with their meals ether.) We ordered 2 more beers and 2 coffees. One coffee eventually arrived 12 min after the first. This place looks like it has possibility nice expensive decor. The owners clearly have style. It is a pity they have the most disengaged staff. Perhaps its a representation of the leadership or just really bad atypical Canberra service. Congratulations Sub-Urban. You truly are sub par in every way. Avoid this place if you want a good experiance
On Sunday, Nov 24th 2013, I helped my sister and her husband shopping for a car. We were choosing from Mazda 3, Honda Civic and Toyota Corolla and visited the Honda Carland in Roswell as our 2nd stop. After test driving the Civic and a short negotiation, we agreed on a price with the advertised 0.9% APR finance. During the test drive and negotiation, we told the saleswoman Cathy Savage that my sister and her husband just immigrated to the United State for a year. Even though their credit scores are over 780 but they do not have enough traditional credit lines. They do not have any bad credit either. The purpose of the finance is to help build their credit history, so they could buy a house soon. We put 20% down payment for the purchase. We wanted to make sure we could get the 0.9% APR before signing the purchase agreement. We gave them the credit disclosure, SSN, DOB to the finance director George Foster. George came out and shook our hands stating “congratulations, you are approved with the 0.9% APR finance.”. We signed the paperwork. Since it was almost 8:00pm, we could not finalize the financing. They allowed us to drive the car home so we could come back Monday to finish the rest of work. On Monday 25th, we were asked to submit the additional documents including lease agreement, cable, gas, utility bills, w-2, bank statement, SSN cards and green cards. This morning (26th), we were told the APR suddenly became 3.9%. We believe this is a clear cheating on the finance part and we would like to call your attention to the dealership and the two individuals: Cathy Savage and George Foster. We are reporting to regulators on the issue we have experienced.
I'm forced to use them for service because of my warrenty. I brought in my car with intermittent problems, in on case the Blue Tooth was not broadcasting. My phone could see the Garmin blue tooth in the same car. The definition of intermittent is it doesn't always happen. They said it was my phone since their's worked. Several days later not only was my phone not working, but three other blue tooth devices. I also reported other intermittent problems, and they simply said it was working. I wanted to make sure intermittent problems were recorded during the warranty period. They treated me with contempt. When I'm out of warranty I'll bring my car to University Imports, where I always had a great experience. Also, I asked for synthetic oil, there was no paperwork saying they used synthetic oil. The service advisor said he told them to use synthetic oil. Not only was there no documentation, but there was a traditional oil sticker, 5-30, synthetic is 0-20. I pointed that out and they said they must have put that sticker as a reminder for tire rotation. They treated me like a moran.
Do not use . They are ment to be the premier cab company in Northampton except however they are rude, do not care about customers are always late and full of excuses and have a habit of lying by saying they are there when there not. (probally at wrong address) they dont care. Also constantly touting for tips they then make up a price on an airport run to one that was origionally quoted and make you feel uncomfortable if you dont pay. Dont bother using you will regret it unless you like being late and made to feel like an idiot.
Absolutely abysmal place to live - pre-historic appliances, dirty apartment when we first moved in, ants, and most recently someone's couch and appliances blocking our door.
It was bad. The food was needs work and the place needs remodeling. Service is bad
ripped off! expect an extra 20 quid on your bill. 6 pound for 4 popadoms and chutney!need I say more!!!
When this car wash first opened I was very satisfied and the automatic tire shine worked well and my car was dried properly. Now the automatic tire shine does not work (although the light blinks falsely) and the tire shine sprayed by hand which was done too quickly, caused massive spots all over my 3 piece chrome wheels. I had to clean the wheels myself and apply tire shine as well. Then I found spots all over both doors and also on the rear quarter panels. I see here someone who has used both places in LC indicated the other Daddyo's on Lohman Ave is better. I guess I will give that a try. I tried to call the car wash today on Saturday to report this but no one answered the phone.
In 1990, the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission (NRC) ranked the failure of the emergency electricity generators and subsequent failure of the cooling systems of plants in seismically very active regions one of the most likely risks. The Japanese Nuclear and Industrial Safety Agency (NISA) cited this report in 2004. According to Jun Tateno, a former NISA scientist, TEPCO did not react to these warnings and did not respond with any measures.
I would put half a star if it's possible because ever since I came here my first day I wanted to change hotel but they wouldn't give me my money back also I got switched rooms 2 times. Heater was not working and they just provided me with a tinny electric heater. They just want to take advantage of the tourist. Even they charge for a cup of ice. Defiantly not a place to stay can't wait till I get out of this place.
They cannot give me an eta of when my transmission will be back. Refused to call for an eta then threatened me saying "You better not go to Salt Lake to try to pick it up". Extremely poor customer service. Glad I sold the car instead of getting the transmission rebuilt here. Never ever again....
absolutely worse service. Phone is busy, out of service or wrong #??, but this is the only phone # available.
HORRIBLE HORRIBLE AWFUL PLACE! Went there three years ago with my cat and thought they were overpriced and somewhat rude. Changed vets.... Returned Saturday morning with a very, very, very ill cat because they opened early and are close to home. The receptionist (male, sort of punk-rocky looking) first turned us away saying they had no appointments available... (Mind you, my cat was on the floor in a carrier with bad breathing issues and was not stable... NO ONE ASKED EVEN WHERE MY CAT WAS MUCH LESS IF SHE WAS IN STABLE CONDITION.) The RUDE receptionist said he would check with the doctors and see if he could fit us in. He left the reception area and came back about five minutes later. He told me to fill out some paperwork. I thanked him and asked what the doctors said, he replied, "Oh, I haven't had a chance to talk to them yet." (Again... still my cat was on the floor in a carrier with bad breathing issues and was not stable... Again, NO ONE ASKED WHERE MY CAT WAS MUCH LESS IF SHE WAS IN STABLE CONDITION.) I got upset and told the receptionist I was leaving and would never, ever consider bringing my animals (who are like family to me) to this place again. And I won't ever return! While I never thought VCA on Elston was the best place to take my animals for a possible serious issue (more of a shots kind of vet), I was proven wrong and my kitty was stabilized, treated, and sent home within an hour. VCA called me this morning to check on her! Thank goodness for vets like VCA who actually care about animals because CAT HOSPITAL OF CHICAGO SEEMED TO NOT CARE AT ALL ABOUT THE HEALTH OF MY CAT!
Apparently, when they describe a section as non-smoking, they mean that you are not obligated to smoke while sitting there. I smelt so bad after 3 hours I had to hang my coat outside and wash my clothes as soon as I got home.
I can't even get them to answer the phone. I got cut off 3 times this morning after long waits. Not my idea of fast and courteous.
Although very busy, we were seated quickly and served relatively quickly. The waitress was friendly and attentive. Half way through our breakfast, the water from the air conditioning vent began to drip on our table, even onto our food! DISGUSTING!! We told the waitress who got the manager/shift supervisor. He came to our table, every defensive saying it was completely out of his control. He went on and on how it was a new unit and the repair man had been there. I suggested he not sit people under the vent and his response was that he would lose 6-8 tables if he did that. I then asked him if money is more important than food safety, to which he replied yet again "it is completely out of my control". I will NEVER set foot in this establishment again. I may not eat at any IHOP for that matter.
We were really excited about the apartment because for three of us in a two bedroom the price was good and they were brand new. That went downhill quickly unfortunately when the only assigned parking spot we received was uncovered and whoever got left without the spot has to park a block away where people like to break into cars because there is NO open parking anywhere. The flooring in the apartment has warped and bubbled up in a lot of places, the faucets leak at the joints and drip at the end, and the shower head has fallen off multiple times. Being right next to trax is convenient but SO LOUD. The management doesn't care about complaints or concerns, and tend to be unresponsive or rude. There is dog poop all over the place because people have no manners and management doesn't take the time to do anything about it. Cars are constantly being broken into. The pools are tiny, and they close them at ten so anyone with a late shift can't get in and the gym is tiny and useless. The fire alarms go off sometimes for no reason and once the apartment above us had the sprinklers go off inside and drained down to ours. Over all it is obvious to state we are not going to stay here, and i do not recommend living in this complex for the price or the management.
I rented a room for week at time for three months because of work until I look out my window one night to see a man and woman had broke into my truck to have sex there no security of anykind and clerks can't understand english very poor
This person is the reason I fear dentist. The bedside manor is atrocious. He under medicated me before the initial procedure. I am over 250 pounds, small amounts of pain relievers and or sedatives will not work due to my size but yet I still trusted his judgment at this point. I attempted to tell him that I could still feel a large amount of pain and that I do not think the pills given had worked. He then gave me a rude remark and with a scowl on his face. As he injected the Novocain he repeatedly stabbed my palate causing severe pain right before he began the procedure. I am in my 30 and have a high pain tolerance but this is the first time a dentist, purposely or not, had made me cry. I now fear any and all dentist. This man should not be allowed to treat patients this way even if he is the only dentist who works on the weekends.
I have had 2 car stereos installed by them about 5-6 years ago. The first was stolen out of me car a matter of weeks later. This by the way was a 1990 POS, with no indication on the outside that it had 5-700 dollars of stereo equipment in it. I have a hunch that the theft was most likely linked to the guy who installed it at Joo-Dee... Good or bad you can decide based off of that. The second install was all bad no matter how you look at it. First it took the guy about 3 hours to do a simple stereo/amp install, something I could do in less time and I am mechanically illiterate. During the process of finding a ground for the amp, the genius decided it would be a good idea to drill into the top of the gas tank. As if that wasn't enough when he tried to close the hood he forgot that he had left a tool under it. Then he proceeded to slam the hood once onto the tool, it didn't close, so he slammed it 3 or 4 more times before seeing it. This bent the hood so badly that it barely closed, instead of coming out and saying he messed up ( I saw him do all this) he tried to bend it back to true, which never happened. At this point I was a naive 17 year old, so I took it when the offered me to all the work for free (about $70 back then). But it took me hassling them to get even that. Run far away from this place!!
The worst dealer ever! The only thing they care about is your MONEY, they don't respect you as a customer. I went there to buy a corolla ascent and a man with a long beard told me he wouldn't give me a quote unless I promise them to buy the car from them. He told me it was a WASTE of his time to give me a price if I didn't buy the car from them. I hated the way they treated me and bought my car from another dealer.
Well...if you want to get screwed, go to this shop. Loaner vehicle they sent me out in had 3 bald tires (I found out later) of which 1 went flat when I got home 50 miles away. No spare. No jack. They said go to a tire shop and they would pay for handling the situation. After $400 at Walmart for the cheapest 3 new tires they stocked (old ones were dangerous) A-1 refused to pay. I said take off my tires (I brought their old ones back). They wanted to charge me for doing that!! They replaced my AC but didn't install a new drier in the system which is mandatory for warranty on the compressor. They would not accept my certified letter of intent to sue. I decided it wasn't worth my time anyway. Anybody need 3 16" tires I'll never use? Only 100 miles on them. I'd buy a new truck before going back to those idiots.
It should not take 3 people 15 minutes to make 4 sandwiches. Waited an additional 5 minutes like an idiot by the register for someone to actually take my money. I was considering leaving the already made food to eat elsewhere -the wait was that long
This store posted a customer's personal info (name address and phone number) to their Facebook page along with a horrendous message with all kinds of 12 year-old level insults when said customer made a Reddit post about making a $1000 purchase and never getting the items. The store then refused to give a refund unless the Reddit post was deleted. Avoid this place like the plague.
I am a seasoned vapor users, so know what I'm talking about. The unit I was sold is faulty; 2 days after I purchased it, I tried to exchange it but was told it must be my tank. I continue to have issues with it. My friend with me purchased her first unit. She said she only used menthol flavor and was sold a plastic tank. The menthol eats the tank and when she tried to return it, she was told that she shouldn't have gotten a plastic tank, which THEY recommended. She had to purchase another tank and was not offered any recompense. I am unhappy with the store and will not go there again.
I have been a customer at Fitzgerald for 10+ years. For car purchases, service, repairs, bodywork, etc. We had built a relationship of trust. I am sorry to say at my last visit I believe I was cheated and therefore overcharged for break work. With 2% of my pads remaining I was told both my front breaks and routers needed to be replaced. Because I have trusted and received such good service in the past I approved the repair. But with further review with friends in the know there were less expensive options they could have offered. I believe I have been taken advantage of, and for this reason I am giving a 1 star rating.
This does not concern the local store or local employees! I am totally fed up with trying to get the national web site to work. This is the last straw today. Once again tried to get into their website to make an on line purchase and as usual it didn't work! COME ON HHGREGG either get the site fixed and working properly or take the thing down completely! I can't help but wonder if it is just us or is this nationwide? Probably won't get any response but at least they, HHGREGG, know how one potential customer feels. Not even worth a partial star!
Very disatisfied!!! I was a regular customer on a maintenance program. Fire ants were discovered in my 10 month old daughters nursery - on the carpet , in the bathtub, and on her toys. They appeared to be nesting in the walls and this was not long after I had the home exterminated. One of the ants had bitten her on the leg. I called at 8:00 am monday morning and was told they could not get to my home until wednesday evening. I told them it was an emergency but was lectured by their customer service agent about the 48 hour policy. I ended up calling another pest control service- Mike Nelson exterminating who came out the next morning. They found 25 fire ant mounds around my home- even though the bulwark had been out less than a month ago. He took care of the problem right away. Bulwark did not take care of me and my family and I would never use them again.
This Doctor is rude. He charged me for a visit to view test results that were negative. I will never go to this doctor again.
the hostess, alexia, was so rude, i will never go back.
Not an experience; just a note to all who travel there. I am a former manager who quit after working 20 years for the owner. the owner for years has been putting burgundy wine in premium wine bottles and defrauding customers. As for the "self serve" chinati-blend wine located at the front, the owner since he opened had been putting Inglenook Burgundy in that and laughed while he put just a drop of chianti wine in it stating that now it was a blend. I have notified the owner that I filed a report with the ABC so he may have changed his tactics out of self preservation but not because he felt guilty doing it. My hope is that an attorney files a class action suit against the owner and subpoena's his wine records per sales and ordering to identify that they just don't match up. The food is not bad, actually pretty good. the workers are good as well, perhaps that is because the majority are undocumented and have to be good to have a job. The ambiance; the owner never schedules a cleaning party nor does he ever really pay to have it cleaned as tons of grease settles on the wood and you can scrape the gunk off with a finger nail; and the outside has needed a paint job for over a decade. All of this is a shame and in my opinion the owner does not deserve to own a restaurant as he is only worried about being greedy as evident by the hiring of undocumented workers so he does not have to give out pay raises, will not maintain the upkeep of his restaurant, and defrauds customers on wine sales. This place had promise but with all the other quality Italian restaurants in Poway, his is at the bottom. As all of this is true, at least as of June 2013, I am not afraid to reveal my name with this post because as it is all true as of June 2013, his legal staff, who has threatened me with a vexatious litigation suit for complaining, may attempt to file a law suit against me but that would only reveal the truth per the owner's own records of what the owner does so I doubt that will ever happen.
None
I am so disappointed in this company. I signed a contract with them to service my A/C and heating. I paid them extra for a contract that according to them I would not have to pay for a call out. My A/C went out on Saturday, I called them repeated times, left a message of dyer concern. I had to go with another company and pay for the call out. They did eventually call me back the following Monday. I ended up having to go with another company AV Heating and Cooling. Which was a god send. The question is will Polcock refund me the money I have already paid them since they will not be servicing any of my equipment again. Their service contract is no good they do not do what they promise to do.
I am in a semi and can't get around easy. I am delivering a load at a company and it is going to take three hours. So I asked them to deliver because they are the closest chinese delivery. The said no because a 3.8 miles is to far. Amazing customer service. karma my friends.
credit card over charges . make sure check the bill and your bank card statements . It happened more than once .
AVOID AVOID AVOID!!!!! Took in a car with 14,000 mi for a simple alignment. Very minor adjustment needed, Quoted 89.95. That is about $10 dollars too high, as if you do your research Sears and Mitch's Firestone are Cheaper. 1 hour later I went in to pay and take the car home. Once home I check the receipt and find a $9 shop fee no none mentioned....I am pretty upset and call questioning this 9 dollar fee. Well I was yelled at and told that there was fine print that I should have read, bullshit you tell me in the original quote there's 9 dollars added. So they offered a 9 dollar refund. Shady business practices are the only thing in this Kingdom, not to mention a mouthy scrub dressed as a car service person. Kiddos save your money and GO ELSEWHERE. SHYSTERS! see the definition of shyster: A shyster /ˈʃaɪstər/ is a slang word for someone who acts in a disreputable, unethical, or unscrupulous way, especially in the practice of law, politics or business.
They let the good manager go and it's been down hill ever since at least he was clean and the food was hot
Slowwwwwww! Waited over an hour for a club sandwich and they were not busy at all.... Once I did get my food it was average.
I really don't understand why people give them so high rating here. But my most recent experience was terrible. The guy was so rude and just tried to finish his job as soon as possible and move on to the next one to make more money. After he has gone, the carpet was still not cleaned properly.They are cheap for reason.
There is no Home Depot at this address; it is at 1220 Renaissance Blvd NE, not 1220 S. Renaissance Blvd NE. Someone got confused.
Выглядит как склад из нутри, цены на строй материалы много выше чем на рынке. Находиться у черта на рогах
I could not believe when I ordered a Lemon Drop Martini with my dinner, salt instead of sugar was put around the glass rim. Although I should have i did not say anything I ordered a second one and was again brought one with salt around the rim,I had taken my nephew out to dinner, He wanted Mexican food. Along with the bad drinks he said his rice tasted as if it had soy sauce on it. The waitress explained the sugar and salt bowls had been mixed up..... I was disappointed with the whole experience and would not recocmmend it to anyone,
These guys are crooks, pure and simple. Bought a "Rust free" ford excursion from them. Looked it over during a snow storm, and towed it back to Georgia. The next day I get underneath the truck and 1 hour later and 2 five gallon buckets of rust flakes later I get out from under it. What these crooks did wasrubber sprayed over the rust, then painted over the spray. Then it blew a power steering line, again, from rust, then blew the brake lines...that was after all four calipers siezed on it. In the last 2 years, I put 500 miles on it. Avoid them. When I got the truck the owner was talking about how he was doing burnouts in a 6.0 powerstroke, then it was leaking coolant and blew the turbo. He cleaned it up and put it out front to be sold. Please, save your money and go somewhere else. As for the excursion, I bought another one to transfer the drivetrain over to.
They advertised a car with 35 miles and said it was new. It had 500 miles when we went to look and they told me it was just test drives. I repeatedly asked if it had been registered before and was told No, that would be illegal to sell it as new if it was preregistered. I bought it and guess what, yep its used. 4 months later I still do not have the title and at first I got excuses, now nothing. They think I am going away. Big mistake there.
After calling twice to get a checkup on a leaking air conditioner, my husband received a call from Michelle at the end of the day and told my husband "sir, I have 50 of you I need to call back" so he said, "I guess you don't need my business??" and she hung up on him. Customer service is less than desireable.
Completely disappointed with my lunch TWICE now! I went in earlier this week, ordered soup to go, got back to my office and it was the wrong soup! So, I went back to redeem a free cup of the correct soup today. I was extra hungry so I ordered the "Old Goat" Grilled Cheese. The sandwich wasn't even grilled! The cheese wasn't melted, and the bread was soggy and not toasted. Not to mention, my "sweet potato black bean soup had 2 cubes of sweet potato in the entire cup. I want my $4.25 back for the "not-grilled" cheese. Argh.
If you like high pressured, low life, deceptive sales practice your are in the right place. Corals Springs Auto mall is king of the "Bait and Switch" low life sales tactics. I had the dis-pleasure of accompanying a friend of mine to see a used car at the Kia division. I met with Gary Chin-Sang whom first tried to not give us his last name undermining my intelligence saying its too hard to pronounce. He gave us to a sales guy who took us for a test drive. The drive was fine, we cam back and the pressure began. From one sales men to the next "You must by now" we can not hold it while you think about it. We just asked for a minute to confer with each other, but they would not let up. We asked Gary i he could hold the car for 4 hours while we go home or the tag he said no. Someone was their to purchase the car if we do not take it now it was sold. I told him we sould leave a deposit, Gary said that is not allowed. I asked why was was the customer service so terrible, his reply was that he owes the other person buying the car good customer service too. Before I could catch my breath after his appalling comment, yet another sales men walks by and said it sold. We had our limit and walked out. ************* PLEASE DO YOURSELF A FAVOR AND RUN AS FAST AS YOU CAN ****************
I ordered a ribeye and received a hunk of tough meat laced with way to much fat. I had to chase down the waitress more than once, for a drink and my check. Frankly, I shouldn't have paid over $20 for food I couldn't eat and service I had to chase down. I would NOT recommend this place "until" proper training of staff is provided and they focus on food quality and customer service.
Save yourself a lot of trouble and go somewhere else. They took 1.5 hours to activate my plan and never explained why. They also decided not to tell me about added charges and features which resulted in several follow up calls in the first month. The final straw that led to writing this review is that the ability to make a long distance call requires an additional activation, and credit check. Had I known this in advance, I would have been able to follow their procedures, but now I'm left with hours before I leave the country and not able to use my phone while away.
This place was a huge waist of my time, they cut my nail to the point of them bleeding! They also didn't give me and my sister the correct amount of change and refused to give us the correct amount!
I have refrained from rating this newly renovated facility in Clearwater until I attended several events. But it is what it is. Granted the old theater was beyond worn out and as seedy on the inside as it was on the outside. Well now it is new, bright, and shiny. That's where it stops. They have packed way too much in way too little of space. From the moment you gain access to the inadequate lobby, to the pouring out of the exit after the show you will experience, narrow isles to the restrooms, a stage that is at least 2 feet too low, and sardine like seats that are both way too skinny and with legroom fit for Airtran. The slope of the floor is inadequate and the seats are not offset so if you are unlucky enough to sit behind a 6 footer, you will not see what you bought a ticket to see. The box seats are just plain old silly and the decor is discontinued K-Mart. I have three more shows for which I have purchased tickets. I will go for the same reason I attended show in the pre-renovation era. The consumer public deserved better. What a wasted opportunity.
sh*tty customer service, Bad food!! over cooked and taste like shyt! I'll start to drive to cannon rd to get some jack n the box from now on! If I even want some jack n the box!
Broadway Cab drivers 'hang-out' in local NE neighborhood, meeting other cabbies and friends to play pool and hang-out all day - taking up valuable customer parking of other local businesses. They frequent a store/pool hall/coffee shop location meeting their friends, playing pool - yet they frequently the store and coffee shop...but never seen them purchase anything from store nor do they seem to purchase coffee while they visit the coffee shop location. This happens daily!!!
Get sick
Der service ist eine katastrophe!
None
Poor service, food was disappointing.
What a pack of overpaid parasites. They steal from those who need legal aid to give to their lawyer mates. It's the same old club mentality - taking public money for the parasites.
I recently had the opportunity to stay at the Avenue Plaza resort in the beautiful Garden District of New Orleans for Halloween from 10/28/2013 to 11/04/2013 in room 1018. While the grounds, resort, rooms, and bell staff were all lovely, well-kept and/or well mannered, the desk staff was somewhat standoffish and seemed to almost not be willing to be bothered. I thought that was fine, and enjoyed my stay; however, once I got home, I checked my credit card to find that I was charged $600. I couldn't imagine what that charge was for, so I called up the hotel. They told me that the $600 was to replace a damaged TV. I couldn't understand what that could have meant, because the TV was in perfect working order when my guest and I checked out. We even watched TV the morning of check-out, and the TV was in the same order that we had found it when we checked-in. When we checked-out, we had left a few bottles on the kitchen counter, and some professional, water-soluble Krylon face paint had gotten on the sheets from when we went to bed after Halloween; but otherwise, the room was left in good condition. Since the face make-up consistently came out of all my clothes (even white dress shirts) in a single wash, I did not think this would cause any issue. Once I found that the charge was for TV damage, I asked to talk to the manager, as we are certain we did not cause any damage. Then the manager told me something baffling. He said that the room appeared to have sustained damage in an apparent physical altercation that left blood stains on the sheets. As part of that supposed altercation, the TV was rendered unusable. He claimed that we had possibly taken a razor blade to the screen! I told him that there was no altercation. The red was water-soluble Halloween make-up that washes out; but, he maintained that they had to replace the TV. I can't help but think that he took an opportunity of what looked like an altercation to claim damages. But, my guest and I can attest that we had no altercation. I even have pictures of the professional water-based make-up that I had in the room. Unfortunately, I do not know what recourse I have since it is a case of the hotel manager's word against mine. At this point, I am making a claim to the Better Business Bureau, writing a review on Yelp and Google, and writing an email to the CEO, as I do not know the best way to address this. If you do stay at this hotel, take pictures of the room as you leave, because the hotel staff is certainly not honest enough to be trusted with your credit card number.
The staff was rude and quick to move on to the next customer. On top of that they did a terrible job and did not quite care that I nicely explained to the manager how bad of a job the nail tech did. I know being Vietnamese might come with a language barrier, but I am also foreign and I make up no excuses to satisfy my customers, I AM NEVER COMING BACK!! YOU SHOULD NOT EVEN RISK IT!!
Electrical outlets sparked when I plugged anything in. Fridge had a cord stretched around a corner to an outlet that wobbled and sparked. In order to use the coffee maker you have to take it off the counter, put it on the floor and plug it into a wall outlet. Toilet is in a very nice sized bathroom, but placed right up against the wall and underneath the toilet paper dispenser. Bathroom and closet doors constantly bang into each other so you can only have one open at a time. The elevator elicited giggles and outright laughs by everyone I saw using it, as it is by far the slowest I've ever seen. The room service brochure says 18% gratuity for parties of 6 or more, but it's actually for all room service. If I could give negative stars, I would.
I had planed on a dinner with my family at the buffet this evening. with The website advertizes crab legs on Sundays. When I called to ask a question on how young children have to be to get their dinner half price they told me 11 years old, why isn't this stated on their website. When I confirmed about them selling crab legs on Sundays, they told me they don't. In my eyes this is false advertizing. So now I have been sitting here on hold for the last 10 min making me late for 12:00 mass. Their also advertising cold crab legs on Saturday is this another misrepresented statement as well what is true on this website. Who is maintaining this website and who are they getting their direction from. Maybe Dover Downs Hotel and Casino might want to look into hiring better commentate people in their communications department so this never happens again. With the bad economy businesses should be more careful on how they handle everyday operations and pay better attention to the small details, like menus on their websites. I have now been on hold for the last 25 min waiting on a supervisor. It just goes to show you how some people really care. I'm wondering now if the women who answered the phone is in fact really even getting some one to talk to me regarding this issue. This is why people are wondering why this state is spiraling out of control. Its all the incompatible people who don't want to work. I now cant go to church because i have been on hold since 11:50 am its now been 35 min and I'm still holding. Unreal !! After I spread this blog through social media maybe then they will start caring.
Horrible experience - don't take your car here!!!!! Took my 2004 Nissan Pathfinder in (which is in great shape - has been garaged every day and night of it's existence) for a full detailing - spent $130...and now the car is worse than it was! Scratches and nicks that weren't there before, wet floor mats wadded up in the back, numerous areas that I had to wipe down (spent over 2 hours wiping the car down after I got it home). I'm not even certain that they actually waxed it (paint finish didn't have that "glassy smooth" feeling that it normally has after a wax...felt no smoother than when I brought it in...was waxed there about a year ago). Sadly, I am now going to have to take it somewhere else and spend another $100+ to undo the damage they did!
WORST PLACE EVER IN UNIVERSAL CITY TX. My family and I lived there for 12months, they told us when we moved in that the sure deposit as well as the MONTLY pet insurance would be for any damanges.Now that we have moved they want us to pay them 1200 dollars. DONT GO THERE IF YOU HAVE PETS. After moving out, they also called me and asked if I had a washer and dryer, but it was my own washer and dryer. Then they tried telling us after living there 11 months we couldnt have a grill on our patio, it took them 11 months to do the inspections to notice that we had one. There is a high turnover and the organization is terrible. Best adivce to give to those looking for a place to live would be to NOT go to them.
My husband and I had a great experience when we were preparing to purchase our 2012 Hyundai Sonata in November 2013. We flew in from out of state, signed the papework and all was well. We were promised 2 items/parts that were not ready when we finished up the paperwork and were told that they would arrive at our home within approximately a week. We are now at the end of February 2014 and we have yet to receive the items and yet to receive tracking information. We are quite frustrated with the customer service we've received after our purchase. This is in addition to trying to iron out some other issues that surfaced with trying register our car in our state. It was a headache getting what we needed from this dealership!. Seems as though you need to have EVERYTHING ironed out before you sign any paperwork with these people. They are eager to get your business and make a sale but could care less about your needs once they've made a sale. I would say buy at your own risk....
This company is horrible. Their bills are extremely complicated. They do not let you know what exactly is in your plan and then up-charge. They are horrible!
The Pharmacy is terrible. I called in a prescription at noon and requested to have it filled by 6 pm. I came in at 7 pm and they advised me the prescription had not been filled and I would need to wait another 20 minutes. Utter incompetence.
DO NOT RENT HERE! I rented a 1 bedroom apt, and the rate that they were charging me (I later found out since I was new to the area) was almost criminal. There is nothing "luxury" about the complex or the apartments themselves. Everything in the apartment is standard and can be found at any complex for almost half the price. TERRIBLE CUSTOMER SERVICE. I asked to speak to a manager, and the representative refused to get them for me, and told me I would just have to "swallow" what she had told me. I cannot imagine speaking to a customer the way I was spoken to. For what they charge, there should be at least willing and helpful employees. Please do not waste your time and money here.
Absolutely Terrible. I've had them for 13 years; $60a month for 1 Down and 0.50 Up is the maximum speed you will receive. Customer service is nonexistent.
I had large gold ring that i wanted to sell and a sapphire cocktail ring that I would consider selling as well as a diamond solitaire that I already had a certified appraisal on. He low balled me on the gold ring saying that its 22K stamp was a forgery. It was confirmed by a bullion dealer that it was indeed 22K as stamped. On the cocktail ring he offered 20% LESS than a pawnbroker. Pawn brokers try to get about .10 on the dollar. But the kicker was the solitaire. I took this along not to sell it but to use it as baseline reference. First he asked if i had it certified. I said "no" An AGS certified round brilliant cut, 3 carat, f-g color, VVS1 with two nicely cut .15ct diamonds either side. It's a nicely designed platinum setting. He felt he could get $9000. The 1990 appraised value was $55,000. Today, the current Wholesale price on the main diamond alone is between $65,000 and $80,000. Even accounting for the difference in Market price vs appraised price, this was an extraordinary low ball. If you look through their web site you see that they claim to be "Certified Gemologists" but they don't list their credentials. Usually if a company is AGS they are pretty proud of it. So I guess they price about the same as your pawnbroker. Is that a rip-off?
None
Probably the worst Post Office I've ever been to, makes me sad that all my bigger mail/packages goes to them. Never had an issue picking up a package on the day it was delivered (even though it says the package will be ready the following day, usually post offices will do this unless there is a reason why they can't). Went to pick up a TV, and the post office is part of a 7-11, and since the post office portion is small the mail often spills out into part of the 7-11. I can see my TV on the 7-11 floor, but they won't let me pick it up saying 'oh, if there wasn't a line of people, they would just process it and give me my TV' but instead they told me to 'come back later today and maybe we can do it'. I came back later, they still hadn't processed it, but they agreed to give it to me....taking far less time to just get me the TV than it took to tell me I couldn't have it previously. Seriously? I'm all for following the rules, but they blindly followed it for no reason, keeping my TV out in the middle of a 7-11. Its a weird feeling to be in a post office to pick up a package of MINE, be so close to MY TV that I can literally touch it, and NOT BE ABLE TO PICK UP MY MAIL just for the sake of it, being that, apparently, it doesn't take ANY EXTRA TIME to pick it up now, rather than later.
Amanda Reid and Liat Colantonio were the two most unprofessional people I've ever met. Not only did Amanda say she hated her job while at the viewing. I had to check in 2 times to see what was going on with my application. Only to learn that my application was denied. I was blatantly ignored asking for a reason on why the application was denied. And the two didn't even seem to care about a possible tenant. I've just never felt so disregarded as a human being. Beautiful building and room, just awful management. DO NOT RENT HERE
Sure, the view is scenic... but that's all that's really good to say about this place. I received some of the worst service I've ever experienced at any restaurant. The fish I was served was still frozen in the middle. Seriously? You're located a stone's throw from the Atlantic Ocean and you can't sell fresh seafood? The staff doesn't seem like they want to even be there and our waitress literally complained in front of us when our party asked for separate checks. So this establishment is basically fast-food quality and service demanding a gourmet price. I do NOT recommend eating here!
I pulled up on friday Jan 3rd a230 pm. I was immediately engaged (attacked) by Brian. I mentioned that I was starting to look at cars, and would like to buy one within the next 2-3 months. When asked which car I was interested, I told him....the corvette stingray. His first words to me were: "What, you want to buy one?" (as he looked me up and down). seriously? --no i was there to steal one-- anyways there was one in the show room which he claimed he could not open because it was "sold" then I asked to see another one...he stated that they were all sold. I asked why were they listed on the website if they were not in fact available. He then told me me that they sell quick. I did mention that I was in awe of their ability to sell 6 cars priced over 65K in 5 business hours as I had checked the stock at 11pm the night before and he simply shrugged. I then asked about the national corvette museum delivery program to which he stated did not exist (fyi it does....just google it) any how, then a manger (leonard) came by and showed me a corvette but stressed I can't sit in it because it was sold....(i guess i am too dirty). at the end as i left dejected that i had wasted 45 minuted of my life i saw another car i was interested in ( a 45th anniversary camaro) and asked brian the price....he told me he would text me, (never did) i am not sure what they didn't like about me...my clothes, my car, my questions, or my race...but i went to courtesy the next day and was treated with respect. I can't recommend Van Chevrolet.
$7 for a bean and cheese burrito is what people are raving about. The cheese doesn't even melt with those warm beans. This place is a joke . One last thing, to be considered Mexican food, one must employ at least 1 Hispanic person.
$6 per box drop-off fee for the privilege of darkening their door. Do not waste your money.
Делал анализ крови на холестерин - сделали не те показатели хотя заранее все обговаривал пришел получать справку в бассейн - говорят надо анализ на сифилис сдавать, на СПИД, мазок на энтеробиоз, мазок на микрофлору на предмет венерических заболеваний - итого почти 1400 рублей - позвонил в бассейн - говорят самодеятельность администраторы вечно ничего не знают - по телефону договариваешься об одном - приезжаешь всегда все другое По справке в бассейн - откровенно обманывают. Я туда больше ни ногой. Страшно подумать что они могут "насоветать" ради своей прибыли если только по справке в бассейн они вместо 300 рублей хотят 1400. Всем удачи.
It was nastiest pizza I have ever had. The service was terrible. After ordering and waiting half an hour I asked about my order. They had forgotten to put it in. After waiting another half hour we finally got our pizzas. when we got home and started eating we realized how bad it was. The crust tasted sour. The sauce tasted like Campbell's tomato soup. The cheese tasted like the sole of a tennis shoe. We just threw it away and went to Denny's. Save your money go to anyplace else. Even Totino's frozen pizza is better than pronto pizza.
Rates and payments too high, rude service also
Greedy people! I won't go back. This store has a place in the front where they stack their empty boxes. They charge $1.00 apiece for something they got for free in their shipments. They lost my other business also. I used to go in here all the time.
None
Russell, you are an idiot... The bible has punishments for mixing textiles, and touching the skin of a dead animal... At LEAST read the Bible before you go and spew hate. Read: Leviticus, and NOT just the self serving parts that adhere to your narrow, pig-ignorant low brow, inbred translation. You are what is wrong with Christianity, Jesus would actually hate you (he hated 2 things $$ changers and RELIGIOUS HYPOCRITES...) You fit into the second category.
This theater SUCKS & it is too small & make it a dine n bcs we are a lot of humans & need diversity! The employees there are horrible. Also for the price you pay to get in is revolting, then they also charge you for glasses that you have to return! Shame on them! U should have unlimited refills on all types of drinks & popcorn!!!!!!!!!
Horrible food and service at an inflated price. This is word for word what I wrote the manager who said he wanted to hear about my experience and then didn't reply when I said I was busy at work and couldn't call them but could email a response to whatever they wanted. My fiance an I were seated by the hostess and given menu's. We stat there for 15 or more minutes before a random waitress had noticed that we hadn't been helped. She was very polite but we had already been sitting there for a long time without even a glass of water. I watched as people who had arrive after us were getting drinks and one couple with a kid I noticed even received their meal. We were finally helped by a very polite waitress who's name I don't remember because my stomach was telling me that it was tired of waiting for food. A short while afterward the manager came over to apologize to us and offer complementary desserts. But it's kind of hard to listen to a guy offering deserts when you still haven't received your intended order. He excused himself and said he would come back to check on us. The food arrived and the waitress checked on us a few more times. I had the Mo's Ruben and my fiance had a grilled vegetable sandwich. She said hers tasted ok but the ruben lacked the taste of a ruben. It was a clump of meat with the thinnest sprinkling of sour kraut and an even thinner amount of thousand island dressing lumped together in a small sandwich which left me unsatisfied. Shortly after a large cookie with a scoop of ice cream appeared. This was the only delicious memorable item during the visit. After we finished dessert we waited for the bill to come and the manager to come back to check on us and all we got was the bill. We paid and left. Unlike other food establishments nobody said bye or held the door. And now I'm at home listening to my fiance re-experiencing her dinner in reverse. It's not a happy sound.
Terrible workmanship. I don't recommend this group. BE AWARE!!!! I'm pretty sure they write their own reviews!!
OK. Lets just call it what it is. It's a motel; and a pretty shabby one, at that. There were so many things wrong, I don't know where to start. I am a travel nurse, and I'm usually placed in hotels or extended stays for 8 - 13 weeks. That's big bucks. I'm not pushy, but for that amount of $$$, cater to my A@#. Here's what annoyed me - Big Time. There was no WiFi. Sure it's advertised that WiFi is available, but you can never get on line. I had to constantly click back and forth between connections, hoping that one would last longer than a few seconds. The laundry room is only open between 10AM to 9PM. Need to wash clothes at 9:05PM? You're out of luck. What am I going to do? Steal the washing machine? If you advertise that you have a laundry room 'on site', it should be available to the customer 24/7! I could not receive mail. When I asked if they would hold mail at the desk, the 'manager' wanted to know 'how much mail?' I don't know; what am I? Omnipotent? Sigh. There were cobwebs so thick on the balcony, I feared meeting the spider that produced them. Needless to say - I did not sit on the balcony, enjoying the outdoors, over a glass of wine. There weren't any pots or pans; nor was there a plate, fork, napkin...Oh wait, there was a tea kettle, that looked like it was found in the attic of someone's great grandmother. If you're going to accept long term clients, you have to offer the basic things necessary to make their stay 'livable.' The bottoms of the draperies in my room looked as if they'd been dragged in mud. The blanket on my bed could best be described as 'ragged'. The pillows? As thin as communion wafers - and that was with three of them stacked together! I endured this 'shabbiness' for 2 weeks, because I could walk to work, and they kept saying: 'We're working on the WiFi.' Well, it was never fixed. I moved to the Oxford Suites Pismo Beach. Let them have the $$$. They provide a HOT breakfast, reliable WIFi, a business center, exercise room, and plump pillows! My final opinion? Eeewww! You decide.
ANSWER THE PHONE ??????
Went to pick a vehicle in service and they refused to take a check. We are a business that has done business there before with no issues. Very unprofessional.
ordered on line 5:30 called at 7:00 rude bitch answers tells me 1 more hour. You need to post delivery times
Kindly bring to notice, Address change and the logo. pls do the needful
The last time i went to this place, the ASSISTANTS told me to come back some other day because the dr. that was in that day was being "very rude" to all the patients so they were telling everyone in the lobby that it would be better if we rescheduled.
It's not in the right location you have to go down further
always liked this place but management could care less about customer service _ on principle of earning my business I will go elsewhere, hope others who feel the same vote by spending their money at the competition, too bad hope they turn something around
The most horrible car service experience. gave a quote when we booked and then didn't honor it. asked for $25 more once we were in the car or threatened to not take us. the staff is rude and unprofessional, especially the manager. no idea what customer service is. AVOID them at all costs.
Terrible customer service!! I called for 2 week trying to make reservations for an event and I was either told to call back in 30 minutes due to the reservation book not being there or that I would get a call back, that never happened. The guy on the phone was very rude and kept telling me I was mistaken on my facts. I asked to talk to his supervisor, he then told me the supervisor is his sister and told me the conversation was over and then up on me!
Do not get sucked into their time share. It is a rip off. They promised me all kinds of things and prices which was all a lie after I signed on the dotted line so I am stopping payments immediately and will take my down payment loss as a learning lesson but they ought to be sued! The actual facilities are nice but do not believe any thing they tell you when they try to sell it to you.
this place is a joke, i have been in this hospital for contractions and they know i live far out in the country and they send me home anyways i dont recomend this hospital to anyone its a freaking joke as a say again..
None
NEEDS updating! Pillows were extremely flat, sheets were rough, had to step into the bathroom to open the door to get out of the room!!
complete garbage. I spent over $1100 on furniture and paid the $150 delivery fee. 3rd party delivery company sends two thugs to my home, who do not take off their shoes in a brand new home, put huge marks on my wall going upstairs, and then refuse to remove all boxes and packaging like the delivery agreement states. They say there is no room on the truck for boxes... hmmm, you just removed two boxes, put two empty ones back. Called store and complained and after getting irate, they are sending someone to pick up the boxes. Absolute garbage. Will never recommend them to anyone.
BAD Always a long line. They don't answer the phone. If you come 15 minutes before closing you have an 85% chance they won't take your mail. God forbid your package has any tape or stickers on it... Never any supplies GOOD Verona is actually wonderful. The rest of the staff couldn't be lazier.
None
The Brea Outback consistently has the worst service I've ever personally encountered. Twice now, we have had to walk out after not being so much as greeted for twenty-plus minutes. There won't be a third time. When you can get service, the food is generally awful -- wilted salad greens, overcooked meat, dropped on the table hard enough to splash the customers with grease. Avoid disappointment, avoid Outback.
Not sure how ANYONE could leave this place a nice review. Google should invent a negative Star rating for place like this. STAY AWAY! Sometimes you think that "maybe it's just me" or "the waiter was having a bad day"...NOT HERE...I could hear the other waiters giving their tables attitude as well. The only thing this place has going for it is the view...period. JUST KEEP WALKING!!!
Terrible customer service. Waitress very unprofessional and with really bad manners!!!
Super unprofessional and rude. I took a trip out to OZ to take a look for a project bike I was building and found that the prices were a bit high, there was very little help and the place was disorganized. They wouldn't even let me out in the yard to browse for bike parts. While I was there the owner kicked a guy out of the store and told him to never come back just because the guy asked for a discount on the parts he was buying. I also witnessed him selling a guy a scala bluethooth for something like $400. I the customer said he just wanted the ability to answer the phone but the owner of the store insisted that he needed the model that lets you communicate between bikes because it was a good feature and that he would want it in the future. The customer was apparently a long time customer as he came to pick up his bike that was being fixed and the owner knew him by name. It's one thing to rip off one time customers, it's another to rip off your loyal repeat customers. Shame on you Oz Powersports. That should have been enough for me to never buy from there but I needed a fairing stay for a 04 Yamaha R6 and I didn't have time to get one from the internet so I thought I would give them another chance. He wanted $140.00 and the going price on Ebay is between $50.00 and $60.00. When I asked him if he could do any better he went on a rant and told a story how he got parts from ebay, there was no warranty and how he had to make money. Before I could say anything he hung up on me. I was actually willing to pay the 3x markup for the part so I could make the next track day but not after being hung up on. I would rather not ride then to ever do business with this guy. Beware!!!!!
I had never been to a Hard Rock Cafe and based on this experience, I will never go to another. The highlight of my day had to be finding a insect in the mac & cheese I ordered for my daughter. Besides that, the food was not very good anyway and it definitely wasn't worth the money. The waiter was very nice and gave us good service, but I will never eat at Hard Rock again!
very unprofessional in dealing with an administrative error on their end, they charged me three nights, although I stayed two. was hung up on by staff when I tried to have it resolved, twice, was dealt with in a rude, condescending manner; had to threaten legal action ( I am a lawyer) before it was resolved, and not in a timely manner, they told me three to five business days. took 10 I will never use this establishment again and it would be highly doubtful I would stay at another Hampton Inns anywhere else.
The large lady behind the counter tried to charge me $90 to ship a handgun, a service tgat ups provided for only 20. She was completely unfriendly and sat there and chewing her gum and smacked her lips as if she didn't care about my situation. Go to ups its right across the street!
Einer der fürchterlichsten Flughäfen. Unübersichtlich, dreckig, keine Restaurants oder Bars am Gate, wo man nach dem einchecken mal etwas essen oder trinken könnte. Es sei jedem angeraten über Zürich zu gehen, wenn er von der Schweiz oder hier her fliegen will.
it is really hard to understand why if a package is already taken to long to get to you why the post office is so uncooperative with it customers. I am already upset that it came through the regulate mail when it was supposed come 2 day mail. then you have to deal with those people who just don't seem to understand you all, or really just don't care. i truly believe it's the later. I'm just so upset with all the things about this shipment. but through it all Redford post office seems to be the worst that i have encounter by far. the rest seem to be trying to get me to the package. Redford is just open your business if you want your package.Never mind its only 8 days late already and that you have other things planned . and you don't normally take time away from work. But the first time you do that cannot work with you anyway. HOW SAD IT IS THAT THEY HAVE NO COMPASSION!!!!!!! FOR PEOPLE!!!!!!!!.
Way overrated. The food we had was overcooked and oily. I've stopped going.
Not happy! If It wasn't midnight I would've found another hotel to stay in. There were roaches in 2 out of 3 rooms that I went in. Needless to say. I'll never stay here again.
Rude employees
We took our Ridgeback and our Boxer here. We stayed in touch the whole week and heard nothing but the dogs were doing well and there are no issues. I brought cash to pay the bill when picking up the dogs and I brought the exact amount. When I got there she told me the boxer was playing with her and nicked her with a tooth so I had to pay a $25 fee. With the new fee I didn't have enough cash. I tried to make arrangemnts but she would only keep the dogs another day or I could get cash, she would not release my dogs. When I asked her to stay a little late so I could go get cash she refused and offered to keep my dogs another day. I had all the agreed on cash and she wouldn't release my dogs. I was lucky enough to get to an atm and back in time. I told her what I thought about this extortion and she then said I was lucky she didn't call the cops and have my dogs taken and put in isolation. My fiancce called and then she threatened to sue us for what changed from a nick with a tooth to now our dog attacked her, when of course we heard nothing of this the whole week calling every day. Boxers are very hyper and jump alot, when the dog was jumping she said she would walk in the corner and turn her back, that is silly, especially if you later want to say you are attacked, why would you put yourself in a corner with your back to a dog you are "fearful" of? Just beware, if you ever have a problem she will change her story to fit her version of the truth.
The girl at number plate registry was so rude and she was giving time to sort papers and was mad on me and my dad ...it was pretty rude never going back there...
This company installed a new display on our Galaxy S4, 1 day later the display quit working. They are claiming it was damaged by us and is not covered under warranty. They DO NOT STAND BEHIND THEIR WORK!!!!! There is 0% chance the damage was from us, we put the phone in an otter box case immediately. Do not use this company!!!
1. The crown he put on was such a poor fit that I could not floss; and, within 3 months, a root infection occurred under this crown. 2. Likewise, a molar that he filled got infected and had to be pulled. 3. My orthodontal surgeon asked me to get this dentist's x-rays. Instead of giving me the x-rays, he took the x-rays again and charged me.
This place fucken sucks. We ordered 2 hrs ago and they still aint here wtf
Very bad Mother's day experience. Wife ordered the special, steak was not their typical cut (much smaller), and was freezer burned. Tasted sour, and was supper fatty. Brought it to their attention, they made another steak, this one was cooked correctly, but still freezer burned. On top of that we waited 45 minutes for them to box or food and a check. Their answer for this was to offer us a desert we didnt want. On top of that the steak and scallops special was ober $27, with definitely lower quality meat.... Thanks for the mother's day memories.
While driving our RV to Tucson from Phoenix, we stopped in at the Ostrich Ranch. My wife the photographer wanted to get some shots of the Ostrich especially but we had no idea there were deer, goats or mules there too. We noticed that the Ostrich were literally fighting over the food. For awhile, it was fun to feed them and I put more attention on letting them all get as equal a share as I could. Then we noticed the sores on their necks. Poor guys. We moved over to the deer feeding area. That was kinda fun too, until we noticed their hooves all curled up and WAY too long for them. This was not normal and we began to feel a little sick. Fun turned to wanting to spend the rest of our day making sure they could all get enough to eat. A well fed animal isn't going to overpower another one in order to get a few nibbles, but these guys were. Goats sticking their heads through little holes in the wall wasn't enough. They put their legs through too and in some cases there were two heads poking their way through. Whatever they could do to get some food. Compared to another place I'd been to in Canada a few months earlier, these animals simply were not happy. The only reason I'd recommend going there is to make sure the animals get some food. It's only purpose that I can see for the passer by is to feed them, so buy twice as much and spread the food around as best you can. There is another review here titled "Distasteful" and my wife and I agree with their assessment
مناقيش الزعتر ما الها دخل بالزعتر الزعتر عبالرة عن نجارة خشب
Excited about giving Main Street Yoga a try after receiving a gift card. I could not wait until my sessions ended!! I've taken many yoga classes in the past and love the positive and relaxing atmosphere. This is anything but that, instructor barking out orders, points you out in class is doing a pose wrong. Military style yoga!!
$2000 bill for a pain injection, and the dirtiest ER I have ever seen.
Worst La nop in jax. They give smaller portions of everything than the others. I love the chile relleno it's just a stuffed bell pepper (meat cheese and a slice of pepper) from here it's just cheese and pepper. Chips are always stail. How do you spell boycot?
Went there for lunch to watch a basketball game with my fiancee, but left after 15 minutes because no one from the wait staff even bothered to take out drink orders.
None
I wish there were zero stars. Worst, slowest, rudest dining experience ever, but also the last time I would eat out with my grandmother who passed away shortly after. I think about this place and it makes me angry.
None
If it was possible to give 0 stars I would. This is supposed to be a family friendly establishment, yet my sister was asked to keep her 11 month old son quiet while she had lunch there. My sister left very upset, shaking and in tears. This is definitely not somewhere I would recommend if you plan to take children. Disgusting treatment of a Mum and her son.
None
iNCREDIBLE alright... downright incredibly bad service. I've never seen anything like it in my life! 5 teenage employees all standing around in a circle chatting it up. Dead fish before you even get them home home. Found out the next day My daughters teacher bought fish there the same day...guess what....dead in a few hours too. Try to return a dead fish? They have to get approval from "the dead fish dept?...lol we go to the place near Sarno and Apollo now. Very good service. If you want dead fish, get them bigger at the supermarket.
This is not the Office per se, more the mail carrier. He CONSTANTLY (I mean every single day) delivers the wrong mail to our address and the only thing that the wrong address and my address have in common are the first four numbers. Everything else is not even close! Also, our dog barked at him outside, so we immediately put her in the house. Then he started BANGING on our front door and yelled at us to put our dog up or he would shoot it. Even after we told him she was already inside, he insisted we were lying. UGH!!!! I have about had it with this moron and the postal service in general!!! Anyone know who exactly I can contact about this man?
First off, the hostess was terrible. The decorated interior is disgusting. The menu lacks description of food being served, also doesn't list regular drinks such as soft drinks. They have a lounge/bar but charge a cover of $10. The first basket of chips is free but if you want another it's $3 for each one. Salsa can not be so hot right away. In short this place is terrible. I didn't even eat the food or drink anything. If I was a food critic I would bring a gun and shoot myself. HORRIBLE!
Absolutely horrible, these people can't even find batteries.
TERRIBLE! Go somewhere else! Took my mother there for hearing tests and a hearing aid. Apparently the owner is Mark Walser who has a reputation for being "cheap" and not fully disclosing information that would affect your decision on purchasing a particular hearing aid from them. The hearing aids are overpriced and you get "nickled and dimed" on other smaller charges. The place is run more like a business than it is to help people with hearing difficulties. We went to another hearing center and received the same hearing aid for 2/3 the price and dealt with people who without a doubt are more caring and, in my opinion, more honest.
Mieses Essen, miese Bedienung. Auf Kundenwünsche wird nicht eingegangen; stattdessen wird der Kunde belehrt, was ihm zu schmecken hat. Einmal und nie wieder.
None
I know it's a all in one kind of store but the employees are real assholes
Avoid this place at all costs! The owner is an absolute thief! We purchased a refrigerator that ended up NEVER being delivered. When I tried to get a refund I was quickly informed that I would not receive any money until they sold the refrigerator to someone else. I thought to myself, "thank God I paid with AMEX, I'll just dispute it". Well that wasn't the end of it. This crooked business owner provided fraudulent documents to American Express showing that I signed for delivery. He is currently being investigated for FRAUD. Avoid this disaster of a business and take your hard earned money elsewhere! Can't believe this place stays in business.
I went in to see about having a tire repaired. They told me the tire was un-repairable, the screw was in the shoulder. I know that is un-repairable, and accepted that. The salesman then proceeded to tell me that my rear tires were almost bald, specifically "both are at 2/32 of wear". Tire wear is measured in tread depth, and 2/32 is when you should replace your tires. I immediately asked for a quote for 4, to replace the one with the screw, the two he said were bald, and match the 4th. 860 dollars, about right for the truck. I decided to wait and shop, just in case. When I got home I pulled out my own tread depth gauge, and measured. 7/32 and 8/32. What a difference. I understand trying to make a sale, but this man, Matt, purposefully lied to me regarding the safety of my vehicle to get me to spend money. I will never do business with someone that lies outright about the safety of my vehicle. That is putting dollars over honesty and truth, and this is not a company ANYONE should do business with. They don't care about your family's safety, they care about making the sale.
My Saturn Ion was under recall for the ignition switch issue and my car was stopping while driving so I wanted to get it checked out. Twice I called and Rotolo Chevrolet told me there was no recall. Finally I called the Chevrolet headquarters and they got involved. Three days later, after calling at least twice a day with no response I finally get a hold of someone who was able to tell me the issue was not the recall. I wanted to fix the problem myself, so I went to pick up the car. The service manager did not know if it was ready and could not get anyone to tell her if it was. I ended up leaving my car over the weekend. The diagnosis they gave me, which I paid for, was very vague, so when I picked the car up Monday I asked the technician if the service coordinator could call me the next day to give a more detailed diagnosis. A week later and no one has ever called and I'm out $100 for nothing!
They have a big selection of cars but thats it. You are just a number. They dont care about the customers and always try to sell for sticker price. They have tried to sell me a car while waiting for an oil change. The worst part is they tried to sell me a car when I got into an accident and went there to ask something about my gap insurance. They are horrible. They should include an option for zero stars.
Hijacked for $22.50 resort fee at check-in!
A. Good position
Dairy Queen overall is always a joy to go to. The employees at this particular store ruined the experience today. Asked for a float and the gentleman working the counter could have cared less about what I was asking for. I was given a poorly made slush instead with most of the flavoring in the bottom. My girl friend did receive what she ordered. Upon paying, the manager could clearly tell I was not happy and did nothing. It was easy to see the employees could have cared less. I will go elsewhere from now on. Most likely the place on the main street in Allendale.
I was going to be 10 minutes late to my appointment after hitting some traffic and called ahead. The woman said it would be fine. When I arrived, they said they absolutely would not accommodate me and that I would forfeit that session in my series. I told them that for future reference, we do not do business like that in Los Angeles and that they must let a customer know that they won't be accommodated so that they don't have to drive across town just to be sent away. I obviously called management, got a full refund and DO NOT recommend going here. The place was dirty, the staff was rude and incompetent, and it was disgusting and low class.
waste of money and time... boring resort.. No DJ and Rain Dance Facility..... Please don't go....
I've been to Cafe Intermezzo three times now and I'll never go back. Tonight was their final chance and they blew it. The food is decent, but way overpriced. For $29, my wife and I got a crepe, hot chocolate and cheesecake. But that's not where CI fails... we had a party of 6 and when two of our group went to the restroom, the hostess tried to take half our table before we were finished! She didn't even ask if we were done, nor did she apologize. She just disgustedly pushed it back and watched us chat hoping we would leave. We also had to ask our waitress for more drinks / water numerous times. Final straw was the 40 minutes it took them to get our cheesecake to us. Never again.
Was send there to approve repair for my broken aircon. made me an quote for more than double the price than my local machanic. was not able to use the warranty in any way with my local mechanic. Should pay 85 dollar just to find out that the aircon compressor is broken. but i was able to provide quotes from two different mechanics that the compressor is really broken. This company is totally untrustworthy. Never ever again.
None
Pessima! Il proprietario non solo è maleducato ma anche presuntuoso! Se volete prenotare non siete voi a scegliere a che ora ma loro e se tardate anche solo 5 minuti verrete "sgridati" come se foste a scuola! La pizza non è pessima anche se in città c'è molto meglio! A meno che non siate clienti abituali vi consiglio di evitare! Scorsa settimana siamo arrivati in venti e nemmeno uno scontrino fatto!
Hi, i consulted the gyna of this hospital whose name is Divya..When i went to her she asked me to buy medicine from the hospital reception itself and not the chemist shop .I was surprised but we went ahead with it..we paid 3000 for just four pills and when i questioned the doctor whether these medicines are available in the chemist shop she said yes but different company..she then asked me to come to her clinic after two days which i refused as i doubted her ...When we came back home we saw INR 450 written on the pills..Mind you INR 450 was just for whole strips and she gave just 4 pills out of it...Ofocurse ! i am not going back to this hospital again especially to the gyna Divya who keeps promoting her outside clinic but as the bill was given by the hospital themselves for the medicines it clearly shows hospital is involved too..
Terrible, I've had to go here several times as they do warranty repairs for many brands of small appliances and always incredibly rude service, especially from the old lady who seems to run things. We took a Kambrook vacuum in for repairs and they had it for three months, in the end the cost of repairs was higher than the quote and almost as much as a new vacuum. We were in the dark about the timeline for repairs and only got info by ringing them to be told abruptly that they would call when it was done. Will avoid buying Kambrook just to avoid ever going back.
no
No customer service or age discrimination... I'm a 25 yr old looking to buy my 2nd car after paying off my first. Camebto look at some trucks. When I walked inside no one greeted with all the employees just hanging out and talking toeach other I proceeded outside with my wife and son. When I saw someone I asked about a truck with no response he turned and walked away. When i saw about 5 employees hanging out at a car. After about 15 minutes of looking at the collection of trucks and suv's and not being able to sit inside any I left. I am now at a ford dealer considering a new f150 THANKS CAR MAX.
I had to cut my own hair after getting home. My bangs were cut almost two inches too short and at an angle, and the rest of my layers just look chopped off. The girl just said, "Oops! That's shorter than you wanted. Hope your hair grows fast!" Took an hour just for a wash and trim. Going somewhere else to have it fixed tomorrow.
The traffic always tries to kill me and it is to close and the worker are stupid and don't know the driving laws.
Checked in, went in the room, and my wife said she wouldn't stay there. Indian lady owner or manager at the front desk said too bad no refunds. There was black mold in the bathroom, the seal under the room door was missing so noise and wind blew freely in, the sheets were dirty, the carpet hadn't been vacuumed in the corners. A sheetrock screw held the shower knob on, the ceiling was cracked. The room smelled. Much more. I WISH I was making this stuff up. Planning on filing a Florida Chapter 509 complaint to try to get my money back. The favorable reviews on here must be fake.
First they lost my passport and none of my escalations were worked or I never got a call back from the "manager" Now they said my passport is "dispatched" on the 24th and send me a email confirming the tracking number. UPS NEVER GOT THE PACKAGE!!!! I call and call but people at the call center have the clue since they are in India and my passport/visa in in New York. Does anyone have a direct number to reach at the New York Location?! Losing a passport is serious and almost all reviews mention their passport was lost at some point. How is this not an issue to Homeland Security?!
Contracted to replace a few double glazed windows and a porch for my mother - only one man on the job at any one time it seems over 3 weeks later it's still going on - one window broken before installation, porch still not completed and two bay windows still to fit. So much for being professional ! Then to top it all mum slipped on a dust sheet left by the worker and broke her ankle - hell will freeze before I personally use this firm, just waiting for them to finish mums' work and then good ridence to them.
I just ordered a breakfast bowl from this place and it was gross. I ordered a hash brown,egg, cheese and sausage bowl. It was so saggy and it tasted like i was just eating potatoes. I wish i could up load a picture of the i/2 inch of grease on the bottom. i only ate 1/3 of it then i went to McDonald s to get the taste out of my mouth. I will never order this again. For the most part there food is good. I was just craving a good breakfast bowl and it left me with a bad taste in my mouth....But for the most partfood and service just a bad experience.. James Carter
Terrible, terrible company who can't take care of their customers!! My friend bought a pre-owned car from them a few months ago, a 2011 make. Within these past few months she has had to take the car into their shop multiple times, and it keeps breaking down! They sold her a lemon! To top it off, they stranded her at her work! They came to her work and took the loaner car she had been using while her car was in the shop, and didn't leave her any vehicle to drive! I will never shop with them based on the terrible experience my friend has been having with them, and I recommend that no one else does either!
I had called these people February 1st to have someone to come out. A week went by with no call back, so i called them back to see whats going on. It turned out that the assistant there did not put a work order in. After the hot tub guy came out he told me i need to dis assemble the hot tub and take the pump out so I did. He had picked up the pump on 2/13/14. I spoke to Larry on the following Monday to get a update. Nothing has been done. he called me on Wednesday 2/19/14 and said that he has the pump and that he will have his guy come out Thursday to drop it off, and that he couldn't do it that day because he was up at the mountain already. No show no phone call. so i called them today and Candice had told me that Larry is the only guy working and that the other guy had a cold and has been out of the office for a week and that it is just the two of them. So who was the guy up on the mountain on Thursday? I am still waiting to here back, when i do i will let you guys know how this concludes.
Dysfunctional. Tried to reach them all day and they don't answer. They should just close it.
all of the staff are sooooooooo hateful. They all think that we owe them something dame I am the paying costumer .I should be able to return the product if I bought less then an hr
Cleco is a damn joke. Will nickel and dime you to death to pay for their million dollar plants and complete remodel of their corporate office.
Watch out for these people. Their customer service is horrible, especially if you are running late for an appointment. They charged me $70 for service I never received. They obviously don't subscribe to the hospitality that the hotel does.
None
Recently had one of the old pipes above my dining room burst, and they just said its common with old properties and that it happened across the street a few days back. After having it take two weeks for them to fix my bathroom sink, and a flooded dining room/kitchen, they refused to even consider any concessions. The apartment is in decent condition for an old property, aside from the noise factor. The hot water is red, probably from rust, for a while. The staff is nice, but the property manager is an absolute jerk. Unprofessionally rude and sloppy, which doesn't help the image of the complex. I have actually seen him wonder around with a 12" gash in his pants... and he is the manager! Finally, the apartment staff recently claimed that they returned a check of mine because it was not the exact price, but never did. In fact, it the court order was the first time I was even hearing about the issue. If they would have actually just contacted me through proper channels, none of it would have been an issue, but apparently nothing they do is conventional. Aside from good locale and decent rates, there is not much reason to want to live here.
1 star is too generous for this business! The driving inspector was VERY unprofessional! While inspecting my daughters driving, the inspector told story after story of students whom he had failed this driving test and he had my daughter completely distracted and nervous. He rambled incessantly through the entire test and she could not concentrate. She blew right through a stop sign because the idiot would quit talking to her. The owner of the company admitted that they purposely use this distractionary tactic to "put the driver and parents at ease." In actualilty, it's just a shady business practice to force repeat business...they figure they can keep collecting 50 bucks for each attempted test while doing everything in their power to distract the aspiring young driver...What a rip off! I demanded a refund because i didnt feel like my daughter got a fair chance to pass the test. They were VERY rude to me, even to point of threatening to call the police to report me for harrassment! Very poor customer service overall...they even instructed their receptionist to hang up on me! The owner refused to speak to me about my complaint on the phone, until I went in there in person and demanded to wait to be seen in person. We found much better, and more professional inspectors at Century Driving school right around the corner!
Worst internet reservation experience ever, waste of time O_o Nothing was organized and the manger did nothing to accommodate a party of 35. Don't try to reserve show and get served.
Slow!The
Avoid at all cost! Extremely undesirable service and the prices are all 2-3$ more expensive than anywhere else.
At the end of January, my husband and I started renting unit A042 at the SW Denney Road location. He is a service member, so I was coming in his stead with my mother-in-law to move some belongings of his closer to my residence. We were assisted by a woman named Barbara who was by far the least pleasant representative I have ever encountered. I work in retail, so I understand the importance of good customer service. This only made me more appalled by the treatment my mother-in-law and I received when we came in for the first time. We were talked down to almost the entirety of the time we were there, with the exception of the final 10 minutes before she handed us a request to write a nice review for her. I know associates can have bad days, but there is NO exception for the attitude she gave us. My mother-in-law and I both left with our jaws dropped and amazed by what had happened. I have called the location roughly 10 times in the last 2 hours and only received a line busy message or the sound of the call being picked up and hung up. I can not describe how infuriating this is. My lock is stuck on the door and I need to reach someone to find out if someone there can remove it for me so I can move some new items in and replace the lock. This is near impossible to do if I can't reach the location. To top it off, I tried calling the customer service line and every time I try to jump through the hoops to get in contact with someone, it tells me it doesn't recognize the extension and ends the call.
Went to have a look at the puppys and were confronted by really rude ladies. Plus these puppies are from puppy farms not a nice way to come into the world. Only nice thing was the gorgeous spaniel that was really playful. Rude rude ladies weren't even interested in us. Buy frpm breeders at least you know what you are getting. I am so thankful that I read the reviews too.
Simply awful! Tons of promises and nothing got done, promises to put my business on top of Google list at all times or be on the first three, which never happened. Thank you Josh for not giving my money back and plus charging extra $300 without my authorization, you are the worst manager ever, you promised to give me the money back and never did so! This company is a rip off, they will still your money and never respond your calls! And also they call themselves Google people!!!????
None
Always used this restaurant until last night. beware of web site as prices not updated to correct prices. additionally phoned to place order and overcharged despite 2 calls. we cancelled order immediately and then a driver turned up with original order. he was turned away and 5 mins later someone different turned up with another chinese. unbelievable and shocking service. just make sure u have a menu in front of you and double check prices. not sure what is going on.
Absolute worst service ever. Ordered a pizza last week and they forgot our drinks, which showed up 2 hours later. Tonight we order a pizza and are told it will be an hour to hour and a half. 2 and a half hours later, all we get are excuses. Pizza finally shows up, cold as if it was took off a buffet. I gave the delivery guy $5 to take it back. They declined the tip and took it back for free. Should have took it because that was the last chance this Pizza Hut ever had to get my money.
None
Had the worst experience, I am actually in the restaurant right now. I ordered meatloaf with mash potatoes and corn. The mash potatoes are instant, if you are going to claim to be homemade then make them homemade!!!! There meatloaf was horrible and it look like it was frozen. Our waitress spent more time at the bar flirting with a guy then helping us. We asked for something 3 times before giving up. Oh and she smells like booze!!!! I will never come back to this place.
I paid 250€ for two days of stay. I had to present at the show that was being held the next day in the hotel. My room was next to the lift and after asking to change I was told there was no rooms available. At 12:30am I went downstairs and requested either a room change or I am checking out as I could not sleep next to the lift. I then got changed to a smoking room. I will not stay again.
None
THE ABSOLUTE WORST COMPANY IN HISTORY---SOMEONE NEEDS TO SHUT THEM DOWN!!! I AM EXTREMELY INFURIATED BY THE LACK OF PROFESSIONALISM TO SAY THE ABSOLUTE LEAST, I HAVE NEVER LIKED THIS COMPANY BUT WAS FORCED TO HAVE THEM WITH MY LAST MOVE, AND EVENTUALLY COULD NOT TAKE IT ANYMORE, DUE TO THEM CHARGING ME LATE FEES EACH MONTH, AND SPENDING OVER 2 HRS ON THE PHONE EACH MONTH, BECAUSE THEY HAD 'NOT ACTIVATED MY AUTO PAY, ALTHOUGH, EACH MONTH I WAS ASSURED, IT WAS 'ACTIVATED AND NOT TO WORRY', THIS EFFECTED MY CREDIT, AND MY NERVES, AND COST ME TIME AWAY FROM FAMILY AND WORK---- NOW, I AM BEING TOLD 'I STILL OWE THEM $52???? FOR WHAT????? AS HAVE NOT HAD THEIR SERVICE IN OVER A YEAR, AND RETURNED ALL THEIR JUNKY EQUIPMENT IN 'THEIR PROVIDED BOXES' AND HAD A ZERO BALANCE, BUT NOW THAT I AM TRYING TO GET A LOAN, I CAN'T DUE TO A $52 OUTSTANDING FEE?????? AND, CUSTOMER SERVICE, BOTH LOCAL AND THEIR CORPORATE OFFICE….A COMPLETE JOKE! I HAVE LITERALLY PAGES OF NOTES OF THINGS SAID, THAT NO ONE WOULD EVER BELIEVE, OTHER THAN I HAD WITNESSES INCLUDING MY BIZ PARTNER, AS IT WAS SO UNBELIEVABLE. SOMEONE, SERIOUSLY NEEDS TO ………..S H U T THEM DOWN!!!!!
Worst dental experience ever. Sent my husband for a cleaning. 2 hours later, he comes home- no cleaning, and a "recommendation" for $4000 worth of work. They do not clean your teeth at your first visit- regardless of how much you beg. Scammers- don't go!
Avoid at all costs. I've taken my M roadster there twice. The first time they put a 6 inch scratch on the hood and the second time they managed to not only break my shift knob, but ruin my 6 hour detail job.
You call yourself the children of the lord but the lord would not what their children to preach hate to their brothers and sister no matter what they did or who they are. If you have read the bible and the teachings of Jesus Christ then you would know that the person without sin cast the first stone and none of us are without sin since we are made of flesh, so please put your stick done and accept your brothers and sisters the way they are. The latest thing you have done was picketed and shouted out hatred words toward the family of Paul Walker and that inculded his child who is only 15 years old, is that fair think about that next time you decide to step in to some one's busneiss and scar somebodies life .Paul Walker was a good man he dontate his money to people in need maybe you should do the same and put you enegry in to people in need. I am a Baptist too but my Pastor teaches Love and understand no matter how different they are. Well i hope some of this got through and god bless you.
The people working in the service department do not know what they are doing nor are they "reasonable" with service prices. I'm new to the area and took my truck in for a checkup. I was told that my wheel bearings needed to be immediately replaced and it wasn't safe to drive the way it was. I took my truck to 2 other shops for other estimates and both told me that my wheel bearings were in great shape, but that I need =ed to have my upper control arms replaced and a lower right ball joint. Also the upper control arms were not even bolted in properly. Two shops told me that, but Chevy didn't even notice that something was not installed properly. Way to go people! Never again will I waste a penny with you!
too crowded and all the equiment shows signs of significant wear and tear. strange odor was emanating from women's locker room. extra gross
如果只是住不要求，是還勉強接受，天花板還有蜘蛛網（冬天沒暖氣只有冷氣），但早餐真的很簡易，9：30去吃的時候，已剩下照片中的樣子了，也都沒補充，所以感覺很不好！
None
Misleading Floor Plans - note there is NO outside storage, even though their layouts and brochures tell you there is. Poor Move in Process - the apartment was very dirty on move in Parking - lucky to find a spot. You can rent a covered space or a garage, but this is only helpful if there is one near your apartment, and they are also pricey. Landscape is Bug Friendly - the bushes make beautiful landscaping, but attract lots of bugs! I have been fighting a bug problem for 3 months! Pool - nice pool, however the lights around the pool are too bright at night, if your apartment is pool facing, expect to never have a dark bedroom at night. The light floods into your room!! Appliances - Everything works great but the over and water heater. Gym - mimimal, and the temperature is set to 82 degrees, which for any gym goer is too high! Community Events - None Property - the gate codes only work 60% of the time. Mailboxes - there is no outgoing mail slot. Area - the area is nice, lots of things close by.
I agree with the women who ended up with sick dogs!! My dog was attending day and got sick on two occasion and the owner knew prior and never alerted anyone. I have been going there since it open and the ownership was polite and engaging....I have referred several people there before the incidence. Shannon the owner was rude and outrageous. The vets let me know there are often outbreaks there and they take no responsibility. Sad cause my dog actually liked the staff there. I guess once you think your successful you can stop being nice to loyal customers cause you think new ones can just replace us. I use to love it
ESTAFADORES El pasado viernes fui a la peluquería Dalmau con un coupon de groupon de 19 euros (color+corte+mascarilla+secado) y acabé pagando 30 euros demás. Es una vergüenza! Al entrar me atendió una señora rubia y borde (me parece recordad que se llama Mónica), que me dijo que para teñirme toda la melena tenía que cobrarme un suplemento de 30 euros (el tinte supuestamente iba incluido, y no ponía en ninguna parte que había que pagar suplemento para melenas largas). Total, el color me quedó fatal, la misma señora rubia me lo aplicó y parecía que era la primera vez en su vida que lo hacía. Otra chica que estaba sentada al lado mío no quiso hacerse ningún tratamiento extra, ya que en su coupon iba solo el corte, así que la trataron muy mal. La misma señora rubia indicó al peluquero que iba a hacerle el corte que se lo hiciera rápido, que no perdiera más tiempo. Pena que no leí antes los comentarios, seguro no voy a volver.
THEY ARE NOT EVEN WORTH ONE STAR! THIS COMPANY IS A PIECE OF GARBAGE. NOT ONLY DID THEY UPSELL US BY A FEW THOUSAND DOLLARS WHEN THEY DELIEVERED OUR SECTIONAL IT WAS NOT ONLY SCRATCHED AND DENTED BUT IT HAD LEGITIMATE HOLES IN IT. TEARS THAT YOU WOULD EXPECT TO SEE FROM A SECTIONAL SEVERAL DECADES OLD. WHEN WE CALLED THE STORE TO TALK TO THEM ABOUT IT WE WERE TREATED HORRIBLY, CALLED NAMES, AND TOLD THAT "IN THE BUCKET OF ASHLEY FURNATURE WE ARE NOT EVEN A DROP OF WATER". AFTER SPENDING $5,000.00 ON NEW FURNATURE I WOULD EXPECT TO BE TREATED DIFFERENT. DON'T WASTE YOUR TIME GOING HERE... YOU'DE BE BETTER OFF KEEPING YOUR CURRENT STUFF AT THIS POINT..... SHOUT OUT TO MICHELLE WHO WORKS THERE.... YOU SHOULD PROBABLY QUIT YOUR DAY JOB. YOU ARE A HORRIBLE SALES WOMAN AND YOU HAVE NO RIGHT TO TALK TO CUSTOMERS THE WAY THAT YOU DO. YOU ARE A SCAM ARTIST BY EVERY DEFINITION OF THE PHRASE.
I never was able to purchase a car or truck or even speak to anyone since I have called them 7 times in the last 2 hours and they don't answer their phone, the automated system eventually just stops ringing. I'll try the guys in South Haven, they have good reviews.
This place is horrible but always has lots of guests for some reason. I had a bad experience there but decided to give it another shot. the food is all room temperature and the rice literally taste like they recycle it from peoples finished plates. The staff is nice but seem oddly shady and nonchalant. I love chinese but hat this place...YUCK
Gear Peddler rips off my 12-year-old son. My son recently bought a used bike from Gear Peddler in Bend and it fell apart within two weeks. Before we made the purchase we asked if the bike had been gone through and they stated the bike had been checked. We also asked “What if there is a problem after we purchase the bike?” and they responded that they would “take care of us.” When we brought the bike back because the crank was falling off (we already had to replace the handle grips) they refused to take the bike back and their idea of “taking care of us” was to pay them to fix it. I explained to them my son bought the bike with his own money and the manager was unapologetic and made comments like “what if you bought the bike on Craigslist?” I told him I was going to give him a bad review online and he said “he didn’t really care, it happens all of the time…. we have plenty of customers.” Absolutely no care about customer service. Avoid this place like the plague; I am sure there are other small companies in Bend that will give you the service you deserve. Obviously Craigslist is a better bet! Unfortunately my son got a lesson of “let the buyer beware.”
I would have rated this hotel much higher because the room was nice and the people at the desk were lovely. The food was nice and it is in an awesome location. BUT I gave them my car to valet and when I got it back it was broken inside on the centre console. This was not broken when I gave them the car. Its sounds small but it turns out it will cost almost $600 to fix it. I am furious. The manager was rude and dismissive to the point of being offensive. Unbelievable.
My friend just complained about apple store sydney, after listened to her disaster, I finally want to write a review for my terrible experience I had a long time ago in this store. I've also been to apple store bondi and broadway, apple store sydney was the WORST store i've ever been to! terrible customer service... just terrible, i doubt whether the so called "GENIUS" in there know how to write the words "customer" and "service", or they just DISCRIMINATE AGAINST Asian people?!! I had terrible experience there for my 4 visits to that store in 2009, 2010 and 2012. it's a waste of time to write down each of them, just wanna say i've never been there again since then, i'd rather travel a long distance to bondi when i got problems with my apple products. stay away from apple store in town hall, i will never forget my terrible experience in that store. if you want to call those blue shirts "GENIUS", you should at least train them properly, not make them feel like they are "geniuses" and customer are just normal people, they are superior than us. don't make me laugh, 'cause they are not, they are customer service people, they should be proud of this rather than being a "genius"!
Bait and switch deals.. Came in for a car advertised for 3000 to then only find out that was the down payment which they don't tell you till you get there.
AWFUL!!!!!!!!!! When the waitress brought our food out, between three adults the sushi was all mixed up on everyone plates, and she instructed US to just switch it around. At this point, I was fine with that, mistakes happen. Half way through we realize we didn't even get the right sushi, so we told her. She told us we were wrong and that my Eel Roll was in fact a Salmon Roll, when it clearly was not. Continued to argue with us that we were wrong. She said she was going to ask the chef, and came back and still insisted that we were wrong. The manager then came over and this is where it gets bad. She points to my sushi, hovering over me, shoving her armpit in my face!!! Then proceeds to say, oh yeah your right, that's not salmon. Then tells us that they will credit us for the rolls they got mixed up. Fine, whatever. Then....walks back over to our table, PICKS UP MY CHOP STICKS THAT I WAS EATING WITH, AND TAKES MY SUSHI OFF MY PLATE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! What?!!??!?! And the sushi tasted like crap. NEVER AGAIN!
Spent 9+ hours in the waiting room with my wife and other family members waiting for my daughter to deliver our grandaughter and not once did a staff member come out to update us on her condition. St. Joseph in Tacoma is much better.
Wouldn't listen to my problems, instead just gave me medicine for a problem I didn't have. Rushed me in and out of his office incredibly fast to the point where I didn't have a chance to describe my problems, not that he cared. Wanted me to come in twice more for follow-up appointments. I went to the first one where he was as disinterested in me as he was the first time. Decided a second follow-up was not necessary, as I decided to find somebody else who didn't treat his patients as a total inconvenience.
Seriously, just close this location. It should not take 35 minutes to get a smoothie.
None
The restaurant serves pathetic rotis they are hard and cold and only sometimes u get nice well made food most of the times the food is having losts of salt in it
Food was late and cold. Pancakes were chewy and chicken dinner smelled and tasted fishy. Needs new management and competent staff. Worst experience ever.
Worst staples in the area. Associate Dan was not willing to look up product price unless I came in the store and refused to transfer me to someone to help. Told me the only way to look up sale pricing was online. Go somewhere else!
No experience; but I think that the entire public should rate this Doctor based on his actions in conjunction with a Law Enforcement Agency in violating David Eckert's Civil Rights. My rating: Big piece of dung, that deserves to be sued, bankrupted, and then sent to prison for a lengthy prison sentence, where hopefully the inmates in that prison will get to perform some "procedures" on him without his consent! Does not deserve a star, but had to give one to publish. Ranks very high on the "steaming turd" chart, though....
Péssimo. Fiz minha reserva com dois dias de antecedência, chego no hotel de viagem para descansar e o mesmo está com uma reforma dentro da recepção, mas até aí tudo bem. Ninguém levou minha bagagem para o quarto, eu tive que me virar para levar sozinha, chegando no quarto quis tomar banho, mas não tinha toalhas, liguei para recepção e disseram que já estavam mandando, depois de duas horas liguei novamente e ninguém atendia, depois de mais 40 minutos liguei e disseram que se eu estava com pressa poderia descer até a recepção para apanhar, claro que foi isso que fiz. Depois, verifiquei que a higiene do quarto é horrível, o banheiro dava nojo e tinha até teia de aranha no teto do quarto. Cansada deitei para dormir e alguns minutos depois sou acordada com risadas, palavras e uma Tv ligada no último volume, olhei no relógio quase meia noite, liguei para a recepção e mais uma vez não fui atendida, depois de muito insistir, pedi que me trocassem de quarto, informando o que estava acontecendo, simplesmente me disseram que o hotel estava cheio e não tinha quarto disponível. Pedi então que falassem com os hospedes do quarto ao Lado que eram Dois Homens, eles disseram que não podiam fazer nada. Na mesma horqa, levantei, arrumei minhas malas, e desci até a recepção, exigi que devolvessem meu dinheiro, que por sinal paguei adiantado. Eles me disseram que não poderiam me devolver, e ainda cobraram pelo estacionamento, pior... nem estava de carro. Esse hotel é uma MERDA, não recomendo a ninguém, nem ao pior miserável do mundo, pra mim, não merece nem se quer uma estrela. Agora estou processando os mesmos. Saí as 23:57 e táxi eu mesma pedi pq eles se recusaram. O Taxista me levou ao Tulip Inn no Bate, 5 estrelas pelo mesmo preço desse Vernon, e é tudo de bom o Hotel.
I was looking for some good schools for my son who is in LKG now and I heard that Carmel at Padamnabha nagar is a good school, So I decided to give a try in Carmel. I have listed my experiences with school. When I went to inquire about the admission the security staff did not allow any parent to enter in school and from the main gate itself only they asked to call the admission staff and find out which is not a good symbol at least school should have some representative to answer in correct manner. On 4th of December, finally I got the admission form and school staff informed me to come with child for interview on 9th of December and brief the fees detail, However none of the parents were allowed to see the campus. Admission Fees – 95,000 Annual Fees – 48000 (I am not adding charges detail for Books, Uniform and transport which varies ) School informs that they have extra curriculum activities like swimming but there is no swimming pool inside the school but they take childer out every week and there is extra fees to obtain this facility. Hurry!!!! Here comes the Interview day and Result. Result : Not qualified  oh! man it was a first test for my son and I was little depress that he did not do well. When teacher gave us the question paper, all my depression was gone. I am very much sure that school staff doesn’t know how to conduct a test for toddlers, It was a written test for my son and the question paper was amazing. 1. Write A to Z upper case and lower case (which is Ok , I found this is the only question which LKG student can handle) 2. Write 1 to 200 3. Match the object not with images but with word written in lower case 4. Tables up to 3 (not in paper but teacher said Its very easy paper and child should know this as well) 5. Child should be able to write 4 letters word in running writing I am not sure how many of you will agree with me that this is not a test for a LKG student, Hope the information will help.
Holy hell, we live in the neighborhood and ordered from here... Let me just say, what a JOKE! The $7 greek salads were not even side salad size, they were peasant sized salads and the eggplant rolls, well I won't even bother to give a review because we didn't eat them. Called back to try and come to a resolution but the girl on the phone couldn't understand a lick of English, so basically we just wasted $20 on nothing. Bottom line, don't waste your money.
I feel I was taken advantage of because I was in need of a new battery and luckily I was parked in front of the shop so I decided to be a mindful consumer and go to a local shop instead of a chain automotive shop. I regret my decision. I was charged for an hour of labor for them to make sure that, yes, the battery was the problem, and then they only sold one kind of battery- the most expensive kind- and then charged me another hour of labor to install it. $240 dollars for a new battery and I felt trapped into the situation.
Only go here, if you don't want to venture off post and have time to kill. Brought my vehicle in at 830 and didn't get it back til 12. There were only a few cars in the bay. Oil and air filter change and a tire rotation. Three hours!!!! That's the only reason they are getting one star.
Absolutely the worst waste of money ever...I just ordered from there off their on line menu..I got my order an hour later when they are less than 2 blocks from my house it was cold and gross part of my order was missing according to their website..and what I thought I was ordering..I bit into something I don't know it didn't taste like chicken to me ..I ordered a c6 only got rice and what's suppose to pass as chicken and when I called to complain and tell them to come get their food I want my money back she refused to refund me my money..well if you wanna deal with false advertising and poorly made food come here..just gross
Nasty poop style food
Gave me a hard time about my 5 year-old's request for just crab with no rice. All we asked for was 6 crab sticks. Come on manager, how much can a 5-year old cut into your profit margin? Dining out shouldn't be this difficult. After all, I did spend 50 dollars. WOW. Sushi Ten is more child-friendly and much better value and service.
My wife, child and I lived here for a year and that's only because we were stuck in our lease. This place is horrible. Our key cards never worked correctly to the pathetic gym, the pool remained locked for weeks after it was supposed to open, the gas fireplace has never worked, we had 2 major repairs that were not caused by us, and we had several items stolen from cars and also a rusty old bike that was locked up. I do not suggest it for any reason.
I wish there was an option for zero stars! This is one of the worst domino's to order from. Don't order from here and if you have to, opt to pick up your order instead of delivery because it will take 2 plus hours before you receive a cold, poorly made meal. Don't call either because they will not answer the phone - I love domino's, but this experience has left a bitter taste in my mouth. Never again!
Please read: Everything was great, but was overcharged on the tip (paid with debit). Total bill on the receipt was $31.68. I left a $7 tip. When I checked my bank records a few days later I was charged a total of $72.68. The tip added to my bill was $40.68. It's odd that it was such an odd number. They refunded me in cash which is also strange. I'm not sure if this was just a mistake, has this happened to anyone else???
DO NOT RENT HERE. Not only is it essentially a frat house with no regard whatsoever to resident experience, I was sent to collections over THREE DOLLARS. I am still dealing with the repercussions of living here and paying my rent on time.
About 2 years ago I took my car to get it inspected and emissions they claim that I needed aprox. 1,600 worth of work I got a 2nd estimate at another shop and it was only 800 later I took the same car for a replacement that was covered by the warranty and was told that they could scrape the stickers off and have the other repair shop's license revoked and said they could have me fined and ect.
Disgusting can't believe how dirty the store was and items i needed where not on the shelf and employs where unwilling to help.
Worst company! Worst store manager Dominic. Took my machine in for the same problem 2 times in 2 months and they keep telling me it's my fault. Finally is broke on them during there test drive (times now same issue). Now they are thinking it is something else. Not willing to make it right either. Beware! None of the other Ridenow's are any better.
Ordered a single iced coffee, black. Waited over 10 minutes for it. It wasn't busy, and I work in a coffee shop, this was highly disappointing.
Rooms are good but service is not so good....
In my opinion these people are SCAMMERS!! I agree with Mandy on several points she made. They told my sons girlfriend, who is 19 by the way, that her dad would have to pay for some of her school as a parent, that everyone qualifies for financial aid, that they work with her for payments, acted like they are so sweet, helpful and she was going to have no problems. They take potential students on a tour of the facility, have really fun music playing, they stop and dance... oh they lay it on thick and get these young kids hooked on what seems like a very fun learning environment with faculty that bends over backwards to help them out. What a joke. The day before school started, they told her that she did not qualify for financial aid, glossed over the fact that some of her tuition was going to be paid by student loans and really took advantage of her youth and inexperience with financial matters. BTW, it was over $17k for a 9-month program. She realized she couldn't afford the school and dropped out after two months. She tried to setup a payment arrangement with them and they wouldn't work with her at all.
None
horrible customer service! left on hold for over an hour.
Great food! Try to order online and call to confirm ... they don't answer the phone. I guess I will have to go and wait in line. :(
None
We have had Centric Internet service for 3 years now and up until about 4 or so months ago it was good then it all changed! They started having equipment issues and we were with out internet for days and the customer service was rude and unhelpful. They only offer excuses and never solutions. Recently our internet signal has been bouncing in and out. I called and Katie told she would send their tech up to our house to check out the equipment to make sure it was functioning properly. That tech never came. We called two more times before we were finally told that it was a miracle that we even had service (what have I been paying $50 a month for?) and if we wanted to find another internet service they would understand. I am not sure who owns Centric, but I would be furious if an employee of mine ever told a customer that! Even though I would have preferred to have had the issue fixed I am now being forced to find a new service. I would caution anyone thinking about getting Centric Internet to shop for something else.
I am offended by Google's move to support climate change deniers and anti-science politicians. Google's motto against doing evil is laughable given the support being shown to such dangerous groups as ALEC.
Closed.
I wish I had read these reviews before going. First of all, the prices are seriously unreasonable-even for consignment. I found a bath mat that I got at Target two years ago for $2 (in the dollar section) and it was for sale here for $4.50!!! It has appreciated to twice it's original cost after sitting on someone's bathroom floor for who knows how long. Then, while checking out, one of the employees had a huge attitude and was sighing, rolling her eyes, and shaking her head, etc... about my daughter crying. I'm not a fan of her fits myself, but it is incredibly rude to be treated that way by an employee of a store you are patronizing. I left my stuff on the counter and walked out, explaining that I was offended by her rudeness.
I was liking this place. I've been quite a few times with my family. However the last time I went everything was off. The service was way slow, and when I finally got service every thing was back on track the food was good as usual. However as I was taking the last bite of my food a baby roach crawled across the table, this killed it for me I'm done with this place. They need to clean up and bring the exterminator in.
Something stinks here. My car is fairly new and after my regular AAA location has been keeping it maintained very regularly. I decided to save some travel time and go to this closer location for a state inspection. An hour and a half later I ask why this is taking so long to be told that my inspection failed and my car needs repairs. I can't know for certain exactly what happened, but my instincts are usually right on the money and I got the feeling something was not right. I'm taking it to my regular location to find out if they agree that my fairly new car should fail inspection. Doesn't make sense, especially when it has been driving well with no issues.
11/13/2013 I called to make reservations for 6:30, it was my husband’s birthday, and I wanted to take him to Ikaros for the Greek experience. Well, the hostess was calling us on the phone as we were walking in the door. The hostess was friendly and seated us with a smile and said they would sing happy birthday to my husband. The place was crowded, and she sat us at our table. The waitress, and waiter literally ignored us as she went to give water to another table, she never acknowledge us or even said I'll be right with you or bring us any water. We sat there for over ten minutes as we looked over the menu. After still being ignored, we left. I was really disappointed and felt discriminated against. I'm not sure exact how The Greeks view African Americans, but if this experience was an indication, I may not be planning my Greece tour after all. Signed, Disappointed
In 2011 my doctor sent blood work to Bethesda hospital, they contacted my mother to get insurance information and when she didn't have it they just ignored it. Two years later I get calls from debt collectors saying I owe money to the hospital, had they called me in the first place it would have been resolved instantly. Now two years later they can't update the insurance information so I have to pay out of pocket. Avoid this hospital at all costs.
Don't go here for Pho noodles - they were terrible. (Soup was weak and watery). Proprietor just stood there, looking at us and made us feel nervous. Seems to be Chinese-run so likely not to know much about Vietnamese food. Avoid.
The slices of pizza (if you can call it that) had set until the pinapple had sriveled up. There was no attempt by the staff to get fresh slices. They have also lost their liquor license and can't serve beer, that is still on the menu.
None
I am not able to talk to them on phone.
Me and my wife went in and were treated very rudely. My wife and i are muslim my wife had her hair covered at the time and it seemed to be a problem for them. They began to speak in spanish about us not knowing that my wife is Mexican. It hurts me because i live in the same neighborhood just one block away. I see lots of people go into their business but I rarely see any people of color like myself. Although i know or at least i think the owners are Latino it seems as if they would prefer to have their business filled with the new gentrified look of our neighborhood.
I visited Nicks this past Saturday with my dad mainly because I wanted seafood and to eat outdoors. As a kid we came alot but I haven't been in at least 10 years. We arrived to see the hostess having a cigarette outside. She asked us if we would like a seat indoor or outdoors. I replied outdoors and she said, "Just a moment while I check." She came back shortly and directed us out to the back where we sat. There were about three couples seated. We received menus and as we began to look on our menus the host came and asked my dad and I if we would mind moving to a smaller table so that they could accommodate a party of four. I agreed. (It was only two of us and there were multiple two seater tables available; and our food wasn't in yet.) We moved to a two seater table and asked for a waiter to clean our table. He nodded. We stood there, as he proceeded to clean a table for a couple who had just left. Hmmm. Clean a table for a couple who has just left or clean the table for two new guest who have just moved to accommodate a larger group, and are standing and waiting to be seated? If I were a waiter, server or waitress, i would go with the latter. The server continued to clean the other table and multiple other waiters and waitresses continued to serve others as we waited. It was like we were invisible. I also noticed that the party of for that we moved to accommodate was seated and being served their complimentary dinner rolls and water....while me & my dad stood waiting for a table to be cleaned. WE DECIDED TO LEAVE. As we were walking out, we walked past the hostess who was back to smoking her cigarette. She never even parted her lips to ask if everything was ok, or why we had decide to leave. POOR POOR SERVICE IN EVERY ASPECT. I WILL NEVER VISIT AGAIN, AND I WILL BE SURE TO DISCOURAGE OTHERS TO VISIT THIS PLACE. I hate to pull the race card, but due to the fact that we were the only African American guest in here and all other guest and workers at the time were Caucasian, I am led to believe that this was a racial issue. I'm sure this happens but Never would I have imagined this would happen in Brooklyn and a restaurant that I've visited in the past.
HORRIBLE experience! I would not rent from Budget EVER AGAIN! The people at the service counter were very pushy and rude. I rented a car and was given a van because they were all out of cars. This was after being offered the option to upgrade to a BMW or Mustang convertible. Then, when I declined the insurance I was continuously badgered about what insurance I do have and how I should get their insurance. I extensively looking into the insurance situation before arriving and prefer not to be second guessed by the service about my decision. The return process was pleasurable but getting the car in the first place was a mess. I will not rent from Budget anymore. This location in particular has rude customer service.
Don't go here they will sell you the wrong parts & not take it back. They told me to beat my mower with hammer so the part will fit. I OWN MANTIS LAWN CARE DONT GO HERE PLEASE.
TERRIBLE. After a long tiring day, after two high school auditions, I decided I wanted some Chinese food as a reward. And this is the closest place to my house. So I decided to order. Delivery time, and food quality were absolutely terrible. Did I mention that if you order online your order has to be over 10 dollars if you want it deliver? What if i don't wanna pay 10 dollars for extra food? What if I just wanna buy one thing? I can't. It needs to go over 10 dollars. Absolute crap. Never buy anything from this place.
They would not help me they said they had a power outage when all the lights were on and three people ahead of me were helped what great service treat me like an idiot thanks I will not be back
Food poisoning twice. Terrible.
Nothing new under the sun. Not advise even my enemies to use this UPS office. Unprofessional and careless manager. Dealing with personal issues failed to give me a copy of the customs declaration from an international shipping. Because I live far from UPS office I asked the copy of the document to be sent by fax to me. She promised to do it but this never happened. Arrogance and lack of common sense.
I called and complained. These guys are the most unfriendly, unprofessional, lack of service individuals I have ever met. When I first walked into to rent the truck the guy behind the counter acted as if I was bothering him with my presence. He mumbled though the entire rental process and became upset when I asked him to repeat himself numerous times. After I checked the damage on the truck I returned in the office and watched both Customer service reps chat between themselves. When I alerted them I had a concern with 5 oclock traffic and driving a large truck and that I really needed to complete this process and get on the road. I was treated to "Sir we will get to you when we can, we have other customers and we get to you once we are done with them." They were done with all the customers and they were just chatting. The truck was great and worked prefect for the job I needed. The price was also reasonable. When I returned the truck @ 4:52PM, 8 min before closing, the office was locked and the customer service rep was sitting behind the counter counting money and listening to an Ipod. I beat on the window and when I finally got his attention I asked if I could get a quick estimate of my total charges based on miles and number of days rented. He laughed at me and "said they were closed and that I could check my bank statement tomorrow to see how much I was charged" My estimate would have taken him 2 Min. And it was not 5 PM yet. I informed him that service at this location was terrible and that I was calling Uhaul to file a formal complaint. He laughed, shut the door, and put his ear phones back into his ear. I am dissatisfied to say the least. Robert From Baton Rouge LA
The charge a nonrefudable application fee of $75.00 and refuse to look past criminal offenses unless they have been "a really long time ago" apparently the LEGAL FLORIDA CRIMINAL TIME LIMIT FOR CRIMINAL DISCRIMINATION of 7 years is not long enough. I have no major offenses since 2004. They refused to even allow me to submit application.
This was not our first time at the West End Grill, but it will be our last. I was so incredibly sickened after a dinner there, that I spent 24 hours practically immobile. My husband had a very bad reaction as well. Whether it was old seafood (Scallops smelled of ammonia), or something else, this purportedly high-end restaurant should be far more selective and careful about the food they serve their customers.
Blair's is a ripe off. He doesn't pay his employee's. Not as knowledgeable as everyone says. Blair's is about getting turn over. He would rather have new customers come in then have repeat customers. New customers should be aware that he can lose customers receipts, buying your broken tech at a really low price. Fixing it cheaply then selling it for almost retail price. As far as employee's goes, he uses them for their knowledge then, blames them for the crappy work (that Blair himself works on) that was done. I know a few previous technician and all have said the same thing about Blair's. They are all now working for Blair's competitors and is a good idea to go see one of them.
Service department completely dropped the ball on the "We Owe" items I purchased with my vehicle. Had to call weeks later to inquire to find out that they had yet to order the parts. Was rear-ended 2 weeks after purchasing my car and naturally took it to the dealer to get the best possible parts from the people who work on my type of car regularly. They returned my car to me with more than 350 miles more on the odometer than there where when I dropped it off, and with no gas left in the tank though I dropped it with about half. Also received the car with a broken plastic casing on my steering wheel when the interior was still like new when I dropped it off. Overall, very unhappy with my experience with Gillman Subaru. I can't believe a dealership would operate with this degree of neglect and contempt for its customers.
None
I did not get signed they mostly look for Order men which I find annoying.
None
This place is gross. The restaurant is clean and all but that's about as good as you'll get. First, the crab rangoon. I love crab rangoon. I usually get like tons but I could barely even eat the two I put on my plate. The cream cheese part was gross and dry, probably the worst filling I've had. I didn't even eat the wonton part. All the chicken was cold and kind of gamey, not moist at all. The green beans were wrinkly? Like how long had those things been sitting there???? My boyfriend had the potstickers and he described them as being both mushy and hard. Not sure how you can accomplish that. I didn't even try them, they looked gross. Now we were there after the regular dinner crowd (about 7:30) but I can tell that even if this food was at its freshest, it wouldn't taste good. Also, our waitress was clearly on her phone back in the waitress station thing, plus the woman up front at the register did nothing but sit on her phone and was rude to my boyfriend when he gave his opinion of the food. We won't be going back there!
Ужасно. Не свежая выпечка третий раз подряд. Вначале все было прекрасно, не взирая на цены, но потом все сильно испортилось. Больше никогда не куплю и друзьям не посоветую.
To be honest with you I spent money with this store in the past and They always have attitudes ,They make you wait long time to buy a freaking GAME.I swear Sometimes It feels like I'm at a Insurance company or a Bank. If you call they lie to you to get you off the phone.If you wanna trade a game or sell it, they give you nothing and turn around and sell it for 40 bucks to someone else .If you support these Jokes and that Business you are stupid.Because The game stop and other companies sell used games alot cheaper and with better store credit .GAME dude your over rated ,I hope you go bankrupt ,Punk a$$ establishment
They oversauce their dishes to disguise cheap meat. Six people went to dinner. No empty plates. Many better choices in Binghamton.
Terrible school. Financial aid has no idea what it's doing and it took me 3 years to graduate for a 2 year Associates when I was going full time because they kept putting me into classes that I didn't need. Classrooms are way too small, and overall it's just a nasty place.
Last time we came here we had the big breakfast and it was amazing, beautifully cooked eggs, delicious baked beans, toasted ciabatta... Since then they must have changed management because the breakfast menu has far less options and the food... The big breakfast took at least half an hour to come out and it was underwhelming, one cold piece of toast, a bitter hash brown (time to replace the oil?), "home made" baked beans which weren't even cooked/soft (gimme Heinz any day!). Like others have said, the cafe's location has given it a monopoly and the price is too high for the quality that you get. Won't be coming back for many years at least.
None
None
This PO keeps faking my delivery via tracking. I don't receive a notice that they missed me but online they say they tried to deliver. It's happened several times now, so I know the routine... call and have them "re-deliver", you just need your tracking number.
They deserve to have their franchise revoked. Horrendous customer service; Blatantly disrespectful. Ordered online (payed $35 with CC) - 1.5 hours later still no show. First Call - They tell me the driver is on his way Second Call (15 mins later) - They dont pick up 3rd Call (2 min later) - they put me on hold for 7 minutes and then hang up 4th - 11th calls - no answer Now I have to dispute the charge with my bank. I'll definitely be writing into corporate about this branch. People like this make me long for the days of outlaw justice.
I had the worst customer service from them over the past couple days. Yesterday I arrived for my 11 o'clock appointment to get my check engine light looked at and to investigate a knocking noise in my front right wheel. I dropped off my key and awaited a call to hear whats wrong. I did not get any phone call til 2:30 where the lady who called me(who totally knew nothing about cars) said I had two issues. 1st issue was with the engine which would cost me around $250 and a 2nd issue with my front wheel that would cost an additional $260 bucks. I not being able to afford both said for them to go ahead and fix the engine issue and I would wait on the wheel issue. She said okay they would start working on it and she hung up. At 5 o'clock i had still not received any phone call back from this establishment and so i called up there. Basically I got told that they had not even started fixing my car... this is 6 HOURS after it has been there mind you.. and that other cars came in that they had to take car of and that they are working on getting back to it.. the man assured me they would give me a call back when they knew when it would be done.. Pep Boys closes at 8 and I never got any phone call til this morning at 9 oclock when the very nice guy who i had dropped my car off to the day before noticed my car was still there. He explained that he was unsure why my car was still there and why it was taking so long and he apologized and gave me a full run down of what was actually wrong with my car.. Best part is that this guy who knew what he was talking about said that my total car damages to fix it is actually 1700 dollars(im sure this price wont include the "labor" charges your gonna charge me for having my car there all day and all night).. thats a little far off from the 500 i was quoted the day before huh... the engine part that has to be fixed is actually $650 dollars. so now im having to come up with an additional $400 to get my car fixed because the people at this business don't have any clue what they are talking about and I'm pretty sure I am getting scammed for more money. I told him to go ahead and fix the engine cause I definietly don't have $1700. He said okay and he would get someone working on it. It is now 4:45pm on sunday. 29 hours later and i stilll do not have my car. Every time I call up there no one can give me any estimated time of when my car will be done. I pretty sure when you fix cars everyday you can say oh this process takes roughly 3 to 4 hours or can give someone some sort of time scale to work off of instead I get well were not sure but we will call you when its done.. oh yeah? like you guys called me last night before you closed?? cause you didn't. I dropped my car off thinking it would be a few hours maybe six hours and I've had to make arrangements all day to get around cause I have no transportation. Stay away from this business they are a bunch of money uneducated "car technicians" and one brainless girl answering the phones.
They don't even deserve one start but they don't let me give zero. I went there to look at a car that I thought would have been perfect. I drove up and parked, started grabbing my things to get out and walk around. I wasnt even all the way out of my car before THREE yes THREE salesmen came out to "help me". One had no idea what cars they had and says he wasnt part of sales, then the second took me over to the car and opened the door. I looked inside and was very excited to test drive it. Only thing was that everytime I tried to bring it up they changed the subject. Then they took me inside to look up the internet price that I mentioned, and they APPARENTLY did not know what that "special" was even though that price was on MULTIPLE websites including their own. Then they told me to fill out a loan form with them after I already told them several times I already had a pre-approved loan with my credit union and did not want to go through anyone else. They then brought over the manager to "help" and the second salesman told the manager that i was trying to finish buying it when I had not even looked in the car yet. I told the manager that I am not going to fill out the form because I told them i already had one and that I had not even seen or driven the car yet. He completely ignored me and kept telling me that I can get a better rate with them. After all this I politely told them that I wanted to wait and figure out if I wanted to spend that much and that I would let them know. Instead of letting me go and being decent then began to try to embarass me in fron of the other customers and employees. Both the manager and salesman started saying (loudly) "Isn't it worth $10,000?!" and "You won't even spend $10,000!?". They continued to badgar and humiliate me until I finally walked out. Not to mention that my "$10,000" would have actually been "$12000+" Because they were trying to add almost $1500 in DEALERSHIP fees after taxes and all. Things like $400 to document sales and keep record copies, $399 for "assesories whatever that is... Proccessing fees, moving fee, etc etc. They will never get mine or anyone I knows business, ever. They were lying, horrible people that completely tried to trap me and humiliate me. They are worse than buying from the big dealers. NEVER BUY FROM THEM!.
Absolutely appalling! This Company offered to provide me with a booking system for my website, what they have provided me with is a faulty system that is constantly crashing. i have made several attempts to contact them and they refuse to acknowledge my requests for these problems to be fixed. Please good people of the internet, DO NOT use this company as they will only rip you off they way i have been!!!
This is beyond a doubt the worst McDonald''s in the city. The staff is a group of unmotivated clock sitters who do as little as possible and seem to delight in moving slowly and demonstrating their lack of concern for serving the customers. I asked for the managers contact information and was given the fax number
吃了這麼多年的八方，唯獨這家水餃明顯小了不少，蘿蔔湯裡的蘿蔔都壞了，換了一碗還是壞的，八方的品質越來越差。。無言
While the facilities are nice, I've had nothing but problems during my ten visits there. To top it off, I was only parking there for the Frontier points and not a single point was ever credited to my account. The problems I had included: long waits for the return shuttle, they lost my car after I had then change my oil (It took about an hour to find) they promised my car would be in valet after the oil change and it wasn't, they've forgotten to drop me at my car, and they're incorrectly charged me and then told me they couldn't give me a refund for the difference.
When we arrived everything looked ok. when we were ready to go to sleep we found a pair of socks in the bed, so that means they didn't clean the sheets after the last guest. I talked to the manager and she told me that she was going to clean the room for me. The next day when we were getting ready to take showers we found out that the water heater was not working, it was untli 1:00 pm when we could start our day and get ready to go to sea world. I understand a water heater malfunction but not washing the sheets after each guest that is just wrong.
I usually have a sweet spot for their Saluki Special even though their service is generally sub par. Yesterday I called and ordered 1/3 Saluki and 2/3 All Meat after being assured by the girl on the phone that we could do that. My boyfriend doesn't "do vegetables". Upon getting it - it was ALL Saluki. He called them to explain their mistake (and granted, he could have been nicer about the mistake but you know how men get when they are hungry and he had a limited lunch window and didn't get to eat as a result). When the delivery driver arrived he asked me for the original pizza back (what!?) but since the Saluki was for me I had already eaten on it. I stood there a little mortified while he called his manager. I even tried to tip the driver (as it wasn't HIS fault that they made a mistake and they often have to use their own gas and rely on tips) he still continued to treat me like dirt. After getting the pizza inside.. the bottom was burnt black as coal. Coincidence? I doubt it. I will not be returning to mackie's of my own accord
Quaker steak and lube.
Room 127 infested with bed bugs. Had 30+ bites overnight. Management was unapologetic and defensive when I called just to let them know they have a problem.
I have an ongoing dispute going with Claret Fitness. I used the facilities from June 2013-Nov1st 2013 and the management kept charging my credit card through Feb 2014 even though I am back in the States and no longer in Barcelona. They were not authorized to do this along with the fact that I paid each month in cash for the services not realizing that my card was being charged in addition. This is Fraudulent! I am disputing all charges through my credit card company. Connor Gregory
Just went through a terrible closing with Continental. They were unprofessional, inattentive and not at all detailed minded. During the closing they lost me points on the mortgage when the associate that was handling my loan went on an unannounced vacation without passing our loan to a fellow associate. The paperwork during closing took almost 4 hours to complete. The stack of paper was at least 4 inches tall and the duplication of effort was astounding. Now, two months later, they are threatening to pull our mortgage when they screwed up the paperwork and demanded that we now supply it. Ridiculous!
Schlechter Service, kaltes Essen, mindere Qualität und hohe Preise. Wildschweinbraten kalt (vorgekocht), Spätzle aus dem Froster/Plastiksack und der Wurstsalat mit billigstem Industrieessig (Essenz) angemacht. Dafür kann der schöne Ausblick und die gute Lage leider nicht entschädigen. Die Bedienung sagt über den Koch er sei "launisch" und ginge bei Beschwerden sofort nach Hause. Der Seniorchef ist um die 90 und am Tagesgeschehen offenbar nicht mehr interessiert, der Juniorchef war nicht aufzufinden, wahrscheinlich beim Angeln während seine Gäste leiden. Nie wieder!
Well, here's the thing. It's not their pizza that sucks; it's their service/help. Utterly lousy and grade school level. They constantly take their phone off of the hook so they can play 'catch up' with current orders and then when caught up, place it back on the hook. I've suspected this for a long time, as have many other potential customers I've spoken with, but tonight I caught them doing it red-handed, purposely going down there so as to catch them off guard...lol... Forget that lousy service; too many other options in this city! I called Goodfella's, only to be told my pizza would be ready in 30 minutes, and I am, right now, eating a delicious, cheese & sausage drenched 12-cut square from Goodfella's for a buck or two LESS! I've ordered from Goodfella's several time in the past, but now I will be a permanent customer. Their pizza is very, very good, and their service in right on. See ya, Riverside!
Needed alignment and rotation.... I brought it in 11am and I came back at 1:30 and the car hadn't moved. He said there were 3 cars ahead of me..... Soooo is it 1 hour per car or what? Don't go to this place if ur trying to get quick service.
None
I don't know what has happened over the past two years or maybe it was just a bad night, but I would never go to this restaurant again, and definitely not with a group. Our staff attended last Fri night and got the worst service ever! Reservations for 24 people for a meal at 7:30 should prompt enough trained, qualified staff on hand. After ordering a Sangria at the bar on arrival, and being told it would be brought to our table (asking us to be go and be seated where we froze most of the night as there was no heat on in the atrium), three trips to the bar, finding out no Sangria had been made was just the start of the downhill slide. A prepared menu with no pricing, with no notification when booking that would be required, (we are a charitable organization so not everyone can afford to pay $40 for a meal), and one server at the table, whom we later found out to be the owner/manager doing a step dance on the pricing after "checking with his boss on reducing prices !!???" and appetizers not arriving until 9:15, we were NOT happy customers. When we arrive at 7:30 we shouldn't expect to have main courses arriving at 10 pm as our one server wound his way through the Salsa dancing lessons which began at 9pm. They were pressing us to get up and dance, however, most of us were too hungry to enjoy any type of dancing. Also finding out that if you didn't order, and had only come for the company, a few drinks and some dancing, it would cost you $15 to sit at the table!! And, if people only wanted the main course they still had to pay the total cost of the meal "so you might as well order the whole thing and take it home"! Oh yes, I finally got a Sangria one hour after arriving (Sangria special was on the sidewalk sign outside for the evening but they hadn't made enough Sangria??!!). To add insult to injury, they add the tip to the bill. We asked that it be removed, as they didn't deserve it. Not a pleasant experience making me want to go to downtown Halifax again, and not to that restaurant not ever!
Worst dealership in Georgia. They must think everyone is broke. Need some customer service training. STAY AWAY.
Karts barely roll. Pharmacy took 2 hours. Billions of dollars, and it's the worst Wal-Mart I have ever been too.
This dealership is the most annoying, useless, waste of time ever, and I would not even bother to check them out based on their spamming marketing practices. I have been looking for a specific type and model of car and on craigslist. Their advertisements keep showing up, and spamming the entire list. And even worse, the say they are located everywhere from Costa Mesa to Malibu, when they really are not. Now that being said, I have never actually been to their dealership. But there marketing practices of spamming the heck out of craigslist makes me never want to go there, no matter what type of deal it is. I can't imagine how annoying it would be to deal with these people in real life, rather than just online.
Someone needs a lesson in cleaning! This hotel is filthy. The carpeting has not been cleaned in a very long time and has stains and a general overall dirty look to it. Nobody bothered to take even a carpet sweeper to pick up crumbs throughout the week-end we were there. Crumbs in the diningroom on Friday night were still there when we left Sunday. Bathtub and sink were scratched and yellowed and a thick layer of dust lay atop the shower surround. Walls were disgusting throughout with stains and marks. Curtains had dust and cobwebs on them. One of the beds had been made but not changed from the last guest as could be seen by a layer of human hair. The dining room carpet was very dirty. Breakfast was poor with little selection and the coffee and hot water were lukewarm. Our keys didn't work which meant multiple trips up and down the stairs (no elevator). We (large group of us) come to town annually to shop. We needed 4 rooms this year. No tip was left. Manager needs to raise his cleanliness standards. This used to be a very nice hotel!
The school is very dark and dingy, my kids went there and hated it and I was trying to figure out what the problem was then I did a lunch day with them both and they have roaches and rats running along the campus and roaches crawling freely in the cafeteria. When I complained I was told "We are aware and trying to do everything possible to get the rodent situation under control needless to say my kids didn't eat school lunch after that.And exactly 2 weeks later the same issue was still in full effect nothing happen the decided to tell me that since they are backed up against the woods it's normal. So now my kids are no longer at the school.
I took my daughters 2003 VW Pusat in for an emissions test. The check engine light goes on intermittently. They failed the car on this basis without actually testing the emissions and charged me $30 then tried to sell me a diagnostics package. I declined and took the car to a WA State emissions test facility and the vehicle passed. I have never once had a vehicle fail an emissions test before my experience with this company.
I used to work at this McDonald's and they made me come in and handle food when I had the SWINE FLU. They would have fired me for calling in without a doctor's note when the doctor quarantined me so I couldn't go to the office to get a note.
Un accueil très froid, odeur de cigarette dans le cabinet, un médecin qui n'utilise pas de gans avec une attitude très désagréable.
In my opinion, Cornell Jewelers is the worst Jewelry store in the Rochester area. I was in the market for an engagement ring, and I had been to 9 different jewelry stores. I visited Cornell’s several times and was working closely with a sales woman there. On my fourth visit to look at some diamonds, I was not satisfied with what the sales woman was showing me so I asked to look at some different type of diamonds. When she figured out that she couldn’t close the deal she brought the owner of the store out (instead of bringing out the diamonds I was asking for). The owner sat down and talked my ear off about random diamond stuff (keep this in mind – this was the second time this sales woman had brought the owner out to speak with me). As soon as I told them what my budget was and that I wanted to shop around for pricing, the owner told me he would not bring out anymore diamonds for me to look at and said that I was not giving him any incentive to want to work with him. Bottom line is, they just want to sell you on the diamonds they have in the store already, they don’t want to spend the time to find the diamond you really want, and it really seems like they only want to work with you if you are purchasing a six figure diamond. Very rude, talk too much about stuff you don’t care about, don’t listen to you. I have more to tell about this place but I don’t want to be long winded. Go to any other Jewelry store!
Rubbish excuse for a burger king. Takes forever in the drive through. Most of the staff can hardly speak English and don't care about you as a customer...avoid this place
Faulty equipment, horrible customer service, rude manager&salesman. Avoid at all cost.
The worst service I've had anywhere in New Orleans. We went there on a Tuesday night and there were literally 4 customers in the dining room. There were also 4 employees. We were promptly seated, given chips, salsa, and menus. Then we were ignored by all of the staff for 15 minutes. We ended up walking out without anyone saying a word to us.
I had one of our Smart cars in for $650 worth of damage done to the vehicle. After several weeks they sent a revised estimate to the insurance company for $2,900 and didn't notify us about what the other damages were and what we wanted to have done. After 5 weeks they said the car was ready but we had to bring it back for a new rim because they ordered the wrong one, Rim !!! what was wrong with the rim, when I went in to ask them about all the charges they go real defensive and said no on ever want to know what wrong they just want it fixed. I explained that I owned the car, not them or the insurance company and I would like to know, their office manager came out with the paper work and tried to explain to me then she started yelling at me, calling me a smart ass and an ass hole, at that point I knew it was time to leave, I told her that was real professional yelling at me and calling me names. she was still yelling at me as I was walking to the parking lot to get in my car and leave. She was running after me telling me to take my god dam car, I explained I couldn't drive to cars at once and waived her off and drove away.
If you are looking for service, prompt return of phone calls, or friendly people, do not buy a car from this dealership. Go to Dallas. Their prices are more competitive, and the people at the Dallas dealership actually treat you like they value your business. It is an unfortunate representation of the MINI brand because I love the car. We have had problem after problem with the service department here. They lie, they do not fulfill promises, and they hold your car hostage. For example, they lied and told me my car could be fixed within 24 hours because they had the part in stock. Two days later, they told me the part had to be ordered from another state. They also told me they were keeping my freshly detailed car inside their warehouse, but when the insurance adjuster arrived to take photos, the car had snow all over it and had clearly been outside for several days. It's unfortunate. I hope that MINI finds another dealer in the area.
My daughter was driving home from college when our car broke down. She brought it into Mr. Tire for repair, They did a computer scan for a cost of $116 and recommended services that needed to be done. It was expensive but what choice did we have, my daughter needed to get home. We asked that they return all the parts they removed from our car so that we could show it to our mechanic at home in New Jersey. Our mechanic showed us that Mr. Tire did not change our plugs which were listed on our bill. In fact, the plugs that he claimed were removed from our car and changed would not even fit our car. Our original plugs were still in our vehicle, verified by the serial numbers. We called and asked for a partial refund for work not completed and he told us to bring the car back to him. We live 3 hours away and we certainly did not want to break down again. Nice job to take advantage of a student from out of state. That isn't how I would choose to make my living!!!
I have visited the Lumberyard on quite a few occasions with my grandsons. They are ages 10, 4, and 3. The little ones know how to ride peddle bikes but it is easier for them to ride their stryders there. I have never had a bad experience there until today! The staff is friendly and Liam is especially nice. However, today has changed my opinion of Lumberyard forever and I will never go back. I had my three grandsons and another boy, aged 11. The two bigger boys usually ride on the blue side. The two little boys went to the green area and it was unusually busy today. The employee, Will, who I assume is the owner was directing traffic over on the green side. He kept letting the bigger (7-10 yr olds) kids ride the track while the little ones had to keep waiting. The older kids would run the track, COME BACK, then Will would let them run the track again. All the while the little ones were STILL WAITING!!!! After this happened several times, I went onto the track and asked him to be aware that they were still waiting. I explained we could only stay an hour this trip and I didn't want them to be sitting more than riding. He was very cordial and promised to keep a better eye out.I appreciated this response, and he did try to be more aware. Then after about 15 minutes, he once again defaulted to his previous behavior. As I watched my grandsons wait and wait once again...I became extremely disappointed in his attitude. He would let them ride every second time the bigger kids went. I felt like my little grandchildren did not get full value, since they did indeed SIT and WAIT more than ride. I understand all about sharing the track on a busy day as well as safety concerns. It doesn't negate the fact that I paid the same amount of money for less value received than others. I will not be taking them back there.
My husband Bought me a car. A week later the car had a service suspension system warning on it. No ones willing to pay! My Husband and I bought a used 2007 GMC Yukon Denali from this dealer ship Tim Dahle Nissan in Murray On(PURCHASED DATE) 12/17/13. On 12/26/13 a light for my service suspension system came on. The Service Department couldn't find a problem at this dealership on 12/30/13 and told us to talk to Tim Mills To Set up an appointment for us at a GMC dealership Which Tim did not do. I then called Tim Mills on 1/16/14 Because I am sick of waiting and want it fixed. So he tells me to Go to the " Salt Lake Valley Buick GMC dealership" Which I did. They told me the diagnostic would cost 102.00 and was I paying for it or the dealer? Tim Mills Said Yes he would pay for it. Done. Then the problem arrives when we find the problem.(Service Adviser )Says its the a Compressor Control ASM. Its a $702.00 bill and Tim Mills Says no the Tim Dahle Nissan Dealership won't pay for it. My warranty PORTFOLIO PROTECTION, is plan D the problems covered under plan F. My Warranty doesn't cover it end of story. So my problem is, Me and my husband are paying on a broken car and they didn't even tell me it was broken in the first place. Why would they? They need to make money off of people by resting codes and after so many miles the codes come back up and then its the Buyers problem right? So I get stuck with the bill. I drove this SUV 5 days out of that 13 day period. To the store, my kids to school, and then to the dealership where they couldn't find the problem. Or even pay for something that was already wrong with the Vehicle Prior to purchasing and now is again the Buyers problem. I would not recommend this dealer ship and I will tell everyone and every review board this til it is fixed. I dealt with Tim Miller at Tim Dahle Nissan in Murray.
The High School in Forest Grove is full of a bunch of Tool BOXES. More nonsense than anything. It is what you make of it. There's only a handful of teachers there that are worth excluding entirely from this negative review besides that there's nothing really at all to like about this dumb sorry excuse for a school... I'm excited as heck to finally be done with this school and get as far away as possible. If you give this school five stars your wrong and must be doing heroine.
Poorest customer service I have ever experienced! Their software was not as promised. Before I could get past the initial steps of initiating the software I discovered they they couldn't do what Edward told me it could. When I asked for my money back they just ignored me and stonewalled me for two months. Excuses ranged from they had to purchase a portal for me. But when I asked for a receipt their story changed to that it was my fault. That I should have realized that their software couldn't do what I wanted it to. The problem with this is that Edward had told me initially that it could do it. When I asked to speak to his manger Edward pretty much just ignored me and said that his manager was out and would get back to me in time. After repeatedly asking to talk to the manager and stonewalled for 2 MONTHS I contacted my Credit Card company. My Credit Card company agreed that Zaui was dishonest and returned my money. BEWARE!!!!
I called at 8:35am on wednesday the 11th of december 2013 to make an appointment.The receptionist says you are good with Doctor Aaron 3:45pm today. I show up for my appointment at 3:30pm only to find the clinic CLOSED with a sign that said, "We are closed early today for a Christmas Party. Go to the insta care which is opened from 7-9" IS THIS A JOKE? at that time of course i couldnt get a different place to give me an appointment that day. i can not believe i was STOOD UP BY LEHI CLINIC STAFF!! this would of been my second time going there. When i called to tell someone the chuckled and said im sorry. I am never recomending this place, very disappointing.
NBC Video showing the abuse and murder of the animals on the farm tell it all. This company needs to be boycotted and driven into bankruptcy.
The people are so discourteous over the phone, I would never shop there! Someone needs to instruct their personnel about being cordial on the phone when people call there for information!
WOW! What a horrible place to shop for cars! We went in there looking for a vehicle with CASH IN HAND and wanted to haggle a bit about the price of one of the vehicles. The guy tending to us rudely made a comment about "being in the business to make money, not give cars away". I have no idea how they move cars there, not with that attitude...
I am writing to warn other consumers about this company. Long story short they attempted to change the price and add additional fees when they showed up (late) and then walked away leaving me stranded with no movers and needing to be out of my apartment in a few short hours. They are unprofessional and will use deceptive information to obtain your service and then will screw you. There is nothing positive to say about this company.
I made a reservation for two nights for staying in BR for work - Monday and Tuesday. On Monday morning, I was informed that I did not need to stay in BR those 2 nights. I went on line and canceled the reservation. Received a credit on my credit card for one night - and a notice that I had to cancel by 4PM the day before (Sunday) or they would apply their policy "PENALTY" of one night since I canceled Monday morning, and not Sunday by 4PM. I am exceedingly annoyed -- and I have a "POLICY" of not paying for something I didn't use. PLEASE don't use this Residence Inn. They are not customer friendly........
I have eaten at Cozumel several times and always had good food. Last time I visited, the service was terrible, and food was bad. Nobody seems to care that I got bad food or bad service. They just wanted my money. Don't waste your time or money on this place.
DON'T Deal with Them, GO Directly to your creditor!! They will work with you, Trust me I know the game. Noll Collections Doing Business as NCS collections will probably change their name again. Spoke to John Cole, and he was extremely rude despite the fact I was trying to work something out so I can pay them back. I I understand that they probably deal with a lot of rude people so they no how to throw it back, but I wanted WORK it out because I support outsourced sales/marketing/collection. I'm all about customer service and I am easy to close but I just wanted to be treated like an adult. Anyways, I just called up the company I owed my money to and paid them directly without having to deal with rude people that are claiming to be "blunt" and laughing at me on the phone. John you are in sales so I know you are laughing on the outside but it stings so hard on the inside to lose that commission over something as simple this. Ha Ha Ha!
Mala atención. Mala experiencia en general de parte de Yaima T. Nunca estuvieron atentos en lo absoluto.
Sux they fixed my car now its worse than before its like i had 1 simple thing wrong now everything goin wrong
Loooonnnnggg wait and salesman/saleswoman style eye care
Staff doesnt talk in english at all. Firstly they tried to move us into the room without any window... After some argue they gave us normal room with a view of the sea... Food was normal... Staff was impolite with their customers and tried to fine everything they wanted by pushing everything on customer... That this was his fault. This was the First and the last time i have visited this hotel.
None
I will never buy another lawn mower from this organization. The products are inferior and the service matches the products.
None
None
They do carry a lot of good brands, yes they are overpriced. But what made me come here is their service. Today I, literally, walked out of the store and drove another 30 minutes for what I wanted. The lady who works there should never, ever be working with the public, she should be in her PJs working from home, probably writing movie reviews. Also, if you still want to go there, make sure you get dressed up, walk in there with board shorts and flip flops doesn't even look at you. But the Cuban Restaurant next door is awesome!
I don't like to complain, and I know that food service workers are underpaid. But they messed my order up two nights in a row. I ordered a "pumpkin spice chai latte." But when I walked out of the store, I took a sip and it was coffee. I hate coffee. I went back in and told the barista that she gave me coffee. She told me that is what is in a latte. I reminded her that I asked for a chai latte, not coffee. She told me she was confused by my order and said I should have asked for a "chai tea latte with pumpkin spice." Okay fine. I guess I need to insert the word "tea" in my order and swap out the adjective for a preposition. Annoying but not a big deal Day 2: I order a "chai tea latte with pumpkin spice" from the same barista. I walk outside, take a sip, and it is... a caramel apple cider! Okay. It was not what I wanted, but it is better than coffee. I actually got the drink that was supposed to go to the woman behind me. Why did they fill her order before mine? I do not think I am going back there for a while.
For non Russian passenger, its pretty much a very taxing experience.
Personally I would not recommend this dealership or go back to it again. I had a very bad experience during my new car purchase. Sales person I dealt with were very unprofessional. It started all with Internet Sales Team….I called them and told my requirements and requested for a price quote. They sent me the same, when I visited them the pricing got changed as the quote sent to me was different and not as per my financing options which I asked for. Since this dealership is 65 miles from my place and I didn't want to waste any more time we negotiated a deal which included a 3M protection film on bumper, front & on side mirrors. Sales person asked me to share the price for this film which I agreed. I half paid for it & since it was Sunday and by the time we finished all paper work it was their closing time, so the sales person told us that he would set up a service appointment for the things to be taken care of. After constant followup of 3 weeks I got an appointment scheduled for the protection film and other issues, only to know that they will put the film only on front & side mirrors, not on the bumper as it was not what they offered or I paid. For getting the film installed on bumper I have to pay an extra $250 from my pocket. I spoke to the sales person & his manager explained them but they simply denied that they promised any such thing. Since I already paid money so I have to get it installed as I was not willing to pay anything extra on what they promised & not delivering. I went to the dealership to get it installed, since it was a long job so requested for loaner car, they offered rental car. We did a walk through and I left for the office. When I went back the lady who took back the rental car looked under the bumper and said that there is a scratch (which was not visible until you bend on you knees and look under) and I have to pay for that. I disputed it saying i was not responsible for that and you never look below a car to check dents & marks. They filed a claim & I disputed it as I was not responsible for that scratch & moreover it was not visible when you walk around until you bend on your knees and look below. So this case is still pending with my insurance as I disputed it. Lets see what happens next. My new car purchase experience is ruined by this dealership. I wouldn't go back to them…..
None
don Edward Bender reviewedMountainside Apartments 11 minutes ago ★☆☆☆☆ This place is by far the worst place to live at. They don't give one rats well you know about anyone but themselves. Dishonesty and unprofessional. You pay $1,000 bucks a month and get service like if you living their for free. SAVE YOUR MONEY AND GO SOMEWHERE ELSE. I will tell them their is a problem with something for example when I first moved in My ceiling fan in my room was shaking very hard. I told them that I had a problem with fan and the fire detector. I call them and they will tell you.. no problem we will get it handled today. Today goes by and never gets fixed. Took them a whole month to fix anything. Then the maintenance guy didn't know my girlfriend lived there and said I am glad we fixed that ceiling fan that was close to be falling on them. Now I have scropins in my house. Baby ones at that which means mom and dad not that far away. I have two little kids and they just say they can't do anything till wed cause that when there is no fee involved. They don't cae about your saftey, your well being or anything else. Just care about their money. They give you the first three days of the month to pay rent which is helpful but after that the 4th day they already sent a notification to the court to get their money. But yet maintenance will take forever to come. They will tell you they will do something and never do it. This is by far the worst place I have ever lived. They hung up on me and my family. Fair warring lived here for less than a year and CANT wait to leave!!!! We even been thinking about packing our stuff and leaving thats how bad the place is.. Also don't even let me get started about parking spots. Nermous people have to park across the street to park. Not in the appartment complex literally across the street. Then when they are doing renavations in the apartments they like to take up 4 spots with marble counters to make even the parking spots more filled up... I would not come here ever again.
Always ridiculously slow.
I contacted the service department to price having a door handle replaced and was quoted a price for parts and labor. After confirming that price, the service writer told me to stop by to have the part ordered. When I stopped in to the service department, I encountered a VERY rude valet and a service writer who could not be bothered to help me so he told me to talk to the parts department. The parts department gave me a much higher price on the part and when I questioned the discrepancy, he rudely told me to go talk to the service writer. This service department is staffed by the most rude, arrogant, and condescending people. I will not be returning.
I arranged for a rate of $49 plus tax over the phone and in an email correspondence, but when I showed up, the reservation wasn't there and the clerk wanted to charge me more. After negotiations, I was able to keep the price at the agreed upon rate of $49 plus tax. The walls and ceilings in the rooms exhibit water damage from roof leaks and the water pressure in the tiny showers is terribly low. The bedding is outdated and not fresh. The clientele is generally described as seedy. The worst part about my visit was coming home itchy to find out that I got bitten by bed bugs and may have to call pest control and wash everything. Trust me, spend an extra $20 and stay somewhere else.
Kris Weiss Hired us to do a job and did not pay us
Poor service, sleep number bed was broken, light fixture broken, police were called at 3:00 am to break up a fight... The staff offered a complimentary ride in the shuttle which only departed after the driver (who disappeared for an hour) was located by the staff. All in all, a ridiculous experience. If you're in Providence, find another place to stay.
Bad don't go there.Theywill ruin your hair.
None
Absolutely sub standard for what I was expecting to get on my surprise date to The Infamous Palmer House. I felt like I was in the lobby getting spa services. There was nothing warm cozy or zen about the experience. It was just what I would expect from hotel chain cruise ship spa services and actually the cruise ship spa services was actually pretty fantastic. The relaxation room furniture is anything but comfortable and Im 135 5'5" but for my 6'5" husband the worse and i couldnt even sit next to him because the seats kept sliding apart that were pushed together to make a "loveseat" we were their for COUPLES treatments and were separated the whole time. The massage room was cold started late and with all the fluffing around of the sheets and blankets which eventually slide off during my massage I got less than 50mins. The massage had no rhythm and I just felt like a piece of meat being poked and tenderized as you could feel him rushing through the massage to make sure my 3 oclock massage that started at 305 was over at 354. I am a massage therapist so when we got home I was able to save my husbands CANCELLED massage because he 1. booked a couples massage which meant we should have been in the same room and we werent 2. he really wasnt a fan of having another big black man give him a massage. There is no harm in asking a man if he would prefer a male or female therapist when booking. Or just using industry common sense most men do not want to be massaged by another man. Your staff argued with us to the point where we had to pull out our reservation and show them we booked a couples massage only then did they apologize told us they didnt have room and then offered no recourse we had to argue for that too and was only given a refund on his massage. We had 90mins between our pedicures and our massages they parked us in the un relaxation room with no instruction about retrieving us to use the spa during our wait time. 30mins later I asked and was met with an excuse "we were waiting for your feet to dry" then an apology about how busy they were and forgot, which is it :-/. I def'ly did not appreciate shuffling through the hotel in my robe lugging a beach tote of my belongings up an elevator down a hall to be met by blaring urban music with commercials while in the locker room. Music with objectionable lyrics that i wouldnt play at home and wouldnt let my children listen to. honestly guys you cant afford $4/ month commercial free pandora. Again we were separated as the saunas are in the locker rooms. Had it not been for the sentiment behind the gesture this would have been a total wash. I will not recommend your hotel for anything to anyone.
Ordered online. Waited almost an hour for our food. There was quite a line but they we're only helping one person at a time. Got home with cold food and a messed up order. Thankfully the manager stepped up and refunded our order. But after reading all the poor reviews, it makes me wonder if corporate doesn't care about this store.
This place is as corrupt as it gets. It is sickening. All the dancers HATE you. don't be fooled. It is expensive and they will gladly take your money for 2 minutes 30 seconds. It is a trap. They condone RAPE. RAPE! isn't that serious enough to stay away. If you go you are part of the problem.
This man was insensitive, and uncaring. He does not allow for any time for patient questions or concerns. He has no interest in the patients thoughts on their care or extended history that is of similar concern. This man is in desperate need of an ego check and had reduced himself to a pill pusher and appointment fee collector. I will never allow his input in my case again.
Rude front desk, uncaring doctor who just gave me antibiotics without checking to see what was actually wrong. I finished the antibiotics and only got worse, so I went to the nearby minute clinic at the CVS. The people there were kind, caring, and properly diagnosed pneumonia, then gave me the treatment plan. My suggestion, go to the CVS minute clinic nearby instead. Its cheaper, faster, nicer, and they act more like doctors.
None
At first I thought this was a nice place but I was wrong. I went there to have 2 tires replaced and three studs fixed. That is of course a major repair but I could not believe it would take 15hours to do. I dropped off the car at around before noon and I was able to get it at 3pm the next day. I was so irritated because they first told me that it would take 2-3 hours and it kept going on and on. I had to go back to wait twice. I think the technicians are very incompetent or just a poor services. They are the worst. Just do not take your car there, unless if you have a lot of money and no plans.
Do not trust this company! They came, spent 20 minutes, charged me $207 to tell me my compressor was out and I needed a $4500+ entire new unit. Got a second opinion and found out they had removed the capacitor from my unit and took it with them. This made getting an opinion from another company difficult (which I am sure was the idea!). When I called & demanded my capacitor back, I was given one that was not from my unit. They also gave me two different stories as to why I had to replace my entire unit and not just the compressor. Stories turned out to be false. Will never do business with Fowler again!
Went there last night for a sinus infection. Had never been there before, told the front desk that I've had many sinus infections in past, was so congested that I couldn't eat or drink, and only needed an antibiotic to clear the infection. I'm retired, but don't qualify for medicare yet; don't have insurance, no primary physician, and asked for a rough estimate of cost. Told it would depend on what was done. That's when I should have left, suffered through another night, and gone somewhere else today. I didn't undress, no blood-work or imaging done. Nurse took my vitals, doctor looked in throat and ears, listened to my chest for 10 seconds, and typed out two prescriptions. The bill was $209, and I paid by credit card. One prescription cost $50 so I only had the $29 prescription filled. My daughter had called another convenient care center in Columbia that quoted her a very reasonable price, but they would have closed before I could get there. Patient First refuses to give any kind of estimate and then hits you with a ridiculous bill!!! I'll never return! I pay my bills, and promptly; however, I feel Patient First's practices are deceptive, and they take advantage of people requiring medical attention.
2 horas para que llegue el delivery. FAIL
Although the food was very good Italian...wine was sour.... and the waiters took plates away bf food was finished....I had a piece of bread on my small plate.and it was scooped up bf I could say anything...never felt so rushed at a dining place...perhaps this is the Midwest....would not recommend if you are a foodie and want to enjoy it
None
This place is horrible. They are quick to get your exam done for contact lenses but won't even check if i got the correct prescription. I stopped by the next day to make sure my contact prescription were correct because i had blurry vision. I had to schedule an appointment for next week. I just wanted to make sure i had the correct prescription contacts.
I wish someone would answer the phone. I always get on hold messages. This time I waited 10 minutes and no one ever answered. From reading the reviews online, service seems to suck consistently.
This place is terrible - disorganized, dirty and not a calm atmosphere. Price is not everything and better to pay a bit more for a proper and professional job than waste your money at this awful establishment. I had an initial appointment for a shellac manicure which was confirmed the previous day. I stressed to the receptionist that I only had a 40 minute window which she confirmed would be fine. I arrived and was told that I had to wait 30 minutes as they could not fit me in. My appointment was rescheduled and when I showed up the second time, I again waited for about 15 minutes before they put me in the pedicure room. There was no table and someone came and tried to remove my current shellac and in the process, spilled acetone on my handbag and pants. I asked to move to the manicure room, which was dirty. The manicurist had no idea how to remove shellac, and spent 45 minutes trying to take it off. I asked for my nails to be cut and filed and she cut one nail down so short it started to bleed. I didn't even stay for the whole manicure - as soon as my nails were filed and buffed, I left in disgust.
I have taken our vehicles here for service for years without questioning their recommendations ... but no more. The reader's digest version ... over a 2 year period they continually mis-diagnosed a heating problem in our Acura 1.7 el (a car you think they'd know about as it's basically an upscale Civic) costing me literally thousands of dollars in service until the engine finally blew a gasket. After the fact I talked to a Honda trained mechanic who based on the description of the original symptoms responded by describing the symptoms as the situation escalated right up to & including the blown gasket ... all without seeing the car and only hearing my explanation of the original symptoms. Had I gone to this guy in the first place it would have saved me enough to buy a decent used car. ... This situation especially bothers me as he said this issue with the engine is not an uncommon one and easily diagnosed & treated. I am not impressed with Oakville Honda's missed diagnosis and failure to make things right after the fact.
This was a very bad first experience with this place. I called them to schedule an oil change appointment and durning the phone call I asked the representative that I'd like to skip giving the address part so I don't get lots of mails from them. Then he just became an a-hole about the whole thing and starting being so rude. He made it seem that they have no openings that day (even though I called early in the morning) and threw me to the next day. Had to cancel and choose another dealer place.
Go here if you 1) Don't speak english 2) Like paying twice the going rate 3) Generally hate your life This place is horrible. I paid $11 for a book of forever stamps when it should cost $8.80 each. That's a 25% markup! For what?! I also paid twice as much to mail a flat rate priority mail box. Again, why such a high markup? Lastly, the owner is SLOOOOW! Like Mongoloid child slow. Took about 15 minutes to ship one package.
Gave me and my wife food poisoning, corporate said it "couldn't be them" when there is no possible way it wasn't. Never again.
HORRIBLE SERVICE, Tea DRINK SMELT LIKE SHIT!! I do not recommend this place. Long wait, long ordering time, nothing was consistent. People were being seated at dirty table. Btw this is on feb 14, 2014. NEVER GOING BACK TO THIS PLACE EVER
I called Washington Natural Gas in Everett for new Gas Furnace replacement quote when my existing one was broken. They came over and recommended me a new 2 stage, variable speed Goodman gas furnace with a quote of 6392.00 USD. After 17% rebate the price went down to 5810.00 USD and they said that was the best proposal. I initially accepted that proposal because I did not know the price of the Goodman furnace. However, after checking out the furnace and full installation online ($1300 USD for the same model), I realized that I was ripped off by Everett Washington Natural Gas then I cancelled the offer.
None
Extremely unhelpful. Sloppy. Extremely rude. Not recommended. After the a couple of outright insulting phone conversiations I went elsewhere..
I will never waste my money there again! After 30 minutes of being there my daughter fell in a unsecured access in the pirate ship. She was cut and bruised very badly. They didn't apologize or offer a refund, they just made excuses. It was overly crowded and run by a bunch of teenagers. It cost me $136 for 4 people to get in and we didn't even get to enjoy ourselves! WHAT A WASTE!!!
I just paid close to $20 for a single pizza with four toppings only to have a plain pizza delivered! Worse even is that I'm trying to get in touch with them and they just keep placing me on hold. This is downright ridiculous! I know they have caller ID and they are just letting the phone ring. I was literally on hold once for TEN minutes. They are going to make me get dressed and drive down there personally.
Bar qui avait l'air sympa et qui finalement ne l'a plus été ... barman fouteur de merde et irrespectueux!
Stay away from this company! They installed my system and after 1 year it needed maintenance. It needed maintenance the following 2 years as well and we were charged for every visit, finally they figured out that it was clogged with debris and they tried to charge us $1500 to fix it! After a year of pushing them to fix it they fixed it for free. Next year same thing!!!! system was totally clogged and they refused to even look at it without charging for maintenance. We had to pay over $500 for them to fix it again. These people have no understanding of decent customer service. We LOVE heating our pool with the sun, and when it works it is great, but they installed our system inappropriately and blamed us for it at every step. Find another company these people are rude, unfriendly and will take every opportunity to fleece you.
Tried to call and make an appointment for an oil change. Waited on hold for 10 minutes. People would periodically answer and then put me back on hold. This happened 4 times! I hung up and booked somewhere else. CRAP SERVICE DON'T WASTE YOUR TIME
Gotten so expensive now...would rather eat at nicer place for same or less. Waitstaff is excellent though...
These are NOT a luxury apartments! The neighbors don't follow the quiet hours from 10pm to morning. Fighting, partying, sex, and smoking is what my neighbors do religiously. The management will charge you for anything and everything after you move out! The old plywood of the cabinets are peeling and crumbling. The hinges of the cabinet doors are rusty. You need to know that there is nothing luxury about this place.
On 12th March i phoned these clowns for an Radiator,Headlight and Bonnet-£144 which they took straight out ma bank saying the parts will be with you tomorrow,tomorrow came and went,then back on the phone i went to speak with another clown saying theres a problem with the parts and they were getting from someone else and they said it would be with me by the end of the week,nothing came yet again so i phone on Saturday 22nd March to say my parts will be with me by Tuesday 25th March,guess what no parts and its Wednesday now,i phoned them yet again and every time they keep on saying there putting me through to someone who's dealing with my parts and every time keeps putting the phone down,what a bunch of CLOWNS these are DO NOT PURCHASE ANYTHING FROM THEM.
Worse DQ ever! They are way over priced. They water down the ice cream and the hard shell dip. They NEVER get the order right and argue with you if you try to sort it out. It is never clean and the staff is rude. I love Dairy Queen but this location in Maricopa is horrible. The price of an ice cream cone is about 70¢ more than in Phoenix. One time I ordered 2 double bacon cheeseburger combos and when I got home I only got 2 tiny burgers and when I went to sort out the order, they argued with me and said I'd have to pay the difference. When I told her (shift manager) I paid $18 for for the 2 combos, she refused to give me my food. She asked for my receipt and I told her "you never gave me one".
Cold showers every morning. Single rooms don't have toilets in them. 1/2 the lights in my room don't work.
Its extremely dirty, and they kicked my girlfriend out saying "we warned you 4 times not to drink to much" when she wasn't even told once. Money wasted.
Service by workers was great but they couldn't get my card to run thru even with the driver there listening to my call and knowing i had more than enough money in the back the office worker was belittling and yelling for him to get the money, did i mention it was to bring my fiance to see me in the VA hospital after being hurt on the job, company has no sympathy and don't deserve anyone's service if they cant keep their cool with a Veteran in the Hospital
Müllt Briefkästen mit unerwünschter Werbung zu, trotz Kleber mit der Aufschrift "Keine Werbung"
Had some bad ranch and tried to get another, the manager accused me of lying and refused to get me another, refunded me $.75 and sat there like a child refusing to get me another ranch, like I made it up because I was bored. What a horrible experience, I'll go around the corner. WIngstop needs to close this franchise.
Bad Service. For the most part of the time that I was a frequent Dri cleaning service was great for the price you pay, but there have been times that garments that state "Dri Clean only" have been returned with "wet wash" tags on them and some dri cleaned clothing had noticable stains. The worst part of my time is them losing my Ralph Lauren slacks. There Policy (as told by one of the Cashiers) is that they have 30 days to look for the missing garments. If not found they would put in for a "missing garments refund request" , this paperwork is suppost to goto the General Manager for processing and can take up to 10 days. In my experience After the total of 40 days with no updates the person in charge is just now reviewing security tapes. Since the lost of my slacks i have not used them for my Dri cleaner. Cashier customer service is bad, they argue with each other including on site manager (if there is even one there) I rated them 1 stars because for the price you pay actual dri cleaning services are decent, but customer service and sound lose pervention practices Im not a fan
Bad customer service and very misinformative! Will not be coming back here. There use to be a lot of good salesperson there but I guess things have changed.
Hardest place to find. After 5 years finally found it almost thought it didn't exist. Went on a crazy long ride all around the airport just to park. Sont bother looking for this place you waste more gas getting therw than just pulling over on the side of the road
I don't understand how this place pays rent. Terribly inauthentic. My beef came doused in soy sauce. Neither a Sichuanese restaurant nor a Chinese. Shouldn't have expected more from a Chinese restaurant serving sushi.
None
La position indiquée ne correspond pas à la ZI des Eaux Blanches :(
9/22/13 Just ordered two burgers to go.... All I can say is bland. The Guacamole Burger and the Sauteed Shroom were both tasteless although the Mushroom burger was far better. I added a patty to each (Monster), but that didn't matter. We also ordered a side of their mack n' cheese....stay away from that. It was just cooked macaroni with melted cheese pored on top. I've had better "gourmet" macaroni off the shelf from the grocery store. For $28 (no drinks), I expected better.
The WORST expierence for shopping for a mattress here. Salesman did not listen to our needs and tried to shove a mattress down our throats that was twice our budget. Go to Orange County Mattress on Edginger instead and ask for Phil, he was wonderful!!
Do not stay here. I found a bed bug crawling in my bed. I notified the office it took them several hours to change my room. Then I gave them the bed bug as proof. After I checked out they called me and said that what I saw was a water bug and that I must have brought it in my luggage. I would NEVER RECOMMEND this BED BUG INFESTED HOTEL!!!
I went to see this doctor with my wife for simple immunizations shots as we were traveling abroad for two months. We were told he doesn't take insurance after the fact of getting the injections. That it would be $600 out of pocket, which is completely overpriced but again Health Care system is corrupt. I paid 100% of the bill upfront. I came home after our trip to find out Dr. Daniel Caplivski, MD decided to charge us even more money. This wasn't discussed and you should beware of this doctor he will SCAM you! He is now trying to earn an extra $300 extra after the services was completed and paid for. He will take advantage of people, avoid at all cost. AVOID like the plague.
Scam!!! I would not trust them at all and would drive miles away for a car service. After moving from another state to FL, I googled several car service places. Since this place had a very good rating and it is so close to my work, I tried it. I was told that my car battery will need to be replaced SOON. Since this battery has 6 yrs warranty and it was less than 3 years old, I decided to ignore their recommendation. That was 6 months ago!!! After 6 months of driving, I still have no problem at all with my battery. I'm so glad that I considered their recommendation as a scam.
None
Lors du dernier entretient de ma chaudière, début juillet 2013 (sous contrat), le technicien m'a informé que 2 pièces étaient à remplacer. Après 6 relances de ma part pour obtenir un devis, je le reçois par FAX le 4 oct 2013 et la personne m'informe que si je suis pressé, il vaut mieux le valider par e-mail, ce que je fais. J'en suis maintenant à 3 e-mail et un appel téléphonique, mais je ne sais toujours pas si l'intervention aura lieu et si je vais pouvoir rallumer le chauffage quand il fera froid dans quelques jours... Mise à jour : Le 24 Oct le technicien est intervenu... Oufff ! Je n'aurai pas froid cet hiver.
My girlfriends car was reposed this morning at 4:30 a.m. The car bill was under a bankruptcy order. You violated this agreement for one. She recently lost her father and lost part of a leg in addition to dealing with a son with cancer. In effect, they left us high and dry in already difficult times. Morally and ethically they totally lack in their policies. You will be hearing from me real soon and you will make this right or be in court for the rest of your natural corporate life.
stay away from this place. no ac, bad management, lived here for two year. Roaches everywhere, bedbugs from neighbor. asked for moved out inspection and manager did the inspection by herself without us present, keep security deposit and charged us for all repairs. carpet cleaning and replacement $700, damage due to pest control,( heat treat our apptment three times from bedbugs).. STAYAWAY FROM THIS PLACE!!!!!
Although if you would like to hear how the owner will, "chew me up one side and down the other.", then visit the shop on a Sunday evening around 5:45pm and try to buy their merchandise with a VISA.
LAMENTABLE !! Payé cher pour une livraison sous 24h, et 48h après colis non reçu, car ADRESSE INTROUVABLE !!! Leur GPS ne devait pas fonctionner .... nous recevons des colis toutes les semaines, et nos invités ont toujours trouvé la maison ... Et pour une réclamation : et bien on peut toujours envoyer un courrier (papier bien sûr ...) UNE HONTE !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Car had brakes that were just as bad as the customer service. Had to use engine braking to get down the mountain. No grace period given. I'll never rent Dollar again.
Took my money but failed to deliver any of the goods purchased. Failed to deliver my vanities 3 times and made me take 3 days of work to wait for the delivery. Spoken to customer service manager John, who is incompetent, rude and refused to offer any help or advice on resolving the issue. Never would purchase anything at this store again!
Had a package shipped to me, from a supplier that I've purchased from before, with no issues. However, the package tracking showed it was delivered, and it was not. After making a call to USPS customer service and UPS (as they were the original shipper before it was handed off to USPS), I called the local post office after getting many different answers saying things from, "we made a report and we'll contact you after we investigate it" which never happened, and "The package shows it's at the post office". But still, the tracking number showed it was "Delivered". So I went to the post office and sure enough, it was there. Why would they keep the tracking for the package showing delivered if they had it in house at their facility?!? I believe the carrier for it was a moron, saw the UPS shipping label which showed the post office address, and thought it was a package for the post office, when ACTUALLY the label BELOW it which has USPS's own label, that it was supposed to go to my apartment. Re-delivery was never attempted. It was a week later when I finally retrieved it. There wasn't even a signature required. I've come to the realization that government employees are a bunch of morons (less teachers, they are generally not). Plus the lady at the counter was short tempered with me even though I was being NICE and SINCERE when dealing with such a STUPID business. They have one job; to deliver mail. And they can't even do it right. I wonder what else of mine is sitting in there I'm unaware of that doesn't have tracking on it........ I will never know.
They need to learn how to make a hot beverage.
Normally, we have gotten good service but today we waited a long time just to get cold food. The manager took our food back and got us new meals. The manager was very good. The server was terrible.
Food sucks, no flavor, tastes old. Service was good though.
BEWARE! They are incompetent and dishonest. After mis-diagnosing my car and charging me over $1700 my car is still not fixed. They refuse to give me a refund or repair it properly. Check their bad records with the better business bureau and the state attorney general. Save your money, go elsewhere!
None
Some friends and I came here on my birthday to grab some quick food before going out. The drinks were really watered down and expensive, plus they took forever to get to the table after we saw them sitting at the bar well for five minutes. The food was very unappealing. I got boneless wings, and they tasted like cheap, frozen, microwaved imitation chicken. My friend asked our server for extra ranch four times, then went up to the bartender to ask, and never got it. After we got back to my house, we all got sick and weren't even able to have a good night. Birthday ruined!! Enough of my vent, long story short; food sucked, service sucked, I'm not dining there again..
Garbage collected at night between 4 and 5 am making so much noise! We were woken up every night while stayed there, even with our windows closed.
My student records were given to the National College Advisory Board, and now every single college demands my transcripts from this school, although I only attended for some vocational courses I never ended up completing. When I tried to inquire about it I was not met with informed people, and I still have not had a conversation about my rights to privacy, before I was indoctrinated into this database, which does not serve the interests of students, only the institutions, as if they need any help. When I called the school I was told that the lady I needed to talk to was out of her office, so I went to the school and when I got there she was in her office and very stand offish with me, and told me that we could talk about my issue in the hallway, to which I responded "That is unprofessional" and so I demanded some answers in a professional setting. I was very surprised, but these people are hiding things from the public with the way they handle your education. Don't be surprised if you do poorly here that it will follow you like a ball and a chain for the rest of your life.
Left multiple messages for a period of 2 weeks and the only got the typical business excuse "He is extremely busy". So am I so I will take my other 6 vehicles somewhere else that knows what customer service involves with a simple acknowledgment of a return phone call. I will make sure I inform my other colleagues to avoid this Sub-Standard Business.
I ordered a complete set of furniture, and received 80% of my set. I was told the chaise lounge would be delivered the following week. It's been 3 weeks & still no chaise! When I called, I was told that "I just have to wait" even though I have already paid! Rude customer service that professes carelessness about dissatisfied customers. BUYER BEWARE!
pésimo servicio ni el chat ni el mail ni el call center , terrible
Very bad experience. I would say worst customer reception that I have ever experienced. Very pushy on duty manager and he even did not know how to interact with customer. Definitely not recommended. !! BIG NO !!
Did not liek
None
The Comet Cleaners on Camp Bowie near Tom Thumb has managed to ruin and shrink every dress shirt I have. This adds up to thousands of dollars. I am very careful with my clothes. I have collected fine shirts over the years and taken good care of them. When I moved and could no longer use my regular cleaners, I tried Comet. My clothing kept getting smaller and smaller. The sleeves were drawn up, the shirts wouldn't button. They had not been dry clean but laundered. When I finally figured out it was not me and it WAS the clothes I took them back in. The woman working said that I should have tried the clothes on the day after I got them back. She did not offer to replace any of the shirts, accused me of telling her to dry clean them, and only offered to rerun them. Like that would help? Buyer beware, this is the worst experience I have ever had.
I would have liked to see on google that it is closed on Mondays!!! I drove a looooong way to go there and it was closed!! I won't be back tho-
Una verga
I find it hard to believe that a progressive company like Google would support a front group, ALEC, that is attempting to roll back our civil rights. It doesn't make any sense.
the number mentioned here they never receive the phone please update the number
Infiniti is currently running a promotion on 2013 G37x coupes to make room for the new 2014 Q 60s. I had called four dealerships to see if they had any 2013 G37s in stock but was left disappointed. Finally, I called Infiniti of Massapequa and spoke Brandon who assured me they have two in stock and quoted me a price over the phone. I was planning on doing an early lease termination on my 2010 Nissan Altima in which Nissan Motor Acceptance Corporation (NMAC) was going to cover up to three months of my payments. Brandon had said he needed confirmation from NMAC and would call me back. Knowing I would eventually have to make my way to the dealership I drove the 45 minutes to Infiniti of Massapequa since I was still waiting to hear back. Upon my arrival I come to find that Brandon is no longer there and they do not have any of that car in stock. So, i politely asked the salesman on the phone, Randy, to contact him about the numbers he quoted me over the phone. For some reason Randy became a bit hostile and said he has no way of contacting Brandon. At that point I had asked to speak to a sales manager. I explained my dilemma and frustration to the manager who said they can still locate the vehicle and Randy can sit down with me and give me a quote. As soon as we sit down he starts to sell me on numbers way above the promotion and for a higher lease term (red flag right there). Then he asked what Brandon had quoted me and when I tell him he basically calls me a liar in not so many words and excuses himself to go speak to his manager. He returns saying his sales manager spoke to Brandon (but i thought there was no way of reaching him since they were so adamant about that before) and he definitely did not give me that quote. I asked Randy why would I drive almost an hour out of my way to waste my time and his and he became hostile once again. Now, having worked in the service industry in a management role, I can confidently say that this was the worst display of customer service I have ever experienced in any capacity. I understand they're car salesmen and I shouldn't be expecting much but it was so bad I wouldn't even refer to it as customer service (I'd call it what it is - hostile customer relations). This experience makes me never want to even consider Nissan or Infiniti again. It's left that much of a bad taste in my mouth.
Pathetic human being and a pathetic doctor. i would never recommend anyone to him, not even my enemy. He is highly unprofessional and doesn't know how to deal with people and specials females. Don't even waste your time going to this doctor. There are way better doctors in the area than this.
Had bad experience with sales. They lie and use sleazy salesman tactics.
My letter of complaint to Loews Royal Pacific Hotel: To: Loews Royal Pacific Hotel, My family recently stayed at your resort and had many instances of bad customer service during our stay. We are extremely disappointed with how things were handled. I want to bring to your attention the following complaints in hopes that you will use this information to work on improving your customer service. While your property is indeed beautiful and in a great location- it does not compensate for the following aspects of inexcusable customer service. *Our party made our reservation at the Portofino Bay property online. Upon arriving at the Portofino, we were told that there was a 'glitch' in our online reservation and that we were being transferred to your Royal Pacific property. We were told that this has happened more than once before. *When we arrived at the Royal Pacific, we told the front desk that we needed adjoining rooms- As we were a party of eight and reserved two rooms. We were told that there was not two adjoining rooms currently available, but if we would like to wait to check in at 4PM, than they would have two ready for us. (This was at 11AM) When 4PM came around, we returned to the front desk to check in. We were then notified that the two adjoining rooms were still not available and that the only option would be two rooms close to each other. How is it possible that after five hours- it was impossible to fulfill this promise? Your employees knew that we were waiting on the property for these rooms. *We accepted the two rooms next to each other. We had to repeatedly ask the maids in the hallway to keep it down. They would yell to each other down the hall to each other instead of simply walking to where the other employee was to speak with them privately. *One morning, we decided to have breakfast at the Islands Restaurant. We had the buffet. We did not see our server until she appeared to give us our bill a the end of the meal. My husband had to go to the server drink station to get his own coffee and juice. My husband and I have both been in the service industry for +35 years combined. This incident was completely ridiculous.. We were appalled by this. *My husband had the fish tacos at your poolside restaurant. (He is an Executive Chef for Nordstrom.) Your price of $14 for this meal is astronomical for the amount of food that you receive. *For the amount that you charge for a room, internet should be a complimentary service. Cell phone service was horrible at your property, also. The next time we will be in Orlando, we will not be returning to your property.
South Indian speciality..
MH370
This is a beautiful venue, but the customer service is pathetic. My family got a lane and we were completely ignored by the waiter. So, we went to get our own drinks. We all wanted food badly and the waiter continued to ignore us. I flagged down the manager who apologized. He said he would give us a complimentary "Loaded Fry" entree, it never came. On the way out, the manager apologized one more time, and I said, "It's ok, I understand". Another family member said, "No it's not ok", and he continued to blast the manager about the lack of service. The upper manager said to my family member, "Your're Intoxicated"... Well in any case, I wasn't intoxicated, and there is no doubt that the management here leaves something to be desired. It is evident when you walk into this location that nobody cares. It's quite sad because the place is beautiful. I would love to return, but I don't think I can after this. I've been to plenty of bowling alley's in our area where the customer service is really great. These managers need more training, or else the staff is poorly paid... I'm not sure, but something isn't right.
They were supposed to coordinate with us to trim our tree per an arrangement with our neighbor. He calls at 7:30am, leaves no voicemail and proceeds to chainsaw the tree at 9am on the same day. After confronting him about the lack of coordination he said he would cut anything he sees fit and there was nothing we could do about it. Horrible experience, extremely unprofessional, argumentative, belligerent... there aren't enough adjectives to describe the level of disrespect shown by MNM Tree Service. Avoid at all costs!!!
Reserved a limo and they never showed up. This was a Sunday. They don't provide a contact number of a driver or answer their phones. If you run a limo service you should be available on the phone for 7 days a week, if not then provide an emergency number where the customer can contact you! I would never use this service again.
None
Horrible people with the same mentality....the girl was rude to me and so was the staff...also too ignorant to understand an address told 3 times and never told me they did not have a credit card machine
My husband was the main subs on the job below and was not paid by the work he did by Jack and Lori. Lori is a liar and everything the homeowner stated is true. They bill a homeowner and have material delivered to there home then take it and other supplies to another property and bill them also. They say all the subs are paid but they aren't. They owe is $12000 for the job listed on this site. DO NOT USE THEM THEY ARE CROOKS!!
Bait and switched me on a property I owned and did a treatment that was not authorized by me, then started to have a tantrum over the phone when I refused to pay the extorted rate that he was trying to charge me. I only wanted a termite certification, luckily he had someone who was in the office who had some sense who apologized for Bill's behavior. I would not recommend this company based on my experience.
Don't bother having a maintenance issue after Noon at Prentice Park in Madison, and don't expect Gorman to have your back either. Their office hours are a farce. They come and go as they please, if ever to return at all. I had a living room heater go out at 3 PM on a Thursday in 0 degree weather and couldn't get a hold of a soul in the office (that claims they close at 5). When I called Gorman Corporate direct about an hour later, I was told to call their after hours emergency maintenance staff (again, they allegedly close the normal office at 5). When someone from the after hours staff finally got a hold of me at 6 PM, I was told they wouldn't be coming out to fix the heater, but provide a space heater, bringing a new and interesting twist to the word "maintenance." They then inquired whether my situation was life threatening, which I said "no, the base board heaters are still working in the bedrooms." I was then told that the "maintenance" person wouldn't bring the space heater, and to crank my base boards in the bedrooms to full blast to compensate for the lack of heat in the living room, and that someone would come look at it tomorrow. Keep in mind heat and electricity are NOT included in the rent! When I asked if he could still bring the space heater because it is QUITE cold in here, I was then told I would be charged for his time to come out, not Gorman!!! If you're thinking of renting Gorman, make SURE you bring your cash (lord knows you need it!!), but make sure to leave any expectations of anyone giving a damn about you at your last residence!!!
I will never eat there again! I called to make a reservation for 10 people and received an attitude from the female who answered the phone and the same after requesting the manager. It seamed like I was an inconvenience by calling ahead to advise that 9 adults and a 10 month old baby would be eating there. Too bad because we frequented the place since it opened. They must not need business.
these guys are a joke. i went there cause they had a huge selection of frames. however i soon found out the employees that work there are snobs. even the manager lady is a jerk. also my apparently "bulletproof" polycarbonate lenses were scratched and now even though they are under warranty i have to pay 160 bucks to replace them? no thanks. if you want to be pushed around by a bunch of bitchy women this is the place for you! ill go buy some frames off zenni optical (greatest website ever) and get free lenses....all for 25 bucks.
I recently called Clearwater Pediatric Care to make an appointment for my two-month old daughter. I had not found a pediatrician yet that I liked, but had heard good things about Dr. Pai and his office from several friends. When talking on the phone, however, I was told by the receptionist after she had questioned me about where my child had been born and which newborn tests had been performed (she was a natural homebirth and I had chosen to waive the vitamin K-shot and we hadn't done the hearing screen, only the PKU, which was fine) that the office did not accept home birth babies as their patients. This both confused and upset me as I did not see a good legitimate reason for this sort of discrimination. I emailed the office asking for an explanation and this is what answer I received: "Hello, It is our office policy that all our newborns have to have had the Newborn Hearing Screen, the Newborn PKU Testing, and the Vitamin K injection at birth. We have found that majority of babies born at home have not had any of these procedures done and we feel they are vital to newborn care. We have also found, from past experience, that the parent's of home birth babies would bring their baby to the first visit and we would then not see them again for 6 months or even longer. Newborns need numerous checkups during the first year (the first few days of life, 2 weeks of age, 2 months, 4 months, 6 months, 9 months, 12 months, etc) in order to make sure they are growing and developing correctly. These are the reasons we are not accepting babies born from home. I hope I explained that well enough and it didn't lower our office in your eyes. I do wish you all the luck in finding a doctor for your sweet baby. Thank you, Tracy Clearwater Pediatric Care" I guess it all boils down to "homebirth babies aren't good business."
About to be on my 4th device with CSPIREs internet service. When my 3rd device was replaced I had a huge spike in my service that no one could explain. Took me two days of going back and forth with CSPIRE, being hung up on, no one ever calling me back to get this taken care of. Needless to say, I have had enough with this service and its many issues. CSPIRE has the nerve to tell me that they will not waive the early termination fee of my contract now that I am out of my 1 year warranty period and I have another broke device that I have to fix. How many will there be in the next year of service. I will not be finding out because now, I will be discontinuing all my service! I stuck it out for one year with this device and have been through 3 of them. Service was never reliable and I was charged an enormous amout in december that no one could explain. I highly recommend using a different provider!!!!
This AMPM have the rudest, laziest, gang-like workers behind the counter. It looks like they've been picked from a Mexican street gang and slapped on an AMPM uniform. Several times they short changed us but didn't not apologize and acted as if it's a norm to cheat customers! The only reason this place gets customers is its gas prices are relatively lower than others in the area. ARCO should yank their license or do something before the employees of this place start shooting at customers!
A nice place to view the dramatically beautiful Royal Scottish Baronial Town Hall.
Stopped by on a whim. Thought it was going to be an actual Cafe. Turned out to be more high end priced food - Italian mostly but everything else reflected German. The waitstaff was standing around by the bar eating the bar nuts with the bartender. The kitchen is visible. One of the cooks was making smiley faces with an onion ring to the waitress, then put sauce on it and ate it right in front of all the diners. Didn't wash his hands afterwards. Flies everywhere - probably because the cooks were having a smoke out back when we got there with the back door wide open. My Daughters cheese fries had a hair in it. I sent it back and asked for another. No apologies or visit from the Manager (if there is one) and when the waiter brought it back he said "Here you go, nice clean fries". REALLY? Waiter offered my kids root beer and then brought bottles of root beer at $3.50 a piece. Somebody didn't bother to drain the pasta for my chicken parm so it was watery on the bottom. Left paying waay too much money for crappy food and service. Also was grossed out and didn't eat for the rest of the day. AVOID THIS PLACE AT ALL COST.
This place screwed up our order, had terrible service with over priced bad tasting food that is not filling.
Myself and my wife ordered the Pollo Carbonara and the Pollo Avocado & Fungi Penne. All I can say is that the chicken in both of these dishes was just terrible! And there wasn't even a hint of avocado in the Pollo Avocado & Fungi Penne. And the pasta was not even of home-cooked quality. It seems to me that the chicken is cooked in a very asian style. The meal was probably the most un-Italian meal I've ever eaten at an Italian restaurant.
None
The people at Al Lamb's Honda treat you like kings when they want you to purchase a bike from them. However, after the sale, you really don't exist. I purchased a bike 2 months ago and I still haven't received my license plate and my temporary tag has expired. Called them several times inquiring about the license and I get the same response each time. The response is "give me your name and I will put your name on the list and someone will call you back". Well my name should be on that list several times by now and still no return call. I finally asked to speak to the manager and he gives me some excuse about the person responsible for the the tags was on vacation. I heard that same story for 3 weeks. Then he told me that they are just now processing registrations again (as if to say it was because of the government shut down) and I don't believe federal workers are processing registrations for the state of Texas. I definitely won't be a repeat customer at Al Lamb's Honda. I get my license plates from other dealers within 2 to 3 weeks, not sure why they can't get things to the state in a timely manner. I checked my VIN number on the TXDOT website and it doesn't even appear. So I don't even think they filed my paperwork yet. I've sent a complaint letter to the folks at TXDOT, we'll see how it goes. In the meantime, not license plate for my bike.
If you have hours and hours of free time this is the place for you. Staff don't answer the phone, they leave you on hold and then hang up without speaking. You can grow a beard in the waiting room and then be moved into an examination room to grow some more. I assume these guys are printing money and therefore do not to need to treat patients as people if not they are just badly managed. Such a shame
Bad portion size, bad food, very expensive
Attitude problem with one of the staff OMG!!!! NO NEED AT ALL!!!!
The service was horrible, after waiting for our food over 30 minutes the food finally came and it wasn't all it was priced to be. Once we were done eating the waiter didn't care to acknowledge our table until 15 minutes later when he noticed we were getting up to pay in the front. We were so upset we took the check and paid the rude lady in the front, which was in a hurry and made it seem like everyone was disturbing her. Horrible service. I would not recommend this place to anyone, stay away! Horrible SERVICE, and too over priced for NOTHING!
crummy service, rude staff, inflated prices. Was having 4 tires replaced on my car, told them I wanted to keep my old tires because they still had tread left, and to avoid their "disposal fee". Surprise! They claim to have thrown out my old tires, "but don't worry, we didn't charge you".... surprise again - there is a "shop fee" on my receipt to the tune of the disposal fee. I'm sure, from the vibe i got about the place, that they also kept my old tires to sell to other customers. 2 times while i was waiting, a member of their redneck staff came out and quoted a ridiculous price for some no-name tire to a lady who had a flat. Buy your tires from TireRack, and avoid this place!
I went to the nearest PEP Boys while I was traveling as I detected something wrong with my front end. Since I just had my brakes done a month ago at another location in Florida, I thought they could make sense of it as the brake light kept coming on. They were nice a polite but could not identify the problem, first thinking it was electrical and I insisted it was mechanical. The manager and I went on a brief test drive after the vehicle had sat almost an hour and cooled down. The noise would only slightly duplicate and he felt it was safe to continue my travel. Not a couple of miles away after leaving the noise returned (obviously from heated expanding metal). I found a Good Year dealer in the area who put their finger right on it. My right front spindle was torn up, right rotor was being eaten up and brakes affected as well. Had I continued my trip, my wheel would have come off my axle in a short time. For oil changes and tires, PEP Boys are great, but they should not be in the general repair business. For example, while I was waiting over an hour, their was a mechanic hammering away at two license plate bolts trying to get the old rusted bolts off. Over an hour of labor to deal with two screws???
I was told to come personally and meet the CEO in the office. But then, after brief introductory session, I was informed that I have to dole out hefty amount 1.25% of expected CTC (?) as registration fee, another 1.25% after sometime and 10% at the time of getting offer letter. I simply said Namastay and walked out.
Called Nana's Pet Sitting in mid July to schedule a pet sitter for our two cats for Labor Day weekend; left a voice mail message. Five days later, no one had called me back, so I tried again, on a Monday. This time I spoke to the owner, Linda. She sounded rushed and tired. She said that she had just hired three new sitters, but was still very understaffed, and also said that she had been working 12-16 hours a day to keep the business afloat. She said that my name was on her desk to be called back later that day, or the next day. At the end of the conversation she said "If I don't call you back by Thursday, call again." I am not about to chase someone down to get their business. I went with the next business on my list, called Pampered Paws. This time I got a friendly owner who drove out to my house for a free consult and to meet our cats. I would not recommend Nana's unless the owner gets her act together in the future and follows up with potential customers.
HORRIBLE PLACE!! I'm not one to write reviews about places, but this was totally unacceptable. I ordered flowers for my wife for Valentines day. When she gets on on V-day, I asked her how she liked her flowers... She NEVER RECEIVED THEM! This of course puts me in bad situation where it now looks like I didn't do anything for her! To say the least this ruined our 2nd V-day together as a married couple. The VERY LEAST they could do was call me and let me know. Also when I called to complain, their response was "we shut our system down so we didn't get your order. Would you like us to send it to her today?" WTF? Seriously, like sending her flowers today will get me out of the dog house!! I WILL NEVER DO BUSINESS WITH THEM AGAIN, EVER.
I have been twice now and both experiences I thought were severely lacking. The first time i went with my fiance. We paid online for the range time (as I read how crowded it could be). Once we got there the cardboard signs that lead you around the where the single checkout was are kind of a joke. The older gentleman behind the counter acted like we were a bother to him (go figure paying clients a bother), then when we stated we needed to rent a pistol he simply said he could not leave the register to help us and it might be a long wait (now keep in mind the register is literally 5 feet away fro the case the rental guns are in and you have to pay for them at the register). He said we should go and check in at the range then come back to make sure the spot was open and waiting. We did as he instructed and were met with yet another employee that seemed like we were an inconvenience... once checked in we went back to the rental case/counter and waited for about 10 minutes to finally be helped. I asked for the XDM 9mm and the guy had a heck of a hard time finding it... he said I could have the XD and at that point I really didn't care... he pulled it out and when I looked at it I had to tell him that was the XDM. Fast forward to getting on the range.... it was dark, the only thing that worked was the devise to move the target down the range (no way to tell how far out you are or anything as they have the monitors locked out (and looked broken)...My fiance flat out said she felt the guys working there were creepy and rude (15 years of customer service management) I then decided to give them another try when my son came in for leave from the ARMY..... very similar issues (had to wait over 20 minutes for the rental this time) but my son even made a comment on how horrible their customer service skills were. This place is pretty close to my house and I would have loved to go there more often but I cannot put up with people who have zero customer service skills. While I am sure there are a couple there that know what they are doing the vast majority absolutely do not. Before anyone wants to comment that I should just buy a gun then (well thank you I do own one but wanted to rent another for the people that I brought and to try a different one myself for something new). I am from the Carolinas (lived in both North and South) and have been to some amazing ranges their and elsewhere on the east coast and southwest and this place has the worse customer service of any that I have been to. I will be avoiding it in the future and will take a longer drive to find one that has a clean, well light range with knowledgeable and helpful customer service. ---------------------------UPDATE 2/17/2014---------------------------------------------------------------------- I went buy yesterday (it is the closest place to me and there was a foretasted Snowstorm). I drove to the building and there was not a place to be able to park at all... there were even cars parked on the grass out front, I kept driving and ended up going to GAT up in Dundee.... I will never be back to Article 2 after the great experience at GAT. Large place with friendly service and a well lit (really well lit compared to Article 2) an overall great experience! I strongly suggest to head to any place other than here, they have 0 customer service ability and the range is ok at best. Take a longer drive and find one of the other, better, locations in the Chicago land area.
I was involved in a hostage situation at this Winn-Dixie! DANGEROUS PLACE!!!
I HATE even giving this company one star. They deserve none. After dealing with their unreliable, inaccessible, and rude landlord (named Libby), they are STILL only creating problems for me. They refused to take care of any maintenance, they never got back to my emails or phone calls, and they charge far too much for it to be worth it. After discovering black mold on the ceilings and under the carpet downstairs, it took them MONTHS to even return my call. My health suffered the entire year since I have already had sinus/respiratory issues my whole life. All three of my roommates at the time also suffered symptoms- none of which were any of Oak tree's concern. They have now cashed an old security check of mine from over a year ago that I already paid. I just had to fight to get hundreds of dollars back, and now I'm still trying to get reimbursed for overdraft fees. IF I CAN SAVE ANYONE from dealing with what I did (and still am) because of Oak tree- it would at least make it seem to me that a LITTLE good could come from this fraudulent encounter with a horrible company.
This was my favorite place to bring friends and family for late night drinks and the delicious streak sandwich. So why a one star rating? On a visit last night, after one drink, my son was carded. Which is fine. The problem is that my son is a bar owner in Puerto Rico, a U.S. territory. But the server and others at the Tornado evidently are unaware of this basic geographical fact. They believed that a Puerto Rican state I.D. was false. There are many layers of stupidity involved here. But it's a very pathetic level of ignorance for a bar to not recognize "foreign" identification. When it was pointed out to the manager by an attorney in this group that the manager was racist, the manager called the entire group of seven "assholes". There's more but it's for a civil suit to decide. In conclusion, if you're lily white and have a state I.D. from Wisconsin, you're ok. But if you're "foreign" or have darker skin....stay away. At least until the group protests are organized.
Me and My wife needed a vehicle and this was our first stop. She absolutely fell in love with this G6 which is the only reason I still purchased this vehicle. On the first test drive during braking I felt a vibration in the right front wheel. I told him to fix it and we will purchase it. Something like that can be a small thing like a rotor or tire out of balance. They told me it was the rotor, they put new front rotors on the vehicle, test driving I couldn't fell the vibrations as prominent. After two weeks we got a letter saying that we were denied the financing from the finance company. The dealership called and said it was our fault(I did have a repo with this company years ago) but the letter I got in the mail said that the paperwork took to long to process. The dealership told me it was because of the repo. Not certain which was which. So we went and resigned and the payments went up and apparently I was charged for a service contract worth 1495.00 - after I went to do taxes I found the fee for this service contract. When I called Bonham Chrysler they told me finance company put that charge on there and this had nothing to do with the dealership. So I called my finance company and they said the charges were third party not put on by them. They would send me a copy of it and will return the pro-rated amount. Every time I've dealt with Bonham Chrysler I've been lied to or misled by them please I urge you do not go to this dealership or pay for dealer add-ons make sure you know what the BANK said the interest rate was not what the dealership said the interest rate is. Do research and KNOW how this business works before you buy a new car... BTW I started selling cars 6 months after I bought mine. And learned how this industry works.
Bar com visual legal e chopp gelado e só. Banda tocando mais pagode do que samba de raiz. Fila interminável para pagar, somente dois caixas para atender centenas de pessoas. E o pior depois das 3 da manhã além de ficar esperando na fila, cortam o som, e não se pode consumir mais nada! Portanto você fica forçado a estar na fila e os garçons não estão autorizados a servir. Sistema louco e falta de respeito com o cliente.
This place does not even deserve one star. For starters these jacka**es are very rude. I was trying to get information on a few vehicles for my business and no one ever contacted me back. When I called prior to that I kindly asked for details on a certain vehicle and they just said come in. I live in Michigan and I won't waste my time driving there if I don't know something. I only found out about this place because my secretary searched for vehicles in Michigan for my company and and they showed up as Central Detroit. False advertisement. On another note I have a relative in the Better Business and he told me they have numerous complaints because their cars are sh*t. Every last one of them. That's why they are sold so low and as it of course. They should be shut down soon hopefully.
I took my bike in to get the front smaller gear straightened out because it has been bent over 3teeth and was causing the chain to slide off. They charged me $15, took three hours, and messed up the front derailleur such that when I rode it next the cable snapped. Not at all happy to know that another bike shop in town would have done it for ~$3, in minutes, and wouldn't have messed up probably. I am not going back.
None
The only good thing about this place is the ski tracks. Safety is ZERO. And people working there are worst personel I've seen in my life (including customer service). In the middle of the hardest track my rental snowboard's left foot holder came out (it was not safely screwed). I almost broke my leg but thank god I didn't have any injuries. I walked up to the lift tower on foot and talked to two lift patrols there. Instead of focusing on the accident they started blaming me on cursing because I used "hell" in one of my sentences (Really???). The young one that was thinking he's a tough guy broke my jacket's zipper trying to rip off my ski plastic badge. I didn't want to get in trouble there but I wish I smashed his ****** up face on the ground. Instead I went down to the customer service and wrote a complaint. And can you imagine what they offered me as a compensation? To refund the rental fee of SNOWBOARD ONLY. I drove there 110 miles from NJ. They messed up my whole day, I almost broke my leg, I was blamed to curse because I said "hell", I got a "tough guy" with an attitude yelling at me, my jacket's zipper is broken and all they offered me to refund the rental fee of snowboard!!! Morons!!! People, if you're serious about your safety don't go there. The cashier girl told me that they are getting more and more complaints about broken snowboards and there have been some serious injuries.
I went in to get a full set of Acrylic Nails done. Wasn't Greeted when I walked in, they acted like I wasn't welcome and wasn't wanted as a customer. No other customers in there either, Got the nails done and the whole time the man wouldn't even talk to me and if I asked a question or tried to make conversation he acted annoyed. I wanted my Ring finger and thumbs to be a different color and the rest white tips, and he only did the ring fingers. VERY POOR CUSTOMER SERVICE! They also charged me extra for using my Debit Card and was not every nice about asking to add their tip on there (Honestly they didn't deserve one!). The price I paid so was not worth it. $42 down the drain but at least I know not to go to that nail place again.
At night they do not have their "a" game...
Loved the nastalgia but customer service is lacking, big time!
None
The worst buying experience I have ever had. Salesperson was okay. Finance department is a bunch of idiots. I have a masters in finance, they gave me my monthly payment and tried the once over by charging me a higher APR than stated. I said this payment is too high for given level of APR, they recalculated and voila! fifty dollars less a month. What a bunch of cheats. Then, they put +$2000 on my principal on my loan... ummmm?? What the heck is going on here? Still isn't resolved, rude people at the dealership, no accountability, will never do business with them again or any Toyota dealership for that matter.
None
Not answering e-mails for a quote. Does this company even exist anymore?
None
This place is a joke...don't waste your money! We booked a dove hunt here with James who told us that they were doing all sorts of plowing, planting, and digging new ponds, and that there were seeing more dove than ever. He even took the liberty of sending me photos of the property with birds flying everywhere that, looking back, I think were probably photoshopped. When we arrived the only thing we found were fields of dirt, no crops, and no ponds to speak of. There were no dove, and no other wildlife that we could see anywhere around. James completely misrepresented what he has to offer and will not be getting our business for any of our hunts in the future.
Terrible service
I didn't buy my car from there, just went there for check-up and service on November 1st, 2013. The person was welcoming and that was pretty much it. When they told me that the car was ready, I walked back in the office to talk to the person behind the counter, and find out about my car, but he didn't say anything than:"Just go to the cashier", and I was like okay so everything is good with the car, he said:" Yeah just go over there to the cashier", I was like okay. Went to the cashier, and they had a receipt for me, saying they changed the oil. I asked what oil did they use, he said we can't provide you with that info. I was like WHAT? I was not told that my oil needs to be changed in the first place, so you guys changed it anyway with the YOU CANT SAY type of oil. Then i looked at the paper that indicates where my car stands (green or red blocks) but nothing was marked. I told him what is this, nothing is marked. He called one of the workers to check it out, and that person said:"oh sorry i didnt have time to mark everything, but your car is in the green." I was like WOW really, you took forever, you didnt have time to tell me anything, you wanted me to pay for oil that i have no idea what kind it was, and now you give me a receipt that has nothing marked and tell me its good. Then i got the car, there was not even a sticker on the windshield or a piece of paper to tell me when is the next time to change the oil again. HORRIBLE SERVICE!
My husband and I went to this store to inquire about phone cases for two units we had with us. After looking at their minimal display and not seeing a case for our particular phone models, I asked the clerk working there. The first thing out of his mouth when asking if he had cases for a Motorola Droid Ultra was "Oh those are old phones..." Insulting the customer is not really the best way to go about "helping" them. My husband then asked, "So why are you still selling these phones if you are no longer offering any accessories for them?" His response was, "Good Question..." End of conversation! We just purchased our phones so this comment was an immediate turn off. He never even offered to have something ordered in for us or to assist us further. Thanks for the great experience, I'll be ordering my next accessory from eBay or Amazon and skip the poor customer service.
The food / decor / other stuff Is very important to a restaurants experience obviously, but service is something that can make or break a good place. We were a group of 4 and waited for 10 minutes to be seated, as it was rush hour. We were able to order after another 15 minutes as no one attended or paid any attention. The waiter then rather rudely told us to order whatever we wanted in one go, as he was 'busy and can't take orders every few minutes'. Food took a long while to arrive and was good, but we were so pissed with the unwelcome demeanor that we decided to not come again. Side Note: Do Not order chicken or veg patties here. Worst way to start your day.
Okay, my wife and I went to a restaurant called "Shout" in downtown Atlanta last night. Valet (AmeriPark) took my truck and drove away. After dinner they returned my vehicle with a dent in my bumper and fender. I asked the valet what happened they said that they did not cause the damages, nor our they liable for any damages. So, I called the police and they arrived. I asked the restaurant how they could help and they said that the Valet company was a contractor for the property and had nothing to do with the restaurant. DO NOT USE THE VALET SERVICE!!!
This park is ghe---TTO! During the daytime it's okay if you are in a group. During night...do not go there unless you don't mind getting stabbed.
Very unprofessional company in my opinion. Took our order and deposit, only to refuse the job when we asked them to guarantee their work. A search of the Province's court database shows more than 220 cases involving this company in the last 15 years. Our firm decided based on this to take strong action against them. Be cautious when you deal with these people. They wasted 2 months of time and business to our store was certainly damaged as a result of their sales person agreeing to things he had no authority to agree to. Do your due diligence.
Had unpleasant experience with the school a while ago. The owner only likes quite easy kids. so if you have an energetic kid that needs a little more attention, better go somewhere else. plus, the provided lunch were mostly junk food, such as microwaved chick nuggets.
Ordered food, was told it would take 45 minutes, it actually took 2 hours. Burritos were soggy and terrible, and when I called to ask about what was taking so long, not only did the lady refuse to put a manager on the phone, she patronized me then hung up on me. Will never eat from them again.
Hay un tipo llamado Francisco que da asco en la forma en la que trata a sus clientes
I have ordered a number of items over the years from Musicstore and I have always had some sort of problem with my orders. The worst case was about a year ago when I ordered stuff that I needed within two weeks which is a reasonable turnaround and when I heard nothing after a week and a half I emailed them and had no reply to emails. I lifted the phone and called them and was promised my order was ready to ship. I checked the status of my order online and it was CANCELLED!!! I called back several time to speak to the agent for Ireland and he was never available. I had more empty promises that someone would ring me back but the call never came. Avoid, shop local or if you have to order from Thomann.
This store does not comply with policies outlined on the official UPS store. I was told that they are a "franchise." Do not waste your time with this store. Even when shipping in your legal rights according to federal regulations, and even when the official UPS website states that you as an individual is in the right > this store's staff will discriminate against you. I will never give them my business. They don't live up to policies stated on the UPS official website. This is quite deceiving for the customer. The staff is quite possibly individually opinionated, uneducated, and in fear of getting fired to the point that they turn customers away, customers that are perfectly in the right. Beware of so-called 'franchise' UPS locations. They have their own rules that do not shadow federal rules for shipping/mailing items that even apply to them.
I hope someone puts a rope around your neck before shooting you twice in the head you nazi fucktards.
Probably one of the worst Technical colleges in the state. Don't try to call to talk to admissions because no one will answer the phone, the receptionist (Missy) sounds asleep, and they will tell you that the best way to talk to someone is to just drive to the building, even though you live 2 hours away. You think since you were forking over all your money to go here that they would have some sort urgency to deal with any issues you may have with admissions. Steer clear.
Staff is rude, forgets orders. There is very little seating, with a sign that says you can only stay for 30 minutes with food and drink, Not that we'd want to stay more than 10 minutes...
1. Had not clean the table when we we're seated! 2. Sausage was not good, tasted cheap. 3. Dishes were extremely dirty,and had food stuck to the top and bottom of plates! :(
Nice ambience food was very disappointing seafood salad was fake crab legs and frozen shrimp would have been nice if they thawed the shrimp. Way overpriced save your money take out place up the road is better. Location is cursed I give it 6 months
Waited for 35 minutes for a very small order for a family of 4, we also timed it . Thats the first time I had ever eaten there. I went again they forgot my order and the service is terrible I mean absolutely horrid!!!!!! I asked for sauce got none, then I was told one time I wasn't allowed to have any. They had no food ready when I came. The franchise owner or KFC needs to fire every last one of them and put people there who actually care about their job. People should just be happy they have a job. Since they do not care about their job how can they care for a customer. I will not under any circumstance be going back there EVER AGAIN! even if it were the last place in the world that had food!!!!!!! KFC get your game right!!!! Fire those jerks and get some people who care! I recommend Bojangles! Awesome Service and good cajun chicken!
Do not go here. They make money by lying to you. A car I bought about 4 months ago was brought here by a family member for repairs. Despite the warranty, my family member was charged $480 for repairs. Looking at the bill, maybe $100 of it was necessary. the only price that was given over the phone was $210, and upon arrival at the dealership at the end of the day, the price was $480. This is your typical scum bag car dealer. If they tell you your car needs 6 things done to it, you only need one.
I ordered a bouquet of flowers for my girlfriend for her birthday. The flowers were sub contracted to flowers by julie by 1-800 flowers which I ordered through. The bouquet which showed up slightly resembled what I ordered, but was about half the size and the flowers were cut so short they were well on their way to death the following day. I received a 50% refund from 1-800 flowers which was not ideal, but acceptable at least. However, we got a call from flowers by julie later in the day saying they were going to come pick up the bouquet because, and I quote "We don't do anything for free." Well since I only got a 50% refund shouldn't I only return half of your overpriced excuse for a bouquet? Maybe the experience would be different dealing with the business directly, but after this atrocious excuse for customer service I will never patronize your business again.
My husband & I have been long time Lowes members and have had only good experiences with Lowe's products and service until tonight. We entered the Greenland store a little before 9:00PM Saturday night to purchase a plant and get some brochures for a kitchen remake of our counters. We had some questions about counter materials. We passed many people working in the kitchen department and other departments and no one asked us if we needed help or said anything to us that they would be closing soon. We found some samples and picked up some brochures along with a plant that we wanted to buy. We were in the store for at least 1/2 an hour before an employee came and told us that they were closing the store and all registers were closed and we were escorted out. We never heard a closing announcement. We felt invisible and ignored and we were not able to purchase the plant. Very bad service.
Went there 2 months ago but reviews weren't working for some reason. Nothing was good, nothing bad. Just completely boring and flavorless. Burgers had no seasoning and neither did the chicken strips. McDonalds does better. Service was also rather slow for not having any people at the restaurant at the time...
I had stomach cramps and went to my doctor for a full checkup. He did a full set of lab tests and a full exam. He thought there was a slight chance I might have appendicitis and told me he had talked to McKenzie Willamette to schedule a ct scan and to check in at the emergency room desk. Following his instructions, I went to the hospital to have a ct scan of my abdomen. They insisted I wait in a bed in the hospital, redid all of the lab tests my doctor had done, had me checked by an physician's assistant, and finally did the cat scan 3 hours later. Everything came back negative and they sent me home. I received a bill from the hospital for $7930.02, charging me for 2 ct scans at $2352 each, $2244.94 for a comprenhensive er visit, multiple charges for medication and lab results. In addition, I've received bills for about $400 from the radiologist and the emergency room physician. Bottom line is the total bill was almost $9000.00 for one test to rule out a slight chance of appendicitis. I've been disputing the bill since I received it in early July and to date, haven't been able to get it resolved. I've checked with the business manager 3 times, sent a long letter, and have still not heard anything back. THIS IS TOTALLY OUTRAGEOUS AND AN ABUSE OF THE MEDICAL SYSTEM. My insurance has paid approximately $3200 of this bill and disallowed $4045. The hospital is still trying to collect $1237.94 from me and each of the doctors wants his piece of the pie also. Any call to them regarding the dispute results in "the doctor (or his assistant) performed the exam whether it was requested, needed or not, and I have to pay the bill. My husband had a severe heart problem 2 years ago and was taken to Riverbend Sacred Heart Hospital, spent several hours in the emergency room with extensive tests, was admitted overnight and his bill was less than this bill for a simple ct scan. We all have choices of the hospital we use - DON'T GO TO MCKENZIE WILLAMETTE! They are a total rip off and are padding their bills.
For those of you PROUD to live in the ghetto! Then MOUNTIANSIDE VILLAGE APARTMENTS are for you! You get trash by your apartment, kids leaving things everywhere. Old dusty cars that are all banged up, just sitting there take up a parking spot.. Loud neighbors all thought out the night! And leaving beer cans and cigarette buds everywhere.. The So-called “Security” just walks along the outside talking on their cell phone and smoking. And when you really can’t sleep cause of all the noise and you call them.. Guess what? they don’t come or do anything! You would think a place that is located near the University would be nice right!> Well not here you pay more because of the fact it is located close to the university, but with all the ghettoness! Can not wait for my lease to be us and go back to LIDO apartments.. If you really do take pride in where you live then They would be where you want to go… IDK why I left from there for this crappy place!!!!
Their system went down at checkout and they took $1000 out of my account which has not been returned. Supervisors and managers are incompetent! Go elsewhere.
DO NOT ORDER TAKE OUT. Worst experience ever, long wait, wrong order, another long wait to get the correct food and just horrible tasting food. Do yourself a favor and go someplace else, anywhere else!
i bought a 2013 camry se and another one 2014 se. Customer service was good but unfortunately the 2013 one that was bought in may 2013 has a lot of issues the headliner is chiseled, and when i got the car it had a scratch on the clear coat which they never fixed. I have shown the car to Don Mc Gill they say the entire roof liner needs replacement. Im still hoping that Fred hass to could satisfy me today because all these issues should have been addressed before the car was handed over to me. Also when they gave me the vehicle the fender brackets were not installed they were sitting in the trunk. After going to toyota dealerships so many times im getting sick and idk if i would get a toyota again ( lol i was going to get a highlander in February but this camry experience is making me thing again)
None
Although her cakes are delicious, I would NEVER recommend A Piece of Cake to ANY bride unless you're looking for a migraine during the whole process! You can never reach them (via phone or email) unless you leave a very upset message about their lack of response and then you miraculously hear back from Laurie. She was over an hour and a half late dropping off the cakes (they didn't arrive until AFTER the ceremony) and were not what I ordered. The flavors were correct, but the sizes, quantity, and design were not what I specified (nor what was ordered). And getting any sort of a refund/reimbursement seems to be out of the question as she very rudely told me to review my contract even though it looks as if she was the one who didn't, because everything I claimed to be incorrect on her end was plainly stated on the contract the way we wanted it. Absolutely HORRIBLE customer service. Worst wedding vendor I dealt with! DO NOT USE!!!!!
Until tonight, I would have give Johnny's 5 stars hands down. However, tonight's experience was so horrible that I will never return to the Hideaway, nor will I think of it fondly. There was a some mix up over our bill and for the most part that was resolved with one server. We tipped generously on top of the gratuity to try to make up for the mix up. Then, another server demanded that we pay her gratuity as well (long story). When my fiancee refused, we were treated as if we tried to rob the bar and the server. Not the case. This particular server had a poor attitude the ENTIRE time. Service gets zero stars. The one star given goes to the crowd and fun that I have had. If you go, order from the bar. The servers are horrible and the attitude is worse.
Avoid this company unless you enjoy crap work, leaks and shoddy workmanship! Oh and there's a great line of bullshit on offer too!
I would not recomend living in any place run by theese people they do not care about the tenants or the upkeep of the property they only want your money
Doesn't exist
Horrible Horrible suxs horrible
Still not impressed with the D.
My issue is with the closing attorney at this location. Within 2 months of close, fraudulent behavior of the previous owners of my home came to light, mainly illegal receipts of work done and water/mold damage. I went to see John Sheehan and his partner, Mr. Senerchia. They referred me to a restoration business, told me to ask for a specific person and said they would write a letter to the previous owners, warning them that I would be filing a lawsuit if they didn't help out with the damages. I called the restoration business and a person came out to my home. He didn't even go into the attic, yet gave me an estimate of $18,500 to "remediate". I tried to file under homeowners insurance, but this technician told them that the problem was a poor roof install, and so it is not covered. Back to the attorneys...called repeatedly and could not get a return call. Several times in one day. Finally cried in frustration to the secretary and got a call back. He wanted to know "why I was mad at him?" I told him it had been weeks and I still have a leaking roof and no cooperation from the previous owners, and wondered where the letter was that he promised to send, and why hadn't he called me back? He said "I've been busy! I'm doing this as a favor to you!" I reminded him that they told me they would be charging me $300, and he said "no, I'm doing this as a favor! Plus I'm not even a litigation lawyer!" He said he would get a draft copy out to me ASAP and that he would call the AG office. "I will call you back, I promise!" were his last words to me, and that was 2 weeks ago. No call back, no draft copy, no emails. I have been dealing with a leaking roof for an entire month now and have gotten NO help. They are "too busy" to call me back, but were quick to do my closing. If you are looking for professionalism, look elsewhere.
Dr Benk told me that I had several cavities and pre-gum disease. As someone who brushes and Flosses everyday, I found this hard to believe. After coming out of his office with a $3000 treatment plan including for something called a debridement, I decided to seek a second opinion from another Dentist who told me I had no cavities. If you want help someone pay for their boat, go to Dr Benk.
My entire experience with these people has been disastrous. My original loan originator seemed to work hard to get me into the right loan product. He then suggested that I go from a conventional loan (my existing loan) to an FHA loan which required private mortgage insurance. At the incredibly low rate he offered me, I would still be ahead even with the PMI fee. I ok'd this, sent him all of my documentation and then heard nothing. For days. Turned out he'd been fired. When I finally got to the bottom of that, I was sent on to the new originator who reviewed my information and told me to proceed with the FHA. Today, I get a call from the loan processor. She informs me that my condo isn't an FHA approved property. But, they already yoinked the $450 for the appraisal from my bank account. I am not amused. One would have thought they would have conducted due diligence about my condo before offering me the loan. Is this bait and switch, or pure incompetence? I've again called the manager, as well as the processor and the second originator, but no one is answering the phone. All I want is my money back. I am thoroughly disgusted.
This is the worst breakfast burrito I ever bought! Bad enough for me to bother to come write an online review - my first, I think. It was overpriced - $18 for 4 breakfast burritos. The drive through took long enough that we regretted not going to a sit down place. The potatoes weren't all thoroughly cooked, even those that were were crazy-bland, like just boiled or something. I had no idea breakfast burritos could be so flavorless! We didn't order meat, but still, we get these from various sources who can make a good burrito without it. There is no sauce included inside at all, it's an extra charge for chili and it didn't seem like there was a bit of chili in any of them, after paying. We will never go back. There wasn't even any cheese! We're pretty easy to please when it comes to burritos, but I can't say how surprised I am these guys are still open. Sadly, the gas station variety is a better value.
Hotel Oruba
Went with a voucher from groupon / spreets. 3 hour wait which we were NOT going to do. You cannot book with a voucher so anyone could have come along and bumped us. The voucher went in the bin. Won't be back.
None
None
Worst serves and will never come back, the tables are all dirty ads they were out of almost everything.. so much for a good mommy daughter day.
Jason Bach and staff at Allegiant are completely incompetent at even the easiest of tasks. I found them to be rude and dishonest throughout the entire process.
Già solo chiamarlo 'servizio' è un eufemismo...dicono di essere passati 2 volte ma ovviamente nessuno si è visto. Affidano la merce a collaboratori esterni 'innominati' che consegnano con mezzi non SDA. Il servizio clienti è 199 a pagamento e non rispondono mai...ora capisco perché sono il partner numero uno di Poste Italiane....indecenti!!!
I went to upzen health just wanting a massage, they had me do a chiropractic checkup. I told them exactly what's did want, and did not want. They did complete opposite of what I wanted, and would not agree with what's wanted. I did not feel like they respected my privacy.
None
Kombi van I rented was not properly inspected before I took it, the next day I noticed the tires on the van were very dangerously worn out. The tread on the tires was separating from the casing. After four or five phone calls, they agreed to switch out the Kombi with another one. This one, was much newer, and offered at no additional charge. However, I also had a problem with that Kombi. After two days of calling the front desk and being promised a return call from the manager, I was told that I would have to bring the Kombi to the airport to see if they could help me. In general, the staff at the front desk are unhelpful. I would strongly recommend going anywhere other than here. Maybe consider walking. It might be less frustrating.
NEVER STAY HERE! Arrived to find no room for us all weekend, even though we booked 2 months out. Had to find a replacement place to stay at midnight. Next day came back to a room, they said they did not have. It was crawling with bugs, for which they had no solution. Being next to ice machine kept us up all night and garbage truck woke us up at 7am. Then to boot the toilet seat was broken. Management was neither friendly nor helpful. Poor accommodations for bad situations they created.
einfach nicht zu empfehlen der laden hatte ein platten war entfernt von meinem ziel noch 5km da hieß es lassen sie ihr Fahrrad stehen holen sie es in 2 tagen ab. mir ist das bisher 3mal passiert das ich unterwegs einen reifen platten bekommen habe jeder andere Fahrrad Geschäft konnte mir helfen hat es vestanden das ist eine Sache von 5 Minuten also geht besser zu einem anderen Fahrrad Händler ich war bei Velo hat mir sofort geholfen GROSSEN LIKE FÜR VELO p.s. weisser lefty
Horrible food and service!!! When it first opened, it was pretty good, but now it's really gone off. Many dishes were authentic Chinese, but the natural flavors were masked by the unhealthy amount of oil and salt. Also, many dishes are spicy, so if you don't like spice then there are not many dishes to choose from. The soups were just broth- hardly any vegetables or meat in it. Also, the manager was very unkind, and forced us to pay more. It is also a little more expensive than the other Chinese restaurants in the area. Bottom line: I would not recommend this to a friend, but if you feel like this suits your taste, then go ahead.
My experience with Seabrook, 3000 Essex Rd., Tinton Falls, NJ 07753, was HORRENDOUS. I have elderly parents who live there. Someone from Seabrook's housecleaning staff stole a valuable item from my parents' apartment. The management hierarchy at Seabrook never even took the time to investigate the incident. All they did was cover up the incident. I would NEVER have allowed my parents to live there had I known Seabrook management were such con artists - just like any other large bureaucracy. Take the advice of someone who cares deeply about elder care: DON'T LIVE AT SEABROOK; DON'T LET YOUR PARENTS LIVE AT SEABROOK.
Went to return a phone case. The 'greeter' at the front door looked at my return item, stuck a pink sticker on it and sent me to Customer Service. I waited in line for 10 min at Customer Service - only one employee was working the return/customer service register, three were standing ten feet away BS'ing. When I got to the counter the girl said, "oh, you need to return this over in the Best Buy Mobile section". I then went to the Best Buy Mobile Section where the only two employees in the section were selling mobile plans to two separate customers. I was the 3rd person in line to return something. After a 15 min wait, a third employee showed up and was obviously high or something. He took an additional 10 minutes to take care of the first person in line as he wondered from register to register and rooted through the cabinets behind the counter. When I finally got helped, the guy didn't say a word to me or make any eye contact. ABSOLUTELY the worst retail store, bar none, in which I've shopped. If this was my first bad experience at this store, I would have simply chalked it up to a fluke, however it was not. I received a remote starter for Christmas and had it installed at this store. The installation went fine, however, I wanted an adjustment made so the car would run longer and not shut off so quickly. I spent ~30 minutes on the phone with some idiot explaining the situation and what I wanted changed. This guy was clueless and finally said to come in and talk to the installer which I did the next day. After 'making my case' as to why I wanted to the car to run longer than the default 10 minutes he agreed to adjust the remote starter to make the car run for 20 min instead. I was about 2 minutes away from popping the hood, ripping the remote unit out, and throwing it across the store. I asked the installer if the adjustment was a simple matter of adjusting some DIP switches in the control panel and he said in a condescending bark "Yes, but Not for You!". And for my last example, about a year ago, I ordered a laptop online to avoid dealing with the idiots in the computer department and to expedite my purchase. I ordered the laptop around 9am, the store opened at 10am. The website said to wait for a confirmation e-mail after I placed my order. I got an e-mail around 10:15am stating that the store was closed when I placed the order and to wait until store the store opened for the confirmation e-mail. I received the confirmation e-mail at 11:45am! I went to the store and waited for about 10 min for someone to stop talking and come to the register. The employee had a hard time finding my order even though I had the confirmation e-mail and it took another 20 min to get the laptop out of the warehouse in the store. Next time I'm gonna shot at Walmart.
My package? I called on Friday after my Amazon order said "Delivered left at front door." There was no package at my front door. I call the Tampa, FL office and spoke to a lady who said she would call the driver and find out where my package was left. The driver said he might have left it at the wrong house (using GPS and obviously cannot see the LARGE house numbers on house). She said he would deliver it that evening and she would call me back. None of those things actually happened. And I didn't have my items for my party that I paid for as promised by the $80 Prime Membership I pay to Amazon. I've spoken to many of my friends and they have had the same experience with your "delivery" company. UPS and Fed-Ex have ALWAYS delivered on time. I sincerely hope you lose Amazon's contract because you don't deserve the business. And I sincerely hope Amazon learns that although your bid no doubt was lower it is not worth it if they lose Amazon Prime subscriptions. Best Regards, Where is my package in Madeira Beach
So I walked up on foot to place an order, I walked about half a mile to get here. The door was locked 15 minutes before closing. After much banging and cajoling the manager came to the door and told me there was nothing they could do and I would have to walk up to the drivethru, when I did this they just ignored my order and let the cars bypass me, so I ended up having to walk a half mile home empty handed.
None
None
I wish I could give -5 stars. Please, please, please DO NOT EVER RENT FROM THESE PEOPLE. Not only are they terrible customer service representatives and terrible representatives of their company's name (this extends from office staff to managers to maintenance workers), they are actually horrid individuals. I can guarantee you will regret renting from them. Guarantee.
I cant even give it one star it's horrible just horrible 25 dollars is a joke you walk around in a horrible decorated house that has 2 actors that do nothing but scream in your face I find there freaking bathrooms scarier than all 3 houses I find even 5 dollars isn't even worth it.
Not at all helpful. The manager was more of a problem than an asset. I wasted over half an hour in the store because of his incompetence. First he could not get the register to work for another customer and had to rely on a clerk from a different store who was in the building at the time. Then he could not complete my order even though the other clerk had been helping me and knew how to do it. He insisted on getting involved, however, and messed things up rather than helping. I won't go back to that store.
Tried staying here, got in the room and started putting groceries in the fridge. Everyone took showers, so far so good. Crawled in bed and started itching, flipped on the lights and low and behold there were bed bugs. Went and slept in the truck for the night because we couldn't find a room at 10PM. by the next morning our food had started to go as the fridge was about 75 degrees. Is it the cheapest place in Islamorada, yes, is there a good reason why? You bet.
Very rude over the phone. Called for availability and pricing of a phone, said I would have to come in. I'm going to have to drive to their store to find out if they have it or not!?! The other Best Buys are telling me over the phone, so it's just this store being jerks.
My dad purchased and item for my husband for Christmas. It ended up not fitting but because he bought it online and we didn't have the receipt the customer service lady wasn't even interested in helping him AFTER he stood in line for 30+ minutes. We called to talk to a manager and he pretty much implied that anyone without a receipt is treated as if they stole the item. We will not shop here again!
None
I can't believe some people gave 5 stars... Worst hotel I have ever stayed!! Old and least maintained room. It's even worse for the shuttle services to cruise piers in Seattle downtown.
I was a loyal customer for 2 years and made use of 3 of their locations - so the crappy Cost Cutter "experience" seems to be across the board. While some of the stylists are good at what they do, the majority suck at it. The good ones are good enough to keep you coming back but sooner or later you get enough of attitude and half-assed haircuts from the other ones to make you want to walk. Another reason I used to like Cost Cutters was the convenience. I could stop in, after work, and usually get in within 15 minutes or so. If they couldn't get me in a chair in 15 mins, I would leave and go to the next one down the road.Now, if you don't schedule an appt. you wait and you wait and you wait. I don't make reservations to eat fast food (I actually don't even eat it) and I'm not going to be scheduling appts with CC either. I'm done with that. It's clear that CC is another example of a franchise that does not understand that paying customers are what makes your company grow. I've thrown out my loyalty card and will try somewhere new, effective today. I'll see how other "stylists" enjoy getting my business and tips. And no Cost Cutters, I will not be contacting you on your website - you've wasted enough of my time. Also want to point out that CC puts a review of 5 stars up for themselves to average everything out. You guys are the worst... Flaming homosexual receptionist also made me sick to my stomach. Nice job on hiring quality people to represent your company Cost Cutters!
We were told there would be a 30 min. wait and we sat outside in the wind for an hour. When we were finally seated we received drinks but they didn't take our order for another 25 minutes. The salad plates were hot...yuck. The salad plates were not cleared and when the food finally came it was less than satisfactory, the steak was burned, pasta had half & half for sauce, fish really small, thin and tasted like it was warmed in the microwave. All of the food was lukewarm, not hot and another server was kind enough to bring us our food because our waiter was missing....again. The server never filled our water, brought missing silverware, asked how the food was, brought additional drinks or offered any bread. When we share the poor dining experience with manager she shrugged her shoulders, made excuses and I am sure that the poor service, food quality and food quantity will continue. After a 3 hour dining experience we drove directly to Culver's for dessert because we didn't another 3 hour to wait.
Horrible experience with this place the Arabic lady over night was not helpful at all told me there was no more rooms left but I stayed and annoyed her and magically she found a room available but she tried charging me 60 dollars for a room which had no electrical power what so ever . Look elsewhere
I wanted to get a Mystic Tan so I went to the the MT website and looked for locations. Planet Beach was nearby so I called and made an appointment. I didn't like how they asked for my name and phone number THREE times during the call, but I let it go. I asked the cost of the MT and was told I had to come in to get the price. That should have been my first clue. I asked if it was more or less than $50 and was told it was significantly less and that if I came in today, it would be half off. Once I arrived, I had to sit through 45 minutes of a hard product/membership sale. When I said that I really just wanted the MT, I was then told it would be $45. I asked about the special and was told it was only if I had a guest pass. Since I did not, it was full price. I should have walked out then, but I said fine, I just want the MT...but THEN I was told I would have to wait as it was in use. Nevermind that I had made an appointment and drove over a half hour to the shop. I lost my spot because they were trying to sell me skincare. I didn't appreciate the price change, I didn't appreciate having to sit through a "timeshare like" presentation. I didn't appreciate having to fill out 3 pages of paperwork AND do an online survey once I arrived. I won't ever recommend Planet Beach. There are a ton of tanning salons and genuine spas in my area that I would go to before ever giving a cent to Planet Beach.
Stupid service....Ask waitress for plates but non recieved.Even when paying the cashier is so rude that they did not want to service us and went for the Middle Eastern customers first.Never want to come here again.
caray que servicio hasta la gravacion de la maquina para los pasaportes es igual de despota que las personas en las oficinas estan todos ocupados llama despues y te cuelgan mendigos burrocratas hacen honor a su nombre y les ponen dos estrellitas y media deberian ponerles mejor cinco burros y medio, ellos salieron de el cerro pero el cerro no salio de ellos.
None
Their general attitude is like it or lump it. No customer service. I did not get the truck that I had wanted. I either accepted what they had or got nothing. Yes, my back was against the wall and I took it. But never again!!!! Also, be careful of their hours. There is NO after hour parking. And if your a woman on her own, their attitude is "Oh well!" You are not able to talk to a manager. The number given to me took me to their overall number for Atlanta.
Stopped by for coffee and to do a little work on the computer. The sign on the window says "Free WiFi Hotspot". I go to log on and am given 2 choices; pay-as-you-go or be a member of some kind of club. So I ask the idiot at the bar - how much to be a member? Answer - $25. So I ask the obvious question "How is that "free"? She says "It IS free if you buy the membership". I can only assume that every other transaction in this place will be just as dishonest.
My expirence, was abhorent, I witnessed senoir constables, giving civil legal advice to immigrants, I as a gay man, after being bashed at the local hungry jacks, couldnt even get a statement for my doctors, Let alone my HIV providers, Be aware that I wouldnt even hold my breath, That Prahran Police even know what they are doing when it comes to community crime and consultation, Best to call ya mates, and pray for the best, AKA Belmont Sydney Style
They sent my package with my work uniform to the wrong address and offered no compensation or method to fix it.
Jan 4, 2012 I got ripoed off. They did $600 worth of repairs on my Jeep Grand Cherokee, then said the car is still undriveable and I would probably need a new engine. Hey Abdul, wanna practice your bombing techniques, this would be a good place to start.
The Ultimate Dining Experience last night would have been a great event had we picked a different restaurant. Dining at Russel's Smokehouse ruined our entire experience for the night. Service was terrible (we had to get up from our table to request dinner, desert and our check). We also only ordered food for two people which consisted of a plate of potato chips, calamari, salad and a dinner entree and had been charged $180!! For one SINGLE PLATE of each item. Charging $45 for a plate of potato chips is beyond me. Had the server explained this, we would have not ordered from here at all. I am recommending for the next Dining Event not to make reservations at Russel's Smokehouse.
THEY WERE ONE OF THE GREAT CAKES IN QUALITY I HAVE TASTED! THAT HAS CHANGED THERE CAKES TASTE LIKE CARDBOARD I GUESS THAT'S WHAT HAPPENDS WHEN U LEAVE UR BUSINESS UNATENDED!
This store has been the worst experience i have ever had with rent to own business's. They wanted us to pay half a payment to order the items early. it is now almost 2 months later and we are still waiting are part of the items we wanted. If i where you i would look else where for a rent to own.
I bought the Guardsmen Elite furniture protection plan for $173. When it came time to make a claim, they denied it out of hand by simply saying "not covered." What a rip-off. Don't buy insurance from these people, and don't buy leather unless you want it to fall apart with very little use.
None
Ich habe vor ca. drei Wochen für diesen Samstag um 19:30 Uhr einen Tisch für zwei Personen reserviert. Jetzt habe ich einen Anruf bekommen, dass die Reservierung nur bis 21:00 Uhr laufen kann oder storniert werden muss, wenn ich damit nicht einverstanden bin!!! Ich habe mich auf diesen Abend gefreut und wollte das Restaurant kennen lernen. Jetzt bin ich mit dem Anruf bedient! Es ist eine bodenlose Frechheit, was die sich leisten! Das Hugo's wird ab jetzt bei mir unter Sauladen geführt! Ich war zwar noch nie dort kann aber mit Gewissheit sagen, wenn der Service am Telefon schon so mies ist kann es Vorort nicht besser sein! Der Laden ist nicht empfehlenswert!
Markenfield dry cleaners took my 2 months old jacket for dry cleaning and completely destroyed it over night. My jacket had huge raccoon fur around the hood and was bright red colour. After cleaning it the whole thing looked as it was run over by a tractor, it was no more fur and colour was washed out. They kept lying about methods of cleaning used, first lady said it was dry cleaned then she admitted putting my jacket into the washing machine, because the hood was soaking wet on my arrival. I don't know anyone who would decide to put real fur into the washing machine!!! She didn't even think to call me and ask if she can wash it instead of dry cleaning. Obviously she didn't care at all. Markenfield owners refused to apologise, they didn't want to tell me who their insurer was until I kept insisting for few days and told them that I'm going to see my solicitor. Really bad customer service, poor cleaning service, bad attitude. Please aware this could happen to anyone who wants their clothes dry cleaned at Markenfields. Well, you can also wash your coat and jacket at home in your washing machine, which will give you the same result, but wont cost you anything.
NEVER AGAIN WILL I GO HERE. I took my kitten in for her new shots and it was outrageously expensive. Not to mention how mean they were to her. They put the shot in her arm and when i asked to put it somewhere else since it hurt her so much, they refused and she missed her skin which soaked her fur in the medicine. The doctor said she needed to clean it off or it would cause mouth ulcers. when they couldn't get the needle in from her squirming they Took her to the back where i could hear her screaming from the pain. I trusted she cleaned the area well enough so my cat didn't lick it but a couple weeks later i found a sore on my cats mouth. I compared the sore to pictures and it looked like an ulcer (which the doctor said would happen if she didn't clean it). i took her in and they had no idea what is was but still charged me for a full visit and tried to give her a shot for another $30. I would defiantly not recommend this place to anyone who loves their pet!
Wife ordered over the phone. The person taking the order wrote down the wrong thing (I don't know how you mix up "Beef and broccoli" and "Steak and Shrimp" which is what we wanted), then hostess insisted that that's what we ordered over the phone, and was going to charge us to wait while they corrected "our" mistake. Terrible customer service, Ok food, recommend avoiding it. It will be the last time we purchase from them.
I have been to this location twice now in the past three months and have not been impressed. This past weekend I ordered the #9 in a pita pocket. At other D'Angelos restaurants that is a grilled veggie with melted cheese.....this one added "steak" if you can call it that. It tasted like overcooked shredded hamburger. I won't be visiting this location again. I live in bedford and will make the trip across the river to try another location.
OVER COOK, OVER PRICED AND BAD SERVICE ALL AROUND. WAS THERE ON 10/11/12.. NEVER AGAIN GOING TO EAT THERE.
We love this place for what it has to offer but really have a tough time swallowing the repeated Lies and shady behavior by some of the management. If only everything could be run by the maintenance department and not the condescending main office it would be perfect. If you are considering moving here, don't. If you still want to try your luck here, consider this, the rent and utilities are skyrocketing because of a bad deal between nafac and the way things were billed for the past four years. Carmel is forced to raise the rent to pay for it. The office staff will lie to your face about this situation but it is public record, look it up.
Got bumped from a flight, had to stay in Toronto an extra night....... Seemed nice upon first impression.... Extra inconvenience at the front desk, when i was informed i would have to give 100$ deposit. I had no money, and i don't have a credit card. I was under the impression it was all payed for. Had to go across town and borrow money. Very annoying. My room was very small, there was a light covering of dust on all surfaces, human hair in the blankets and the tub in the bathroom. Pubic hairs on the ceiling. Walls paper thin, heard doors opening/closing, talking, etc. all night. Absolutely no frills. 20$ for low end breakfast "buffet". Staff were nice enough, but they all had that "i wish i was anywhere else" look to them.
I'm still a beginner with aquariums. This was my first time at the store, outstanding poor service. I was a new customer in an unfamiliar store and felt invisible. The place smelled dirty and was dirty. No one expressed any interest in helping out whatsoever. In fact the staff seemed more interested in ordering take-out than helping us out (Beef and Broccolli). As I was meandering through the place with an infant in her carrying seat, the same employee who was ordering take-out wordlessly squeezed past us before I could get out of his way, forcing a cramped and awkward situation. I decided to edit down my shopping list to a bag of gravel and a new filter stone. This is the first and last time they will ever get my money. Guess what folks--Petsmart is right across the street.
BED BUGS!!!! DONT GO MY SON IS ALL BITED UP..
Aweful guest services...the vending machines dispensed lifeless flat sodas, and at $2.00 a piece. Front desk did absolutely nothing and showed no concern for the problem. I would NOT recommend this hotel at all.
I have been a customer off an on of Hubcap Heaven for well over 20 years, they have always been my "go to" place for any wheel related item I may have needed. My hobby is restoring older cars and sometimes I like to keep them as original as possible. They use to always carry nice used hubcaps for my vintage cars. I guess that has changed, I went by today to purchase some wire wheel center caps or a matching set of Lincoln hubcaps for my 1989 Lincoln Town Car, and the heavy set older man there was just plain rude. I can understand if they do not carry items I need, but he could have shown a little more professionalism. He first told me that he did not have any center caps for my car, that was fine, I started to ask another question and before I could even finish what I was going to ask he said "No, check on Ebay, we don't carry items for cars that old". If he had listened to me he would have found out that I was going to ask about wheels for one of my newer cars, and would have probably kept my business. But instead, he seemed to be too busy to deal with individual customers and I guess more focused in on his "fleet accounts". I guess he just wanted me out of his store, that is how he made me feel. This man needs to learn that some business accounts often come from a good experience from a regular customer. Also, if you are not willing to offer help on locating hard to find wheels and center caps as stated on your website, then you need to remove that from your list of services. So after being a regular customer for over 20 years, I will NEVER RETURN.
High prices and food with no taste, just like eating cardboard. I pass.
BEWARE! I would NOT recommend this place to anyone. They will tell you what you want to hear just to get you to sign the contract, then they don't care. Find another gym...trust me. After doing what was asked of me to cancel my membership due to moving out of state, they have now sent my account to collections for over $620. And the company they use for this, Internal Credit Systems, is a guy named Ted that basically refuses to let you talk and hangs up on you.
I could go on and on about my recent dealings with this place but here's a few points from my BBB complaint: (Our daughters are 8 and 9 and were to attend in June 08) *Both girls told us, seperately, that when they asked to use the restroom they were told to "squat in the stall" or use the outhouse. the outhouse consisted of makeshift walls against a tree, an upside down bucket, yellow pages for tissue and a shower curtain for a door. When they asked about washing their hands they were told there was no where to do so. *I don't know what parent would in good concious leave their child at a facility that depended on other children providing supervision. Adult supervision was expected and did not occur. the camp "workers" are 12 years old. both girls told us they spent most of their day riding through the woods with either no on around or with one of the child 'workers' *We were there for more than 30 min. when dropping the children off waiting for an adult to come greet us. When we returned to pick up the children, there was no adult in sight, we wandered around the barn and fields for at least 15 minutes before we discovered our children ourselves....through several gates behind a line of trees, in the pasture WITH THE HORSES by themselves and with no adult in sight. I started knocking on doors until I found the adults who were completely clueless as to why we were so upset...the owner said 'they know not to go in there' I explained that's why kids need adult supervision especially around large, potentially dangerous, animals... Again, I can't tell you how appalled I was to find the children in the condition that this so-called 'horse back riding camp' operates. My children will never return and I will continue to tell others about this horrible experience. I have filed complaints with the BBB, health department and zoning administration (we found out the business is operating in a residential zone and without a business license). **P.S. I did get ahold of the owner, Ed Hood, and he did refund our money.
Went in for a simple battery replacement. I was told it would only take an hour. I went across the street for lunch, came back and they told me they didn't have the battery in stock but they were having one delivered. After waiting another 45 minutes they tell me they had the wrong battery delivered. Point is this, don't tell me you can replace my battery when you don't even have it in stock. They wasted half my day. They didn't care about my time, they just wanted to make a sale. They failed miserably and lost a customer for life. Do business here at your own risk.
Onw of the worst I've been to. My husband and I went to go get drinks throuh the drive thru and the girl wouldn't even let me finish my order before she asked us what kind of drink. Apparently she must not been lostening cuz we gave her the order exact. My husband asked for his drink to be sweeten and she replied "um sir the drink is already sweeten". To top things off when we pulled up to the window only then did they start to make our drinks. I wouldn't recommend this location to anyone!
I haven't even moved in yet and I want to get out of this place. Don't get me wrong the trailer that we (my spouse and me) are moving into looks really nice and seems to be well taking care of. The big issue is that we were told one thing and when we planned everything dealing with this move around it, they did the complete opposite. Lucky, I have a great extended family here in the area. I WOULD NOT RECOMMEND this place to anyone. If you do decide to do business to, make sure you get EVERYTHING in writing that way you are covered.
HORRIBLE place - dont have your party here ever. The staff was totally rude - the waitress constantly harassed my whole party. They charged me $100 deposit for the party that they told me I would have bottle service- the bottle I never got - then charged me $120 the next day on my card when $100 cash was given in person at the beggining of the party. They also moved my whole party into an area full of stacked chairs and tables saying another party was coming to share my space with me and they never came. I also walked thru the door way to go out to smoking 3 times and the door was open (also with two security gaurds at it) the 4th time the all glass door with no writing was closed and I walked right into it busting open my forehead neither gaurds asked if i was okay - completely unsafe not to mention all the water ALL over the place on the floor with no one to clean it up. I will never return here or reccommend it to anyone. This place is a joke and it ruined my birthday.
Called them for a repair (chip repair). Their ad says they do repairs. They told me "they don't do chip repairs" and weren't very nice about it. Don't even ask them if they do repairs!
These guys are a joke! First the guy tried to get me to sign documents before even SHOWing me a car! After a couple hours I finally settled on a car I liked and some good numbers from them. They said I had to put a deposit down or sign a contract in order for them to get it from WV. I hadn't even seen the car they wanted me to commit to! After telling them how I felt that they were passively-aggressively trying to hurry and get me to commit the OWNER called me and told me that he didn't WANT my business. WHAT?? Guess I'll just go to another dealership LOL! Don't go there if you want a good sales experience.
The level of incompetence that surrounds this business is unbelievable, I went in to get a simple safety and emissions check, and they informed me that I had failed both safety due to bad brakes and emissions due to an air leak in the gas cap. I took my car down the road to get the brakes done where I was informed that the current brakes were adequate to pass safety, but I had them replaced anyway, as well as purchasing a new gas cap than returned to the emissions plus location where they informed me that I just barley passed and gave me my forms….I thought they forgot to provide a retest of emissions so when I arrived at the DMV I could not get my tags. I had to return to this horrible company and watched the man working walk out to my car, open the gas cap and then pass it off. (Very interesting way to check that the leak is gone I thought) I WOULD SUGGEST THAT NOONE EVER USE THIS COMPANY FOR ANY REASON.
I used to love Rafferty's and the people that work their are great but tonight, I was over priced and given rotten portions on everything. I mean Rafferty's was always the most expensive but you got what you pay for, tonight on a Saturday night, I had the most lousy to go order ever! Apple Walnut Crunch, I was lucky if I got a $2.00 portion, a chicken finger platter with fries, the chicken tenders the very few that there were, weren't even whole tenders, the fries with both orders were half full. I could spit nails. The hot fingers were at least full size chicken tenders, but not much hot sauce on them. I guess everyone has an off night, just which I had never gone there. I will probably call or write corporate in Bowling Green and let them know, they would hate this more than I.
This place needs help i waited 30 mins for a cheeseburger and small frie
None
HP/COMPAQ has very rude and unhelpful technical support. I tried twice and spent more than two hours on the phone with tech suppport, tryingt to find drivers after a reformat. They kept insisting that I buy a driver cd when the drivers are online!!! The site was just very difficult to use and I wanted a list of required drivers. Stupid. Eventually, I found what I needed . . . just using try and failure. See, I am online!! It would be great if the tech support guy was willing to help instead of insisting I buy something I didn't need. I very thoroughly regret spending money on their worthless warranty.
Worst hospital I ever been to. Failed to give proper service. Bill from 2008 was never received or acknowledged by hospital. I called the hospital in 2009 to make sure my account was in good standing. However a part of the bill from 2008 went into collection in 12/2013. This hospital is two blocks from my home, but I will never go there even if I'm dying.
Finally took the time to drive from Prosper to the GMB&G! What a complete let down. If you look at the video tapes around 9-10pm, you will see us walking around looking for signs of how to get a drink and some dinner, do we sit ourselves do we go to bar are there servers? LMAO after being obvious we were not going to get any help from ANY>>>>> of the staff we used the rest room, then sat at the rail asked the hostess for 411 but after waiting around for service we threw in the towel! Not one hello, or contact from valet to hostess to bartender who did make eye contact several times to the passing by employees. They all seemed too busy serving only people they knew and gave the vibe that if we didnt know them personally we were out of luck. We got the hint! SO WE LEFT, $100 bucks richer and still hungry for dinner and drinks. Ironically the only person that did talk to us was a first time visitor like us, only he was so wasted he could barely talk. Said to us woohoo I have the GM shirt at home. LMAO. Was it a Tuesday, sure! But if your open for business the service should be good any time you are open for business. Conclusion: wasted trip! Pros: Really cool water surrounds the place Cons: everything else Would I return: NO Would I recommend to others: NO My wife is a server and has been in the restaurant industry for over 10 years and I have managed several restaurants in DFW! Never would this lack of service fly even on our Monday nights! Best of luck with the GMB&G! If you ever ask why this place is not making the money it could, read reviews like this. Stay cool! No harm done. We found other place for drinks and dinner. JMA@GENA
Making reservations here over the phone is nearly impossible. Unbelievable!
WARNING WARNING WARNING WARNING WARNING WARNING WARNING WARNING! I lived here for two years while attending full sail university. The property managers were extremely rude and highly unprofessional! WHEN I HAD FIRST MOVED IN: There were dead bugs along the floor where the carpet meets the wall. There was human hair and scum all over the bathroom that I had to clean up myself upon moving in. I went to open a drawer in the kitchen and the front of it ripped off - they would never come and fix it and then eventually said it was my fault and that they would deduct it from my original security deposit. Also, they said that I was accountable for any plumbing - well when I moved in my garbage disposal wasn't even working so whenever I would use the dishwasher the water would come up the sink and almost overflow into the kitchen...and here's the kicker - they never fixed it the ENTIRE TWO YEARS that I lived there. THE NEIGHBORHOOD: There were always hood looking people coming and going as if there was tons of drug dealing going on. One time there were about 20 cops with guns drawn going after a suspected drug dealer who was hiding in his apartment with an automatic weapon. THE MYSTERIOUS MAN: One time I went home for about a month back to Ohio. My place was locked and so was my balcony. Upon returning, I walked in my door and things were out of place. My soap in the bathroom was all used up and I had JUST bought new soap before I left for Ohio. Things were out of place and a change jar I keep in the living room was empty. I thoroughly believe somebody was using my apartment while I was gone and I think it was the maintenance men. They are the only people who had a key and must have noticed I was gone. Anyway, I installed a new deadbolt and the apartment ladies gave me hell about it and said I had to give them a key first. The whole situation had me sleeping with one eye open all the time and I got up to every noise I heard. It ruined my sleeping habits. MOVING OUT: Upon moving out, I cleared everything out and cleaned the entire place (even the balcony) to make sure that they couldn't charge me for anything. I did a very thorough job and it was WAY cleaner that it was when I first moved in. Well, a month later I received a bill in the mail telling me I owed them $380 dollars because there was garbage left in my apartment, and the balcony was dirty. I told them I had cleaned the apartment very well and that I was not going to pay it. And the balcony must have gotten dirty on its own because it was next to a tree. They threatened to destroy my credit over it. I ended up have to pay the $380 dollars to these crooked thieves. ALL IN ALL: This place is UNSAFE ESPECIALLY FOR YOUR CHILDREN!! The maintenance is absolutely pathetic and don't fix ANYTHING - they just ride around on golf carts. The office people are uncaring, rude, spiteful, and are never there to help you out. Their attitude was as if you had offended them every time you would talk to them. They are highly unprofessional and will find a way to rob you of your money. STAY AWAY FROM THE PARK!!!!!! YOU HAVE BEEN WARNED!!!!!
Don't work at or get your move done with this company. They are by far the worst company that I ever seen. The staff are very rude and unprofessional and the branch manger at the Houston location, Pete, should never work for any moving company in the country. None of the so-called movers or not professional but they are drug user and ex-cons. They will steal and break your cherish belongings. This company bid they jobs so low that it's to good to be true. The reason why they can't keep any good workers is because they pay there contractors only 40 percent of the move. How can someone live with that kind of salary? These guys would make more money working at BK but that would be on BK that I would never eat at. So please avoid this company.
Everything about this place sucks, that's why they changed their name.
This company has maybe the worst customer service of any company I've ever dealt with. They absolutely do not keep you in the loop as far as when the job will be started or finished. The person who schedules their jobs and is the customer contact is in a little over her head. OK, a lot. Her excuse for NEVER returning calls is, "I never answer the phone and never get messages." This is their customer service department. Very nerve-racking in that I gave them $3000 one month ago and they have no idea when the job will get started. My fear is that they will just show up some day and tear down my old fence and let my 3 dogs and 1 cat run free. If they do this, they will be sued. But I would not put it past them.
Please dont join aptech borivali branch. The faculty is worst and their representative make false promises at the time of joining. They deposisted money in advance from me and told me there would be a batch of 12 students whom world class faculty will teach the oracle. But when I joined I was the one person in my batch and faculty was very new and fresher, just passed out from college. when I asked to refund my money they didn't gave my money back and also humilate me about refund of money. I suggest you not to take addmission atleast in its boriwali branch.
bad experience with employees.. had them repair my bike twice and they messed up both times... most likely due to their frequent visitors they have while repairing... the worker "assisting" me seemed more interested in his conversation with his buddy than in answering my question...
Delivery takes too long expecially when they say they don't start taking orders until 11:30 AM and then when you complain that your lunch is over they want to give you a new order. That does not help is you can't eat it.
Terrible experience with these people. I hired them to do an Administrative Law Judge application and resume, paying them well over $2000. Though I have been a social security disability attorney for over 20 years, their "expert" Nicole Schultheis failed to properly articulate and word my social security disability experience in the application, causing the government to reject my application by contending that I had failed to prove that I have over 7 years of social security disability experience! The resume she drafted was shoddy, and she lifted whole paragraphs from my website to the resume rather than professionally drafting it. When I approached Ms. Schultheis and Ms. Troutman about their incompetence, they refused to offer me any refund or accommodation. Though I did EXACTLY what Ms. Schultheis directed me to do in the application, she tried to blame me for the rejection of my application, saying that I must have made some changes or otherwise screwed the application up. Stay far, far away from these people...
Up until yesterday (10/20/13) I would have given this gym 5 stars. I have been a member of PF since it opened its doors for business here in Lubbock a couple of years ago. I love the facility. Most of the non-management staff have always been friendly and helpful. The equipment is all new, functional, and the place is very clean. Yesterday (10/20/13), I was interrupted while running on a treadmill when a heavy-set elderly woman whom I have only seen working there recently came up to me rudely demanding that I move my bag to a locker. I told her no and explained that I keep my inhaler in that bag, which I needed to keep with me at all times. She threatened to get the manager if I did not comply with her demand, so I told her to do whatever she felt she needed to do, but I was continuing my workout. Sure enough, a couple minutes later, the assistant manager "Victoria" came up to me, once again interrupting my workout, and once again, rudely demanding that I move my bag to a locker. I've brought this same little light-weight cinch-bag in every day I have ever came into this place for a couple of years now, and suddenly they had a problem with me carrying my bag with me? I was told that corporate came in recently and found they were not enforcing this rule that had always been in place, so they had just started enforcing it. Again, I explained that I need my bag with me for my inhaler, and "Victoria" told me that I can keep my inhaler in the well of the treadmill. I'm not going to do that because it will get left behind and lost, as has happened several times before, not to mention the treadmill is not the only machine I planned to use. "Victoria" then told me that either she would TAKE my bag or I could leave. I was not about to let her lay a hand on my bag, so I told her if she was going to make me leave, then I wanted a refund of my money they took out for this month for my membership. Suddenly she didn't have any authority to do such a thing. Already infuriated, I then spoke to the manager, "Eric" over the phone, and he was even more rude than "Victoria" was. He also refused to refund my money, yelled at me at the top of his lungs over the phone, and hung up on me when I refused to give the phone back to "Victoria" until I had my refund. I was handed a copy of the list of rules, which I later read and clearly states, "Fanny packs or other on-person storage devices are permitted," but yet, wearing my cinch bag as a back-pack was not a solution that anyone bothered to offer me. They apparently thought it was better to just cancel my membership without me even signing the cancellation form and kick me out of the facility all together. They even threatened to have authorities escort me off the premises if I did not leave, like some common criminal. When I asked for a contact number for their corporate office, I was given the number to the Amarillo location instead, who by the way, stated that they have had several phone calls from people with complaints about the management here in Lubbock. What a shame, they would rather boot someone out the door that has been a loyal member since they opened for business than to offer a solution that would benefit everyone involved, or heaven forbid just be polite to someone and request what they wanted in a friendly and courteous manner to begin with. I actually had other women come up to me before I left saying that they had the same experience with the heavy-set elderly woman rudely demanding they remove their bag from the floor area. I hope this review will be useful for anyone considering a membership here. Good luck.
Literally the most unhelpful postal office ever. Besides their unfriendly faces; I asked them to send a package and they said "We're a UPS Store, not a UPS," I'm not sure what to make of that..
SHONKY STAFF MESSAGE The phone message machine at Event Cinema Glenadale says to talk to an assistant please phone after 9.30am. One hour later and nobody is picking up. Monday 24-3-2014.
Our visit to Sandpiper Beacon Beach resort was interesting. We first ariaved at 12pm for check in, we were told that our room was ready, then as they checked, it was not ready. They said that the cleaning crew goes to lunch at 12:30 for 1 hour and that we would be able to get into our room no later than 2 pm. So we decided to go have lunch since they told us that we could not use the resort until we checked into our room, even though we had already put a $200 deposit down plus the $227 per night we had already paid for the room. Then they tell us that the room does not include our 2 children and we have to pay extra for them, there is additional $45 for them. We also make sure there is a iron in the room, they tell us it is a $20 cash deposit for the iron. We also ask about the deposit, they said that at check out our $200 deposit will be returned, it is now Thursday and no return of the deposit. 3 pm rolls around and they call and said that the room was ready. We go to our room, once we get in, the shower curtain was on the floor of the bathtub. We had 6 people in our room and when we checked in we told them that we needed more towels. Around 7-8 pm they decided to bring more towels. When we went to go and use the utensils, they were all filthy dirty and the plates were also. So, once again we had to wait for them to bring clean utensils, that was about 1 hour later and they didn't give us all new ones, they just swapped stuff out. The stove was from 1980 with used tin foil all in it. The room is half the size of a room at a $40 motel. I was very disappointed in this hotel, they did not have much to offer the kids on the holiday weekend. The lounge chairs the have you have to pay to sit in them (ridiculous). Also there is no continental breakfast. I must say, for as much as people pay to stay there, they need to offer a little bit more. I know that I could have stayed at the Holiday Inn Resort and paid about $50 less per night. I do not recommend you stay here at all. HUGE DISAPPOINTMENT!!!!
Do not go to this restaurant!!! They triple charged my credit card and when I called (with the card people on the line) they gave me some BS story about not having a manager or cashier to help with the matter. This restaurant is like a bad nightmare that will not go away! My wife wanted crab legs so we paid a premium (more than double the normal price) for crab legs. What a ripoff!!! The legs were small, they were old. It seemed they were on the buffet for a long time. Some of the other food was ok. Some of the food was either overseasoned or underseasoned. My 9 year old could not find anything he liked (he loves chinese food). All in all, it was not a good experience and I would not go back there and definitely not recommend this place to anyone. A waste of money.
Poor customer service. I do not recommend renting here
They never pick up their phone! and their website need improvement so you can order online!
These people are very disrespectful. We really tried to be nice and polite but they treat us like criminals or something.
For paying as much as we did, the service was slow,I don't fault the 2 girls working by themselves on a sat afternoon. Not only that, the food was not good. My burger had no flavor and was as plain as plain could be and my girlfriend's greenbeans were cold and tasted awful. If you want to pay too much for food and wait 40 minutes for it, go right ahead.
Thier Internet Sales is None. They never know the stock & are not at dealership. BAD sale practices- also it is kind of Backwards dealership. old & dirty
Shopped here a few times and the experience got worse and worse! dreadful customer service...have been ignored, shouted at and they are unhelpful. emailed a compliant to the head office, they replied apologising and offered a gift card which never arrived. haven't shopped here since. Wickes staff are wonderful I do recommend them.
They never answer the phone
They never answer the phone, been trying to track mail from a week ago supposedly delivered. No human being can be contacted at this location!
Terrible service staff! Was met with indifference by the service dept. representative and virtually no help in selecting components to add to my bike (which I bought there). After having the components installed, the staff members were noticeably 'put-upon' to make two minor (30 seconds) adjustments . They then complained that they have 30 bikes per day come in for repair. Expect extraordinarily surly– although timely– service.
Disappointed to hear my parents were not looked after. They lost their bus ticket and had to walk back to Gray line office. They wouldn't replace their ticket even though they had their credit card details from the morning. They were exhausted from walking with bad knee and very sad and disappointed missing 2 out of 3 days in New York all the way from Australia. Shocked to hear staff did not care at all.
This review is actually about Prescription Solutions, Inc - somehow tied to United Health Care. Prescription Solutions is terrible - the worst mail order pharmacy company I have ever used, AND its the ONLY mail order pharmacy I have ever been forced into using by an insurance company. I was told last month to call back the following day to process my refill because they were upgrading their system. Then, when I called the following day, I asked if they could get my script in the mail that day because I had only one pill left. They told me that wouldn't be possible that they were 2-3 days behind and that maybe i should call in earlier. I would've, if I would've received my reminder from their "reminder service." I asked why I did not receive a reminder last month and I was told some people fell through the cracks due to system upgrades and that ultimately its my responsibility. I agree, but then don't tell me to call back tomorrow and then when I do call, tell me you're 2-3 days backlogged. TERRIBLE TERRIBLE COMPANY AND CUSTOMER SERVICE. The only thing this company is good at in my opinion is delaying delivery of prescriptions to patients. My guess is some highly paid accountant has figured out how much the company saves/makes if they delay each person calling in to refill by a day... If I wasn't FORCED by UNITED HEALTH CARE to use this company, I'd be long gone, but this is the only way united will pick up my script. What United and Prescription solutions (more like Prescriptions Delayed, Inc) are doing should be illegal. Anyone know of any class actions or recourse that can be taken? If each of us speaks out, then maybe we can get what we pay for, or at least hurt their stock price!!
The best part of this room as the view of the ocean from the window. Worst parts was the musty old smell. the old 1960 fridge that kept me up all night and the outrageous price for misery. Don't recommend staying there!!
Me and my friends had booked in the restaurant for one of our birthday celebrations; but on arrival we were told we hadn't booked in even though we had. The person on reception was extremeley rude and was very arrogant to say the least. There was a very large congregation of women in the restaurant due to the England game on the Friday, so we have a feeling they turned away our custom to accomodate the said women. Having come from Stoke-on-Trent purposely for the meal it was safe to stay we were very angry and disappointed by the way we were treated, luckily we managed to get in at The Crown of India up the road which was fantastic. Safe to say we will never attempt to come here ever again, nor would we recommend anyone to go here, but I would recommend the Indian restuarant...
This place is a complete joke. I've lived in Miami for almost a year, and I'm still surprised people like this place. If I could give it zero stars I would, but I had to choose at least one. The staff is rude, the music is too loud, the DJ that was there on a Saturday night was completely lame, and there were supposed to be "free" drinks between 11 and midnight, but of course we stood in line forever, were let in about 2 minutes til, and then they wouldn't give us a free drink. Also, after waiting forever, there was hardly anyone in the place. I guess they just like making people wait outside so they're more angry when they get in, thus more eager to throw down money for drinks. Gin and Tonic $12, but so are tequila shots, so I had one or two. Don't waste your time or money on these classless people.
AVOID AVOID AVOID AVOID AVOID AVOID AVOID AVOID AVOID Returned to find my car battery had been fully drained, scratches around the car and driver side window developing a fault. To top it off the management of any complaint is simply to ignore the customer. I sincerely advise everyone to find alternative parking arrangements. N.B I will mention as well that this is my first complaint of any kind and is completely out of character for me.
The Shell gas station, I bought a full tank of gas and when I pulled out it completely made my engine sputter out and quit completely. Had to have it towed to a nearby mechanics shop and after checking everything possible they finally took my advice and emptied the fuel tank and lines and put new gas in and low and behold the car miraculously starts. so $600 later my car is working again. Also when my car originally sputter out after getting gas; a cop came to my aid since I was right off the interstate, and he called the tow truck for me. Anyways the police officer mentioned that there was 6 or 7 other vehicles that had just gotten gas from this station and had the exact same thing happen, so he took my name and phone number and license number, and date and time, due to a definate court case that was going to be taken against the station. So if you are smart I wouldn't ever get gas from this Shell gas station in 6416 State Highway 334 Whitestown, IN 46075.
This place is complete trash. No matter what you do they will find a way not to deliver your package. The customer service is terrible.
There's no excuse for serving stale (and funky tasting) donuts at 730 am on a Sunday morning. This applied to 3 of the 4 varieties of donuts that I purchased this morning.
Oh man do I wish I had read these reviews before I bought a living room set and dining room set here. Their customer service is so mind bogglingly bad I honestly can't believe they are still in business. I would tell the whole story here but it would be WAY too long. Basically they have delayed delivery on my items for almost a month and refuse to cancel the order. Meanwhile I am living in a new house without my furniture. On the phone the customer service was literally less than helpful. I finally had to drive to the store and talk to the manager who for the first 5 minutes of our conversation was trying to blame me for all of the issues. After I finally convinced him that everything was their fault he still refused to cancel the order and said that he could only offer me an in store credit of $50 (after failing to deliver on a $2100 transaction)... WHAT AM I SUPPOSED TO DO WITH $50 AT A FURNITURE STORE!!!!! Please for your the sake of your own time and sanity DO NOT SHOP HERE. As soon as the sale is final they will forget the fact that you are a human being and will begin to treat you like garbage.
None
In the market for a vehicle was actually looking into a Toyota got to the dealer and liked the new silverado. I was dealing with these guys for about a week when I got the call saying we have reached an agreement on price. A couple days later I told the salesman I would be in there later that day and when I got in there he had the truck ready all the paper work ready so I starting filling out everything I needed for financing then about 3 hours later the sales man returned and said they messed up and were trying to add 2k to the deal they negotiated down to Adding 500 on but I still wasnt making a deal. They call this sales technique BAIT AND SWITCH they got me back into the store at one price and tried adding to it after we already signed all the paperwork. They already charge a $200 doc fee then also try adding more before the deals over.
None
DO NOT USE THIS CLEANERS! I brought a shirt in to be cleaned. They gave it back to me completely torn and said it was because the shirt was "worn". All of my other shirts that thy cleaned show fraying at the collar, where there was no previous fraying. THE CUSTOMER SERVICE IS THE ABSOLUTE WORST. They are rude and very short with customers. This place is awful and needs to be out of our community.
None
Scheduled an appointment for Saturday with the lady on the phone stating that if I am late or had to cancel, the $50 deposit would not be refunded. I stated I have/had a $150 gift certificate. They stated I had to use this only on select dates. I chose 3/1/2014 which is a Saturday and then they penciled me in for that date. Fair enough, except when I drove 30 miles to go there, nobody was at the office. Several other customers were there too at the front door with me and nobody was there. The door was locked and everything. Called the office and left a message (as well as the other girl) and I never got a response. The office next door called the doctor and he stated they didn't know about any bookings today. They didn't seem real concern whatsoever about calling to say sorry or anything. Apparently people/customers come second here. I felt a type of feeling of "Pay and get out" attitude with all of this. I wouldn't get work there if it was free with that type of attitude especially if customers are treated with this lack of respect. By the way, this is the second time my appointment was made and cancelled (in this case a no-show).
Ok heres my story. I bought a 2010 Subaru STI from these guys and I ask if they had an inspection report done to the vehicle. Guy told me they can't give me a copy but showed me a piece of paper that just said "clean". Carfax shows it doesn't have any accidents or whatnot but carfax to me don't mean ****! Anyway I went ahead and bought the car from them. Two days later I started noticing hesitations during acceleration so I brought the car to another shop that I know of that specializes on STI's. They did a compression test and found out cylinder number 2 had low compression and immediately told me to take the car back to the dealer and have it inspected. So I took the car back and told them what happened and stuff. I told them that if they can't fix the car I want my trade in back and the sales guy just started giving me all these attitudes saying there's nothing wrong with the car and they didn't need to do a compression on a 2010 vehicle. I told the guy it had 90k miles for a 2010! AND the car was previously modified to where it didn't have a catalytic converter!! Geez thats wayy over the average! So I told them they need to fix everything and then said they would be willing to but they refused to give me a rental!! Had a little confrontation with the sales guy until he finally said he will give me a rental. Not my fault they sold me a bunked car which is there resposibility to repair. Fast forward one month later after headaches and frustration over who was in charge of repairing the vehicle (told me crosspoint the car auction sold jordan the car and was a "guaranteed" vehicle), they took it to Lithia Subaru to get repaired. Lithia would not give the repair invoices done to the vehicle due to me not hiring them. So I asked jordan motorz and they wouldn't give me the info either! I had no way of getting it from Crosspoint because they only deal with dealers and not private party. Finally the car was done at Lithia and I drove it home. Now here's the second bad news.. The car BROKE DOWN AGAIN 3 days later!! FML.. Took the car back to my shop and had reinspected and told me now cylinder number 4 has 0 COMPRESSION!! WTF!? Okay so I went back to Jordan and told them what happened so they insisted I bring it back to Lithia Subaru cause now they are blaming Lithia. Had the car towed back to Lithia and they would not work on it since there was no warranty work issued on the cylinder 4 side since they didn't touch it. So a battle issued upon Jordan Motorz, Crosspoint and Lithia. Lithia is accusing me of "rallying" saying a ton of brake dust on the wheels.. BUT THE CAR WAS IN THERE SHOP FOR A MONTH!! Not even washed since day one I bought it!! Nobody is able to help me out with my car.. I keep asking jordan for a copy of the invoices from subaru and finally I was able to get one. Luckily I bought a warranty program for the vehicle so I will use that as my last option to repair the vehicle knowing Jordan Motorz will NOT take responsibility for any repairs. These guys are CROOKS just like everyone else says and they just want your money and leave you hanging! DO NOT DO BUSINESS HERE!! This is my ONLY warning!! They have a F rating on the BBB!! I will post more reviews elsewhere to warn everybody.. Oh one other thing I forgot to mention. The two cars Jordan loaned me while my car was in the shop had PROBLEMS as well. The battery on the chevy impala was pretty much to dead and I wasn't able to start the car a few times plus the windshield wipers STOP working on me. Second car they loaned me was a toyota highlander and it had BAD axles!! Both of these cars were going for sale on there lot! This place is not a hit and miss..
Just tried it for the first time based on some of the reviews I had read. Don't go is all I can say. Across the street is MUCH MUCH better.
SLUM LORDS!! The whole time I lived there they refused to respond to my calls about the mold in my ceiling and hole from the rain, rain leaking all over my carpet and belongings. For three months they refused to repair it then when I left there without them ever doing their part they tried to bill me for supposedly not cleaning the place! LIARS- my apartment was clean except for their failure to keep up maintenance AND they never gave me the $100 referral fee I earned by referring a friend and continue to hunt me down with a $300 credit report claim saying I owe them money when the reverse is actually true. The manager will NEVER come to the phone and getting any sort of professional help from them is a pipe dream. Drugs in the apartments of neighbors are smelled through the inside hallway and shared vents. the community utility set up is such a rip off- you are charged at least $125 a month for heat that you have NO CONTROL OVER. They turn it on for the whole building in Sept. and don;t turn it off until Memorial Day. Half the time you have to open the window just to be able to breathe and not die from heat on warm nights- but, then YOU have to pay for the fact they run their heat 24 hrs a day 9 months a year! The people they hire suck and their turn over rate is out of this world, the first office manager they had when I lived there was asking me if I could get her painkillers right after I signed my lease! Stay Away from here they are selfish assholes who do not care about anything except screwing you over for as much money as possible.
Wow, 1 star is too kind. They screwed me over SO BADLY it makes me puke. I work across the street, went to get my oil changed since I've done it there 10+ times. I asked them to call when the car is ready and leave the key in the car. They said it was no problem, bit they did neither. So after work, I went to my car, no key and they were closed and would be closed all day Sunday, the next day so I was stranded in a parking lot with no car for over a day because they were too lazy to call before they left for the weekend. They also put the oil cap on wrong causing a leak. Go ANY WHERE else but here.
110 for diagnostic. Then I had to pay over 250 for brand new tires bc the cheaper ones that were originally advertised to me were somehow unavailable all of a sudden. Which brings us to 360. Then my breaks apparently needed to get fixed too. He quoted me 760 for everything. I kindly declined. If you like getting beat over the head in prices feel free to visit here but I won't be returning.
Wow just saw it on Kitchens Nightmare. Its beyond unbelievable Gordon had to pull out his show which I think its the first time on the show. The owners are sadly delusional and not willing to take criticism. Such a shame!
None
อยากไป....
The service was good, but the food was lousy. I paid $13 for fish and chips and was brought cold, pre-made (processed) fish sticks, I can buy in the store myself. Very disappointing!!!
As a new client there I had high hopes, but now my review is not a good one. I am still in my first month and I had a theft there last week and was LIED to by Wendy who told me to call in 2 days to speak to Christine the Manager to see video footage. My husband went in to speak to her in person 2 days later and was unfortunately given lame excuses and MAJOR attitude from the DM Brian Majors. Apparently their security cameras were BROKEN for over a week, conveniently when our items were stolen. Most of them were replaceable, EXCEPT for one apartment application that has ALL of my personal info, like my Social Security Number, Bank info, etc., so basically my IDENTITY! What makes no sense and is suspicious is that Wendy knew the cameras were not working and LIED to us saying we could contact Christine two days later to see the video footage. Wendy also said that the clients there have expensive things and nobody steals since they are good people. This made no sense why she would say this either, cameras are there for a reason, SECURITY! When we called Christine, we were told the DVR was broken since the week before and was being repaired. She said Wendy should have told us, and did not know why she didn't. After thinking of reasons for Wendy to lie, it made sense that it is an inside job since the only people aware of cameras not working are the employees. So great job Wendy, now you are a suspect! Even if we got a subpoena and filed a report there is NO VIDEO FOOTAGE to view. I thought my belongings were secure, now I suspect an inside job and am fearing identity theft. I would not recommend this storage facility. The 'free truck' sounded great but now I think it's another excuse to get you in there so they can scope out your things and take what they want. Sorry but since Brian Majors was a MAJOR prick to my Husband, and Wendy is a liar, what are we left to think? Our stuff vanished and even with 'insurance' through their company we have nothing to go on. It's very suspicious and unfortunate and they failed to be professional, now they just look like thieves. I can't wait to move out!! Something is very fishy. Christine was nice and so is Sergio, but that does not bring my stuff back and I am SO disappointed.
I would prefer, of there is any 0.5 star for this rating. I was a kind of guy to try different restaurants to crave for different tastes ( noted that if they have groupon). So choose this restaurant as I generally like mexican and I fell in love with that taste when I first time tasted at GTO, S Howel Ave, Milaukee. Coming to this one, is horrible experience and taste was so bad that I have deleted this from my list of new restaurants and I would not prefer to any of my friends. I have ordered Veggie Fajithas, looks like prepared way before and re-heated as I don't see any sizzlings on the dish and beans they served with this OMG....black beans..never had this kind. generally most of mexican restaurants will server refried beans and I love that. and finally here is another item Cheese quesdilla another horrible item.. Finally..what I would say, this is place that I would never visit again and will not suggest to my friends to waste their holiday night dinner with this crap.... Staff is good and ambiance is okay kind...but I guess we go to restaurant to taste the food not just to sit inside...
I needed my oil changed so I took my 2012 camaro to this dealership, oil change went good. Then they told me that there was a recall on it and to bring it back. I brought it back to have them fix the recall. They told me that the recall was an issue with the air bag so I thought that I should have this fixed. Turns out that the recall was not for my air bag, but the air bag light, which worked until this dealership got a hold of it. They said that they tried to fix it but was unable to because my stereo. They could not tell me why, just used my stereo as an excuse on why they messed up my air bag that no longer works. So because of this dealership I have a $50k camaro that does not have a working airbag. I have been arguing with this dealership and have been told if I want them to fix it back to how it was before I brought it there I will have to sue them. It is very sad that is what I have to do to get my camaro back to working safety. If you value your vehicle I would never take it here!
None
Unfortunately this is the worst place I've ever been. Way under staffed and I have been waiting over an hour for a pizza. If you value your time stay away from here.
Nicht zu empfehlen. Mit Abstand das schlechteste thailändische Gericht das ich jemals gegessen habe.
WORST PLACE ON THIS PLANET!! OLD guy was NUTS - He drove me and wife away from restaurant - Reason - Asking what are vegetarian choices - Told us this is not your house and cannot prepare how we wanted - we were surprised the guy had the guys to speak like this to a customer Finally snatched the menu from our hand and said - GO HOME AND COOK UR FOOD AND EAT DISGUSTING PLACE - STINKING - AND A RUDE GUY WHO CAN BARELY SPEAK ENGLISH!!
Leider miserabel. Zwei verpfuschte Bestellungen innerhalb von 2 Wochen. Einmal wurde die falsche Größe geliefert und bestellte Zutaten vergessen, die Pizza ging postwendend zurück und wurde in phänomenalen 10 Minuten nachgeliefert. Gerade eben wurden zusätzlich bestellte Zutaten vergessen und die Pizza war nach insgesamt 45 Minuten kalt. Bei der Reklamation bot man mir an die Pizza auszutauschen, ich sollte allerdings weitere 30 - 45 Minuten warten weil wohl gerade viel los ist. Das kam für mich nicht mehr in Frage. In letzter Zeit leider extrem nachlassender Service obwohl die Pizza generell gut ist. Vor einigen Monaten habe ich einen Pizzaschneider als Wiedergutmachung geschenkt bekommen nachdem ähnliche Vorfälle aufgetreten sind. Anscheinend wird versucht den Kunden zufriedenzustellen, bekommen aber den Service nicht auf die Reihe.
pathetic food....not authentic japanese or chines...fusion is bad...
pricey!
On this past August 3rd, 2013, I stayed at the Hampton Inn Nashville-Airport, and had the very unfortunate experience of being lodged next door to a group of guests that held a party in their room into the early morning hours. It took 3 calls to the front desk before the manager on duty escorted the guests and their friends from the building around midnight. I unfortunately had lost precious hours of sleep, considering I was waking up very early the next day to drive 800 miles to my next destination. The following morning at check-out the attendant apologized for the experience and said the manager, Larry Manghane, would be sending me a certificate for an complimentary night stay to compensat, per Hampton Inn's 100% Guarantee policy. Two weeks passed, and I was not contacted by Hampton Inn, nor received any information or reimbursement. Any emails to Mr. Manghane have gone unanswered. As far as I can tell, Hampton Inn's 100% satisfaction guarantee policy is a farce, at least at this location. I recommend staying somewhere else to save your money and get some sleep.
None
I don't want to fill out a goddamn crown card. Long lines. I saw rats and cockroaches in the theater. There was a pubic hair in my softserve.
corrupt cops. you have police officers making up tickets for something that didn't even happen. I was wearing my seatbelt and he gave me a ticket for not wearing a seatbelt definitely very corrupt and wasting my time now in fighting this ticket
The food reminded me of their frozen microwave dinners and the ambiance is like an old folks home. No reason to go here.
I would not recommend the Toowong branch of this business to anyone. In the past I have had: - scratches and damage to the car - jobs explicitely requested at dispatch not executed - permanent attempts to up-sell in a most annoying manner - upon asking for work to be corrected, I was insulted by a man calling himself 'Dave', but unwilling to give a full name. "Dave" - Quotes: "You are a waste of time." "You will not get any useful information from me." - there is no business listing or address available (anonymous business) I cannot say anything about the quality of the other locations. But this one should be avoided. There are alternatives not to far away. Use Google Maps.
I haven't had good experiences with these guys. They recently charged me £178 to service my bike, there were various charges applied that were not made clear at the time I made my booking and they weren't overly contrite about it. Very poor customer service, they seemed to do a decent job on the bike though.
Worst Location!!!! Avoid!!! So I had received a coupon to Great Clips. It had a set of 3 coupons and each one expired about a month apart from the other. I had previously used the first coupon at this location with no problem. When I went to use the second valid coupon that was not expired and had expiration date clearly written on it. The employees ganged up on me saying that the coupon was not for their location and that the one for their location had already expired. They didn't even let me explain, but they ran to the back pulling the expired coupon that they had claiming that they had the coupon, but it was expired. On my coupon it states that it is "Good at greater Dallas/Fort Worth area salons". What makes the least sense is that the coupon was sent to my address which is in the same zip code as this Great Clips. The employee charged me full price and kept on saying that the coupon was expired and it was not their location. When it clearly has the expiration date on the coupon proving the it had not been expired. Needless to say I will not be going back. I would recommend others to avoid, unless they like arguing with rude employees.
My issue: My bank account was charged BEFORE everything was approved, and customer service with the Greer location is severely lacking. This Enterprise charged my card, and everything seemed good until one of the workers gave me a printout saying I wasn't approved because of credit (understandable since I'm fairly young.) That was the last they said anything. I had to ask what was going on, and the lady that helped me said that the transaction had been voided. My roommate and I then walked down the street to Hertz and got everything approved there, but since Enterprise had charged my card, I wasn't able to afford the rental. Thing is, my car had just broken down, so getting a car was vital to getting to work and back home. Corporate has been gracious and is working with me. However, after calling this location back twice now, there has been nothing courteous, professional or understanding about the situation. All they've told me is that the money will be back in my account in 1-2 business days. Second time we called, they said we had to be approved before my card was charged. Shady talk, anyone? (I believe we spoke to Chris.) Both my roommate and I have missed work because we were unable to get a car because we were charged a week's worth for a rental car. We're both pretty much stuck until that money is refunded. Unless you're able to afford getting over $600 or so taken from your account without getting a car, I would avoid this location. However, I wouldn't completely discount Enterprise in general. This is my first time renting a car, and I will probably be going to Hertz for further rentals.
Threw medicine at my sick cat, over 4 visits in a month to try and resolve his eye issues. Cost me over 1000 dollars. Charged me 40 dollars for a used container of an amino acid which costs 10 dollars online. Every time I asked a question I felt like I was being talked down to. We eventually went to a specialist who diagnosed it correctly the first time, got us the right medicine and got our cat healthy. Her staff is helpful and delightful though which is nice. The Dr. is crook though, and took advantage of my love for my cat.
I placed an order for pickup, my estimated time for pickup was 7:23pm. When I arrived at 7:26pm after paying for my order they informed me my pizza was ready but that they had forgotten to prepare the breadsticks I ordered and I would have to wait. Normally I am a patient person and would have waited the 5-10 minutes for my breadstick however this is not the first time I have had a problem at this specific location. (5825 W Bell Rd) About two months ago we visited this location to grab some quick dinner after some shopping at the Walmart in the same parking lot, we order and were told it would take 15 minutes for our pizza to be ready for carryout. After waiting almost 45 minutes we finally received our pizza, we decided at the point we would just eat there and went and sat at a table to eat. About 2 minutes in a employee male I believe his name is Jonathan came over grabbed a chair from a nearby table proceed to turn it around and sit in the chair backwards to talk to us. Very rudely he told us we were not welcome to eat our dinner there since we ordered carryout not dine in and the prices are different. He even accused of doing this on purpose to get a better deal, which was not the case at all. I am normally not one to complain being a Manager in the service industry I understand ever situation is perceived differently by each costumer. However after two unsatisfied visits to the same location I felt something needs to be said about the location and the service or lack there of. I was never once apologized to this evening for my order being incomplete. I had them refund me and took my business elsewhere. I order from Pizza Hut a lot not just for personal but business as well and have never had issue like I have with this location.
Went to have patches sewn on a vest. Was told it would be 9$ a patch. The lady was rude and acted like they didn't want my business. The only reason I stopped in was the business I like to use was too busy to get me in that day. Ill wait patiently instead of being treated like an idiot. By the way my place charges 2.00 a patch no matter what size.
None
Terrible. No response to phone calls and have not received my final product that I paid for last year.
This was the first time we've eaten here, so my husband and I were going to share one bowl. The visit didn't start off well when the waiter read me the riot act about sharing a bowl as if we were trying to get away with something. So I felt obligated to order an appetizer as well even though I didn't really want that much food. He then took me over to all the raw ingredients (including raw meat that looks just nasty sitting there) which were set up buffet style and showed me recipe cards I could follow if I wanted. Well, if I wanted to follow a recipe or figure out what food goes well with other food and how to season it, I'd save money, stay home and cook it myself. I go out to eat so I don't have to do those things, as figuring out how to season meat leaves me in a complete state of panic, which is why I love making salads... I ended up putting something together that was edible, but I was so stressed about what they heck I was doing, I was not hungry by the time the food came to the table. I was also put off by the fact that there were several signs to tip both the servers and the "Grill Masters". Not quite sure why when the patrons "get" to put the ingredients together themselves. I would NOT recommend Genghis Grill to a friend, I'd tell them to eat at home instead and save themselves some money.
Worst experience...the hotel is just a renovated building with literally no facilities...no food...no facilities at all...stay at ur own risk
Degueulasse
I have gone here several times but recently after the snow hit I went again and the things that whip against your car apparently accumulate sand and other particles that damaged the paint on my car! There were no scratches before I went in! When I brought my car back to the car wash they said that it wasn't their machines and there was nothing they could do to help me. Awful customer service.
None
Terrible service. Couldn't get a hold of anyone for more than a week. Finally got in touch with someone and didn't deliver as promised.
Avoid at all costs, Just got ripped off, £4.80 for 1 pint of Peroni lager. Best going elsewhere. No wonder it's quiet :-(
I bought £30 of diesel ( definitely diesel out of the black pump marked diesel and diesel on the receipt) at this station today on top of £10 worth already in the tank and the car immediately became gutless and wouldn't go above 50. Went to the gas station at Barton Mills and filled it to the brim with diesel and immediately the car regained power though not to 100%. Tried to ring the garage and could not get through. Will never use this garage again!
I race to pay my bill which I know they close at 6 pm and I got to the door 1 minute to 6 pm and the fat lady at the door locked and shook her head telling me thier closed. Really ! 1 min ??? AWFULL CUSTOMER SERVICE !!!! PLS IT WAS RAINING !!!VERY POOR C.S
I have always disliked Mediacom's "bait and switch" pricing, where they give you an introductory offer and then the cost incrementally goes up over the course of your contract until you are paying twice as much as you signed on with. But now they have introduced "overage charges" on top of this, where if you go over a certain amount of internet usage a month you get slapped with extra charges. They have the fastest internet in town. This used to be enough of a selling point to justify dealing with them, but now that they fine you if you actually use that extra bandwidth there is no reason to stick with them.
It was really awkward to here an employment business tell me they do not need white workers there....... I think it may be in their best interest to possibly go through a harassment training course at their office....
very rude on the phone. All they said was I would have to come and look myself and hung up. Lol whats the point of having a phone? might as well get an automated machine
Terrible! I had the Texas BBQ with a gluten free base (only available in small?) with no cheese (lactose free cheese is available but not on offer here for some strange reason) no alternative topping was offered, although if you want extra cheese it costs the same as an extra topping so you would have thought they'd offer a replacement for the cheese...but no. When it arrived I laughed out loud. To say the amount of toppings put on were meagre would be an understatement. 6 (one for every slice) small 1 inch by half inch strip of bacon that didn't taste of anything. Minute particles of chicken, which again tasted of nothing and a few green (only green?) peppers. The BBQ sauce was the only thing they were generous with (probably because there was no cheese) but it tasted sickly sweet. Overall for the price I could have made a couple of large gluten free pizzas (with lactose free cheese) that actually taste like a pizza. There is a reason why I don't eat takeaway food that often, because it is just plain awful as well as being unhealthy for you.
Truly awful! Food arrived under cooked. Everything was bland. Overpriced. Bad service. The bathrooms literally looked like they hadn't been cleaned in MONTHS; just imagine what the kitchen looks like. Worst restaurant experience I've ever had. Ick.
Will never visit this location again. But the shrimp pasta was excellent.
I ordered online and they never delivered. The driver went to the wrong building and although they say the driver called, no one called me. Not worth the money,
This bank refused to let me withdraw my cash and refused to allow me to close my account, because I also have a vehicle loan through them and I am ONE month behind, they are choosing to take my cash and not let me have it. Do not open an account here or take a loan out through this institution.
None
We've gone there several times. Service is slow and employees are rude and incompetent. It looks as if they are more interested in flirting with each other than waiting on customers. On two separate occasions we waited at the drive thru to order and no one addressed us. We had to drive up to the window and order there. On two other separate occasions we placed an order for 2 vanilla cones and one twist cone. The order was read back as 2 vanilla cones. When asked about the twist cone they replied that their chocolate isn't working. The employee was just going to ignore the order for the twist cone instead of informing me that there is no chocolate. I've had it with that place. I can go to McDonalds for the same size vanilla cone but CHEAPER and FASTER.
I've attempted to register for a session for several days now. The website only gives an error message when trying to select classes and if you call, you either get transferred from person to person until a voice mail comes up that does not let you leave a message or the phone just rings and rings and no one answers. I've tried emailing as well with no response. If you truly want business professionals to enroll...the registration must be simple.
Terrible! Absolutely terrible! They are a monopoly and have high rates that take advantage of Lubbock residents since there are no other competing companies. You will get what you deserve and I will be a part of the protest against this company. I keep my ac at 78-80 throughout the day hours, have washed 9 loads of laundry all month and open my windows for air often after turning the ac OFF! At night I turn the ac to 76 for 7 hours and it then goes back up to 79. The temperatures are cooler and my bill is over $200!
I paid 16.90 for two Cuba Libre (one with Havana Club 3 Year, one with 7 Year) and two Mahou bottles. I am confident they overcharged this tourist. My fifth time to Valencia, last time to Cafe Tertulia.
Treated very rude to over the phone, wasn't even able to understand the last sentence as she hung up on me., But I clearly understood that this wasn't something they would want to take on and it would be very costly. But, since I am a disabled veteran I guess I couldn't afford them anyways so I suggest you need to remove Landlord & Tenant Practice from your areas of exquisite expertise!
Poor service. The food wasn't very good. And everything was WAY overpriced.
This place sucks... service comparable to the DMV.
Not a real DD. You have to make your own coffee.
Too many breeds, no health tests,etc. Charge way too much
I grew up around these Apartments I knew a lot of drug addicts from there. Also They are now kicking 6 month pregnant friend out of them because her boyfriend beat her up and is only giving her 3 days to vacate. So drug addicts are okay but victims of domestic violence are not?
The class i took was excellent but the financial aid department is garbage! they've sent my higher one card to an address which i never gave them and basically have me fending for myself with no type of help or services to correcting their mistakes. I'm frustrated dealing with a institution that does not want to help with their own faults and i have to buy books for my class. I am dropping myself from this school in total this week. Thanks LACC for nothing
This was just a painful evening. Nice place until the dj screwed the pooch. He spent 1/3 of the time smoking up outside, a third of the time playing loud obnoxious music so no one could hear themselves think, then the last amount of time singing during everyone's karaoke. Way to ruin a potentially good time birthday boy.
The terrible service here is legendary. Watch out for the automatic 18% gratuities added to the checks. After a very long wait, our food finally started coming out in spurts. By the time the last plate made it to the table, our burgers and fries were stone cold. I was never offered a refill of my tea, so I had to choke the big, cold bun down dry. When a server is aware that a patron is unhappy with the service, it is unconscionable to force an 18% tip.
After five months of non-stop issues, I am finally reporting Byrne to the BBB because they have gone too far. They have trumped up charges to take out of our security deposit that are inconsistent with the condition of the property. The condition was deplorable when we moved in, but we managed to bump it up to liveable in the short time we were there. They purport thorough video inspection between every tenant, but I believe my report will show otherwise. To summarize the full letter: The home was not clean when we moved in. The carpets were so bad that I questioned whether they had been shampooed; I was provided a receipt and told that whatever stains there were could not be removed. The cleaning we paid for (and provided a receipt to Byrne) used pet enzyme AND removed spots that were pre-existing, including a huge stain in the bathroom. They have since re-done the carpets (due to tenant request!!) and are assessing us a $150 charge. Incidentally, they used the same company that "cleaned" the carpets before us. They also charged us $100 for "touch up cleaning" and provided no details as to what was cleaned. We did leave all of the junk that was there when we moved in- including about 10 cans of paint that were in the furnace room when we arrived. This is a MAJOR safety hazard which Byrne has written into their leasing contract as such and yet missed during their inspection. We also left all of the bricks and containers present in the backyard when we moved in, though we spent 2 weekends sorting through the rusty nails, dead mice, and animal feces thrown in with them. They were neatly stacked when we left. Bathroom: mold/water damage on walls and ceilings, chipping/peeling (probably lead) paint, years of cobwebs and dust on the shower curtain apparatus, the sink didn't drain, and a stained/carpeted floor. When they finally dealt with it, their maintenance man did not close off the area while sanding and scraping (kicking all of that paint dust into my house), did not prime before painting, and did not use any sort of drop cloth. There was paint on everything, and when he left he did not clean up the debris; I had to clean up all of the lead paint chips everywhere. In addition to the cleanliness and functional issues detailed above, the property has water damage under the kitchen sink, shelving units throughout the house are not secure, there is a spigot leaking continuously in the back yard, the paint job is atrocious, the floors are terribly scraped, stained, torn and uneven, doors don't latch properly, there are numerous unrepaired holes and unfinished patches in the walls, the kitchen counters are burned/scraped/sagging, the refrigerator has penis drawings all over it, the bathroom sink didn't drain (we took care of it), multiple light switches and power outlets don't function, many windows are painted shut, and the windows and insulation are so poor that the walls were actually cold to the touch. In regards to their administration: Someone came out for our "semi-annual inspection;" she mistakenly noted that we had two cats. I was home with our authorized animals (1 dog 1 cat) when she inspected. We then received a $100 fine and a letter threatening eviction. I had to make time for them to come again. They missed other appointments without calling to inform me. They were also blatantly dishonest when marketing this property online. They called it a 2 or possibly 3 bedroom home with a finished basement when advertising. It is a very small one bedroom house with a minimally (poorly) finished basement. Advertising also said it has a one car garage- it is a shed that no car could park in. They were also using photos with the previous paint job online until I informed Angela. I will tell every person I can- you don't want to be involved with this mess.
New company and we lost service as soon as they took over.
Waited 25 min with no service at all. Had 3 employees look me straight in the eye and walk away. The only guy that came to ask if I needed anything was a direct TV employee.
Stand in a queue for 25 minutes to place your order for lunch (one poor girl dealing with a full lunch crowd), wait another hour for the meal to arrive - had to send dessert back because it came before the main course! Poor selection of wines by the glass and the only sparkling on offer was a sickly sweet Omni. The staff seemed to have an aversion to clearing away dirty dishes, every table was covered and clients had to stack them up out of the way so there was enough room for the next course. It was so bad we got the giggles.....
My Family and I are new to Bend, We have tried an number of pizza restaurants and I think that Pappy's Pizzeria was the worst. I agree with the one of the other reviewers the likened Pappy's pizza to cardboard, but I would add expensive cardboard.
None
Lame. Went because Newport Beach OSF is one of my favorite restaurants. This one needs help. Tuesday night, our waiter was scared, food took forever, do did my second glass of wine. When our salads came at 45minutes we were ready to leave and choose a different restaurants. We ordered gluten free pasta (I know dumb) but they literally sent manager to tell us they were "cooking up a new batch" we got it 30 min later. The waiter walked by me 4 times and never looked over before I said "check" irritated. He didn't even ask about the included dessert that we were passing on any way just hurried the check across the table top and bolted. I wish I had talked to the manager again. My 3,5,and 6 year old daughters were ready to fire him and the server. We won't be back with so many better choices when we're on town.
Hard to work with. They acted as if it were a major inconvenience to respond to questions.
I asked the owner if he needed any help finding certified installers because of complaints that were made about installations by his crew and I guess he thinks I trying to get something out of him so he refused... And still I'm getting phone calls from customers who need me to find someone to re-do an installation job that was performed by a fly by night crew who uses his store as there showroom. If someone offers you a gift, Take it. Believe them when they tell you another person is costing you money. This business is more than just sales and slapping TV's on the wall, Its also about service and reputation. Its a shame...
taste of food was not bad, but had stomach upset after i went home. then I realized that food was not fresh. Also, Restaurant owner is rude.
I called twice to make an appointment for my sister and mom and I to have side by side pedicures. We did this last summer and it was wonderful. When I tried to make an appointment this year, I called a month in advance and they said they didn't have their schedule open yet. so I tried again two weeks later. they said they only had one gal working that day and that they would try and get two more and call me back. I never heard back. So I made the effort to go into the spa and try in person. I explained what had happened so far and they were very apologetic and that their manager would call me once they could get the schedule sorted. They never called. This is ridiculous. what kind of spa only has one nail tech on a SUNDAY IN AUGUST. when we went last year, they were fully booked the entire time we were there and there were 4 nail techs. I also tried for the Saturday before thinking maybe they would have more nail techs on a Saturday. Same thing....very disappointed.
The waiter was a pleasant young man who did not seem that he was not that experiene d. However he tried. When the bread was brought out, it was luke, luke wam and hard. The crust was so hard, it could not be broken without force. The circular part of the bread was a bit softer, but not like garlic bread. The waiter brought us more bread and it was better. He explained the daily made bread, etc. The ordered dishes came. I had an egg noodle with ground veal and tomato sauce with a little cream. It was tasteless. There was a glimpse of tomato sauce and more cream. But it was not spicy. The garlic bread had red pepper on it. I took a salad that came with the meal, and thought I would be safe. But then a burning sensation came. When mentioning it to the waiter, he says -"Oh there must have been a jalapeno pepper hiding in the salad greens. Ha, ha" This salad was turned back and of course waste occurred. While eating, a very large serving, my guess said " look!" It was a baby roach crawling on the table. It scampered like roaches do, but we got it. Telling the waiter, he simply responded "do you want desert". He was told - we are leaving. He brought the bill with no apology, and we paid We should have walked out with no bill, but we ended up with a 27.00 bill and a terrible evening. I would never go back, and I surely don't recommend entering the front door for there may be free roaming roaches in the kitchen, unsupervised, untrained, and allowed to run as an unruly child.
God this hotel is a disaster bedrooms were terrible dont think anyone was every showed how to make a bed bar was ok at night cosy but impossibe to be served bar man was out side front door smoking and at one stage both reception girl and bar man were out side the front door smoking had to ring a bell to get help, best part of our stay was the kitchen was out of order so thankfully we were taken by taxi to the carlton for dinner on both nights would never stay here again it nearly but us off Tralee
Service and backyard ambience is good. However, the food isn't excellent. The mangalore fish curry has only 6 small pieces but cost $24. It just doesn't taste good in the mouth. Grilled drumsticks are okay if it's more tender. I won't go back again.
This store is beautiful. I love supporting local stores, but I cannot go back as this is the third time I have received bad service. The sales associate was very rude and I would highly recommend finding someone else to work the floor if you hope to keep customers returning. You can find the same prices and items on Amazon and other baby stores, wish I could keep coming here for my cloth diapers but third time's the charm for me. Seeya!
Never take your pet here! I made the mistake of taking my dog there bcs I thought he had an ear infection, I asked how much it would cost to get him examined, tested and get the meds, they told me no more than $80. Well $200 later I found out that it wasn't an ear infection after all. The whole visit consisted of them forcing me to watch stupid videos about their monthly plan which they try to shove down your throat and on top of it all they couldn't even spell my dogs name right...
This location is not Gebze Otogar anymore. It is Gebze Center (Shopping) for more than 3 years.
After waiting 5 weeks for my shade sail to arrive, they arrived but had been poorly measured and could not be fitted. That afternoon I received the following email: "For us to redo the shades will cost us more on this job than if we just call it quits at this point. Therefor we are not going to proceed any further and just accept our loss at this stage". While I accept mistakes happen, a business that treats customers like this does not deserve your business and I urge you to find a more reputable business to deal with.
I went shopping for last minute items for Christmas. When the cashier was ringing up my order one of the toys didn't come up in the system. She asked me how much it was, I didn't know, but said I would go get another one. When I got back to the register an assistant manager was removing all of my gift cards that the cashier had just rung up and they were going to re-check me out at a different register. When I asked why I had to move, they decided to open a register next to me and help the customer behind me get all of his groceries off the conveyor and placed at the new register. Then they had a manager come and clear out all their deletions & re-rang me at the same register. This wasted a good 20 minutes of my busy day all for a toy that wasn't in the system. When I finally got to pay for my items, I had to ask the assistant manager to move as he was right behind me & I didn't need him watching as I entered my pin number. There might not be a lot of competition here, but Walmart is just down the street. And next time that happens I won't be so nice about helping them find prices. I wish I had just walked out. The assistant manager and the cashier had no common sense and between the two of them not thinking about what they were doing, they lost a loyal customer.
I've always taken my vehicles here for exhaust repairs and had a decent experience until today. Last week I called to see if my daughter could take her car in on a walk in basis or needed an appt. They said come in anytime. I asked if they had flex pipe for her car and they assured me they did. Friday of last week she takes her car in only to find out that they can't fix it that day. They COULD have taken 5 minutes to diagnose it and make sure they had the part, but didn't. Today she takes it in AGAIN, this is while working around a work and school schedule, only to be told they DONT have the part. At this point they've wasted my time and two days of my daughter's time. We won't take anything there anymore and I'll tell everyone I know to avoid this shop unless they have time for the typical auto repair bullshit you get at most shops. Sorry Ricks, you've gone way downhill. UPDATE: Just an update to my first review, we've now had the car fixed elsewhere at less than HALF the cost that Ricks quoted us. $75 to fix it vs. $160 quoted by Ricks. AVOID THIS SHOP!!!
Sad - USPS has lost over 10 do not bend photo envelopes in the last 3 months. Then a company has sent me a check for a payment 2x, check the address both times - it was right. No check. Called the post office and they apologized and couldn't believe their was a problem with that driver, he has been a carrier for more than 30 years. They were suppose to call me back the next day after seeing if they could find the problem- it has been a week and all I get is a busy signal. Hundreds of dollars in product later, I am no further than I was before. And they wonder why we prefer using UPS when ever we can.
The most pathetic service ever and anywhere! Stay away from comcast if you can because they really suck in this area. Had comcast before and was very good but now it is really disappointing.
Avoid the Travelodge El Cajon at all costs. First off - our small company spends at least $100,000 a year in hotel travel, and due to this I have worked with countless hotel managements and taken reviews from our many field employees. In all my time, I have not had to deal with such an unethical and lousy manager, Baren and his assistant Napha. The review from my own employee was that the area was teeming with drug addicts and homeless, that not only hang around the cars in the parking lot at night, but are also guests living there. The carpet, curtains and beds are decrepit and smell or iodine and semen. The A/C is older than my parents, and the place is reminiscent of a 1950's murder mystery. The bathroom's are not well taken care of, and from the photos taken, there was mold growing under the sink and in the corners of the shower floor. As you can see from other reviews, there is also a cockroach problem. Luckily, these huge critters were not seen inside the room. This place needs to be inspected the city so that they can shut it down. To top it all, we booked his room for 4 nights, and our employee could only hold his disgust until the morning of night 1, in which he was kept up all night by the activity outside. When we demanded that we be allowed to check out and pay only for the night that he was there, the manager, Baren refused to refund the last 2 nights. We were reasonable, and willing to at least pay for the 2nd night, because we were checking out the day of, but they just wanted their money. I hope this hellhole is finally shut down, so that the 'putrid insects' can finally skitter away from this place. (I'm referring to the management.)
Compared to other Melting Pot restaurants, this one sucks. You can never make a reservation. When you do, service is horrible. Plus no military discount, even though all the other ones in PA offer one,
None
Worst aiims center, no good transport service!
None
I went in today with my Sister looking for a couple of movies, Robert was the CSR, and though he was VERY friendly with my sister, he was very very rude with me. He introduced himself to my sister, shook her hand, and went to introduce himself to me, this is what he did, he held his hand out to me, and said, "Hi I'm- Yeah, I don't care," and pulled his hand away from me. For the next few minuets we walked around, and everytime I would say something, he would come back and say, "Yeah, I don't care," and when I started to get upset and walk off, he wants to say, "I'm just kidding with you Ma'am," I'm sorry, but you do not treat paying customers this way. All in all, he was extremly rude, and as long as he is STILL working there, I WILL NOT be returning. If you like being treated like scum, be my guest go in and ask for this guy, I promise you, he will make you feel lower then dirt. The other employees here were very sweet and very helpful, but this guy, made my visit upsetting and make me want to never set foot in this store ever again.
Every single time I come here to pick up an online order I have to wait at least a half an hour for service even when I ask for a manger. Thus is friggin unacceptable!
They always get my order wrong, I quit going there years ago.
Well I got a 50 dollar order and it was wrong so they sent another order took 45 mins and it was wrong and the pizza was so wrong so don't buy from here 2hours to get the food and when it wasn't right they said call the manager
I brought in a wool rug. I asked if it was worth cleaning. Was told oh yes this is a very expensive rug. bottom line they were unable to clean it, yet still charged me full price. I paid Tinny rug cleaners to clean a $400 rug that is now in my trash can. Owner has a gruff attitude and I will never do business with them again.
The stay was mediocre at best for a brand new hotel of this size and standard. I've had better nights and service from mid-market limited service hotels within a few minutes driving distance... Experience? I stay in hotels for a living.
Failed to reserve a trailer and followed up by sending me to Niles, an hour round trip, to pick up a non existent trailer.
Nie można wykonać zakupów przez telefon mimo że niby mają taką opcję na stronie. Nie ma też katalogu dostępnych produktów czyli dupa nie strona bo mogliby zrobić bez zakładek i opcji ..tylko z adresem i najlepiej bez telefonu bo i tak nikt go nie odbiera i to dowolnie niezależnie od marketu!!!
Is there an option to give NO stars? Seriously, I've probably been to every Apple Store in the DC, Maryland, VA area and I'm starting to think that an Apple Store with decent customer service just doesnt exist. Let me first say that I am a pretty patient guy. Even after arriving for my appointment on time and having to sit on a hard barstool that I would've rather replaced with cold concrete for over 20 mins to be helped, I still remained patient. And didn't cringe (not even in the slightest) after they told me that it would cost $150 to replace my iPhone screen and I would have to wait almost an hour for it to be completed. But what broke the camel's back brace was when they told me that if something were to go wrong while they were replacing my screen, I would have to pay full price for a replacement phone! After questioning why problems fixing my iPhone screen would be at my expense,the rep replied with something to tune of "that's just the way it is". So I explained that I would get the service and risk them breaking my phone, but if something happened, I would have the right to go to court about it all. After that, she went into the back for a few minutes, came back out and told me that due to the fact that I may take them to court, they are unable perform the service. I've never realized that we live in a country now where customers are denied service for voicing their rights. Very upset and will definitely stay away from Apple Stores... I suggest you all do the same.
None
Jenny H is Great!! The rest is terrible!! After that car had arrived late (but that was not a guarantee apparently just an "estimated" delivery time) I drove away in my "new" car after being told and given a "guarantee" that everything was looked over. I was even given a check list specifically stating this specific stuff had been looked over thoroughly. When I got home the next day I realized the turn signals where out. There where no floor matts, There was a slurpy that had been spilt under the seat (cup was still there) the trimming in the door had been partially removed and clips to keep on the body panel where broken. When I contacted them about it I was told they could get me aftermarket parts for the repairs and I could take the day off of work to drive back down there (about 4 hours round trip) The cost I would insure to do that is much grater that just having the dealer do it locally. This is the 1st time I have written a review like this. Again as a sales consultant Jenny is great…But I strongly advise you stay away from the rest of them. A dealer will take much better care of you.
this is a VERY bad restaurant..menu is horrible..this is not southern cooking...this is HORRIBLE cooking....and way way OVERPRICED for the quality of the food....PLEASE do NOT waste your money at this place....I am very surprised is not out of business yet
As far as Wal-Marts go, this location never appears to be staffed properly and normally has extremely long checkout lines. The aisles are often cluttered with items that were not put back on the shelves. Most other Wal-Marts are run much better.
To není k žrádlu... Buček tvrdý jak podrazka, stava buhvizceho, zeli me bude v zaludku tlacit az do večera... A ještě nepříjemná, líná obsluha, která na mou stížnost neuměla říct ani “to je mi líto“.
- My husband and I joined over a year ago and had a pretty good experience with this gym in the beginning. The price per person per month was reasonable for us at $20 ($40 a month for both of us). We were going to the gym very often, at least 3 times a week. The staff seemed to change fairly often, but the people were always nice. We started to notice more and more that some of the gym equipment was not functioning for weeks in a row, and then it seemed every week we would see more signs up on more treadmills, elipticals, and stairs that said the equipment was not functioning. They were making no apparent repairs or progress with getting the machines replaced. - Another thing I grew to hate about exercising at this gym was that almost every day that I would workout - I would workout in the women's sectioned area near the ladies' locker room. There would ALWAYS be a man cleaning in the women's locker room area. I felt like he never left that area, and it was weird. I never felt threatened by him, I just think it would be more comfortable for the ladies who are exercising to have a woman on the janitorial staff for cleaning in that area. - Now this last part is why my husband and I do not recommend this gym. We had gotten out of our workout routine closer to the end of the year in 2013 due to busy schedules, and we weren't going very often anymore. We kept our membership because we want to workout when we can - and we do not want to pay the large fee they have set for canceling membership (and we would have to pay double for two cancellations because even as a married couple, our memberships are separate - which is another highly unlikeable quality about the way this gym is run). Anyways, we noticed one day that the gym was no longer at the location where we always go - it looks like another gym bought them out or they moved or something. We have not once gotten notification through mail, phone messages, or email about any sort of move or gym closure. I've looked online, and Google still shows that the gym is still in that same spot, but it isn't. We are very unimpressed with their lack of communication with their members and are searching for a new gym.
Employee picking her nose and bagging food....pass it on by unsanitary. Called health dept. And corporate so far no call back from corporate. Pick a winner Del Taco!
A tablespoon of sauce on saltines would be equivalent to the pizza we received. 3/10/14. It was called spinach and feta. No feta there. Sadness.
The worst, CUSTOMER NO SERVICE explains them to a T, they continuously scam you into short term reasonably priced service and the minute your terms are up your prices shoot through the roof. CSR's will tell you anything you want to hear when you threaten to cancel but will stand behind nothing they say. your bills will continue to come at what ever rate they want to charge you. I disputed charges due to a number of promises and even a printed chat conversation where they agreed to credit my account and provided it to them. They still turned it over to collections and reported to the credit bureaus. they are gustapo's. They have a monopoly in our area and take advantage of it.
If I could give zero stars, I would. The food isn't bad. But it doesn't make up for the terrible service. I can't believe that a manager had the audacity to argue semantics of an incorrect drink order instead of fixing the situation. It was so unprofessional. We had a table of nine people. We will not be back and you will exponentially lose business because of how we were treated. The atmosphere is schizophrenic. It is like being at two separate restaurants at the same time. Literally half the restaurant is a bar and the other side looks like a tex Mex shit-hole that is trying to class itself up to no avail. The bar plays top 40 music way too loud while they are yelling out bingo numbers. And the other side is playing Michael Bublé, also very loudly. We didn't get any food for over an hour, probably because they assigned us a new server after 20 min. When one person from our table went over to the bar area to get some of the complimentary popcorn for the table to snack on, he was chased down as a bar server tried to grab it out of his hands. We were yelled at and humiliated, as he told us we were not allowed to eat popcorn. When we asked for a manager he continued to argue. The manager came over and told us that the waiter had forgotten to put our order in, but assured us it would be coming. The waiter asked if I would like soup or salad when I ordered, so I asked for a salad. When the bill came they charged me full price for the salad and when I questioned it he told me my meal didn't come with a salad. The manager told us she would be bringing us free desserts, but never did. She also said she would fix the bill for us, but the waiter still brought us a bill over $100. Avoid this place. Just say no.
Took two hours to get half cooked, uncut pizza. If your looking to waste time and money, call Papa John's in Lafayette, IN.
Die Qualität des Essens ist okay (4 von 5 Sterne) - wenn es geliefert wird. Am Wochenende bis zu 2 Stunden Wartezeit, unter der Woche mehr als 1 Stunde - jedes Mal ohne Nachricht dass es länger dauert. Darüber hinaus werden Bestellungen auch mal vertauscht - nett, dass dann das nächste Mal nachgeliefert wird, nach 2 Stunden Warten aber mehr als ärgerlich. Highlight heute: 2,5 Stunden Wartezeit, nach 1 Stunde meinte die Dame am Telefon es sei unterwegs. Da hoffe ich mal dass es die 90 Minuten im Auto gekühlt wurde...
Muy mala experiencia. Mala atencion, mala comida. Tardan mucho en cobrar la cuenta.
Turned up after 30 mile round trip for advertised Sunday lunch, only to be told that as they had a busy night last night, the chef was too tired to cook. Filthy entrance and stairs smelled of Harpic. First and last time for us.
I have had a surprising bad experience with Action Appliance. On Jan 11 we had a service repair call for our dishwasher. The diagnosis was that a new motherboard was necessary. I signed for that repair to occur once the part was ordered - $501.09. Days later the call from Action Appliance said the part wasn't available, but they would rebuild the motherboard instead. That was not a choice we wanted; they said we had no choice - they decide how to fix the dishwasher, and if we chose to cancel the repair, we would incur a 25% cancellation fee - approx $125 - ON TOP of the approx $60 service call fee. I believe the failure of the part to be available, which is what I signed for, means I don NOT have to accept a rebuild if I don't want to. Subsequent calls to the company have been met with blunt, unprofessional "You are never getting the cancellation fee reversed"-type language. I feel this is an incredible gouging. The 25% fee is an arbitrary number applied to the money I foolishly gave them before the job was done to my satisfaction. I urge anyone using this shady operation to hold off paying until you see what you're really getting for your money.
I received a letter for a car that I traded in. I called so I could fax the bill of sale. They said they only work off records from the DMV and I had to provide proof. Isn't my car yet I can prove it. Terrible way to do business.
This place SUCKS they are very stupid and non compassionate. My daughter is on temporary financial assistance from the state (no reason to explain).Anyway had an appointment at Comfort dental and when we got there she told us the dentist called in sick and we would have to reschedule. When I asked why they did not call me she said they didn't have my number. I asked then how did you call me yesterday to confirm my appointment and she said she must have written it down wrong. The she said I can be seen at at different location which took me 20 min to get there. We got there and filled out new patient paper work and they call her back and she comes back out 5 min later and and said they will not see her I asked why the HELL not they said she either has to be pregnant or a child and when I said I would pay the $19.99 they said that is illegal. What the hell is this the F%&*** Obama crap or what just happen???? I still do not understand this.
None
If you are a service member, do not contract with this gym, even on a month to month basis. They will charge you for an extra month's membership even if you hand them PCS orders. They do not abide by the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act and will not refund your money even if you moved out of state before the next month's payment goes thjavascript:void(0)rough. If you call and request a refund for services which you did not require but paid for, they will continue to recite vague contract terms. Max Fitness's business practices are a sad state of affairs. Oh yea, the place gets PACKED, so all the more reason not to go.
if you are going for anything aviation DON'T GO HERE i was mislead by sombody to go here for a flight degree and the only thing they have is air traffic control program. glad i only attended one semester looking back
This hotel is awful!! And a poor representation of the marriott Brand, This makes me dislike all Marriott hotels. We had several rooms there,spending over $2k atleast, and their service is disgusting. Not to mention I was in detroit for an event, and the staff reuined all my work clothes. I was left with one outfit for the rest of my stay because they reuined them, stained them, and shrank all of my clothes. Working with claims isnt any better, they are trying to give me little to nothing as reimbursement for my clothes. Travelers beware, do not stay here, its not worth it!!!!
we visited head over heels with are son who has special needs and learning difficultys we encounterd ignorance from both staff and some individuals while their not very pleasant are son was very distressed by the experience and will not be visiting again
7/20/13: Had a horrible experience. Came in for my appointment the receptionist was on the phone, patiently waited in a chair after she hangs up with another customer she tells me my appointment was at 5:45 p.m. when it actually was for 6:15 p.m. I tell her this and she lets me know they might not be able to shampoo my hair. I just simply stated I had an appointment for 6:15 p.m. and that I really needed my hair washed. She then starts to argue with me that I came in at 6:25 p.m. I calmly told her I was 3 minutes late. I came in at 6:18 p.m. and she tells me "no you didn't, didn't I just see you walk in?! I couldn't believe it. I just remained seated and waited for the next person to approach me. I was so uncomfortable and unfortunately I really needed my appointment badly. After that I was just on pins and needles. I called the company and left a message to talk to a manager. I never received a returned call. I also filled out their survey and explained the situation and asked for someone to call me and I still never received a call back.
None
Went to the restaurant on 7/27/13 at around 12:15 am (they close at 1). We were staying in downtown cinci for the first time, and walked all the way there from the Cincinnatian hotel. We were met by a very salty hostess who couldn't muster up a word to welcome us, but rather raised her eyebrows in a smirk as if to say "can i HELP you?". She told us that we could seat ourselves at the bar. We proceeded to, but I was so annoyed by the experience that I could not even enjoy the one beer that I had. We promptly closed our check and went to Yard House, which is directly down the street, where we had an AMAZING experience. The hostess was upbeat, they walked us to our table even though it was in that bar. I have been a server in the past for 5 years and have seen a lot of behavior and am usually understanding and tolerable when I go to restaurants, but this was in complete poor taste.
After we sat down, we saw a big glob of goo. The waitress complianed that it is harder then it looks to clean trays. The desert looked disgustinged, little plates scatter around the counter. Ice cream machine sloped from the top of the ice cream machine. You have to watch out what sliverware and plate you got, we got a couple of dirty forks. I consider going somewhere else to eat.
This company is a complete scam. Save your money and go somewhere else
무책임하고 불친절하기 짝이 없는 검색엔진 운영회사 전화는 불통, 메일은 불성실 아랫사람이랑 100% 동감. 집앞이 바로 구글코리아여서 찾아가보기도 했다만 구글코리아가 뭔죄냐싶다. 참고로 구글코리아는 매우 친절함 구글본사가문제 ㅡㅡ;
The meal was not served at hour and a half into waiting so we walked out. When I called to let them know why we walked out the manager simply said sorry. Poor service and unsatisfied completely.
Slowest place on earth. And apparently the customer does not get whatever they want! I asked if I could have a little less rice (too many carbs) and a little more broccoli. I was told "NO, NO SUBSTITUTIONS".... Won't be going back there.
No longer there
The slowest Starbucks ever.
Walked in to buy a single item, a wireless keyboard. After waiting in line 15 minutes for one item I tossed it aside and left. Maybe, had the line had moved just one person, my experience may not have gotten to the point of anger; however, it did. I refuse to shop at further Best Buy or other large corporate stores that do not have a line intended on quick purchases. Best Buy and Microcenter are the worst in this matter, especially as they are electronics stores without modern technology. I don't know why I gave them a final shot this holiday season; I am certain that I will no longer shop in a Best Buy retail store again. Instead, I will shop everything through AMAZON in minutes, and even have it over-night shipped at a price well cheaper than the limited items Best Buy has in stock versus what they must order to the store in longer time than other online retailers. AMAZON, AMAZON, AMAZON; unless you enjoy dealing with the crowds and all of the under-staffed retail stores over the next month.
Weer zo'n touristenfuik met voer, opgediend door zeer ongeïnteresseerd personeel. Maastricht kan zo mooi zijn!
Terrible management.
very dirty dishes
I strongly suggest you not to stay!!!! I don't even want to give them one star. We got fool by the bright and clean lobby, thought it's pretty valuable price for RM118 a night on weekend, but we instantly regret when we get into the room, it has a very humid smell, and there are few hair on the bed, sheet and blanket are very ole and disrepair, we found one small cockroach on the wall, but there were even more in the bathroom, really disgusted. We told the receptionist the condition of the room, he was nicely say he will check the room and replace a room for us, then let us wait at lobby for 20 mins, long story short, after been pushed like a ball, we finally got out refund, before we left, the manager said this to me. "The cockroach problem is nature, we can't do anything about it, you go see any hotel on this street, it's all the same." I don't even want to respond him, if I do I just wanna slap on his face. After that we went to another hotel just next door called " Classic Inn", RM 168 per night on weekend including breakfast, this hotel is AMAZING!!!! Just pay RM 50 extra more and you got 500% better of everything. I wish I didn't try to save that money, totally not worth it:(
Wir 4 Personen waren gestern am 24.08.2013 mit dem Gutscheinbuch bei Don Pancho in Brühl essen. Die Tischreservierung hatten wir einen Tag vorher erledigt, mit den Hinweis, dass wir mit 2 Gutscheinbüchern kommen. Wir bestellten als Vorspeise 1x Scampies 11€ und einmal Champions ca.8,50 € jeweils in Knoblauchsoße. Die 10 kleinen Scampies waren lecker und die Champions auch aber waren aus der Dose. Als Hauptgericht 2x Putenbrust 9,90€ und einen Grillteller für 2 Personen 50€. Wir erhielten als Grillteller 2x 5 verschiedene Fleischsorten und eine halbe Bratwurst. Die verschiedenen kleinen Stückchen (so klein wie ein Handrücken und ganz dünn wie ein Schnitzel) Fleischsorten waren alle zu lange auf dem Grill also trocken und durch, von dem Lamm konnte man nur ein kleines Stückchen abschneiden, da alles andere Knochen war. Zu dem Grillteller bekamen wir eine normale Portion Pommes und ein kleines Blatt Salat mit 3 Zwiebelringen ne halbe Tomate. Die Putenbrust war auch ein kleines Stück mit einer sehr dicken Sosse drüber und Pommes. Keiner kam vorbei und fragte ob alles in Ordnung wäre, selbst beim Bezahlen fragte niemand ob alles passte, der Bon wurde halb fettig auf den Tisch gelegt und gestresst wurde sich vom Tisch entfernt. Kein Danke Kein auf Wiedersehen NIX! Fazit: für einen Grillteller 50 € hätten wir sehr viel mehr erwartet, nicht satt geworden, Größe wie beim Kroaten, da bezahlt man aber 12-14 €, Vielleicht wurde die Portion einfach halbiert, wegen dem Gutscheinbuch. Ambiente: naja ist Geschmacksache, hat sich aber seit mind.15 Jahren nicht verändert. Überall liegt Staub und ist irgendwie mit einem Fettfilm überzogen. Preise: selbst mit Gutscheinbuch VIIIEEEL zu Teuer!! Wir waren öfters aber unregelmäßig dort, werden aber nach dem gestrigen Abend, weder mit noch ohne Gutscheinbuch dort essen gehen. Keine Weiterempfehlung!
None
Do not, under any circumstances, go here. It will be a complete waste of your time. You've been warned.
i hated it. it was crap, i will never go back.i would rather spend my money on drugs!!!
Drive another 1/4 mile to better options. I spent a lot of money and can not believe how small the portions were. One thing I got was a recommended Turkey Wrap and I thought they had accidentally given me a quarter sandwhich. It was literally 5 inches long total. I don't know anything about the history of this place, but they must be proud of their food and have been around for a while cause they wouldnt have lasted a month with doll house portions like this.
Got horrible food poisoning from seafood on first visit. You couldn't pay me to go back.
Currently going out of business and it's very apparent why. The owner told me to come back multiple times claiming the prices would be lower on throw pillows... I've come back multiple times for throw pillows that were said to be reduced, and the throw pillows are the same price. After asking for a lower price on a pillow I would use to sit on (I have people over and a small place so no room for chairs), the assistant offered to reduce 2. Then her boss walked in (the one who kept telling me to come back, or the owner) and caught her assistant ringing me up for a much lower price than what was written on the pillows. SO, the assistant lashes out on me and the owner calls me a liar? I understand that they're "down" pillows, but a. you told me to come back for lower prices that are not there, b. you called me a liar when I told you that you told me to come back for lower prices that are not there, c. the assistant explained that a wholesale store would be buying them for a cheaper price than marked and would then sell them for a higher price (so that's why she kindly marked them down for me), and d. they yelled very rude comments while I bagged my 2 properly reduced throw pillows and as I left the store. So for a higher tax receipt to donate or sell products to a wholesale store, Oysterbed employees compromise their customer service and integrity. Yes, it's very, very apparent why their business is closing.
Thanks for nothing Alan K. Its always nice to see the Used Car man living up to his slimy reputation. Nice on the phone.....very polite and grateful for the call. Then once i send a kid to look at the car.....the buzzards swarm in. Thanks for trying taking advantage of the situation. Its called honesty and integrity Alan K, and you have none. You should be ashamed of you self.
Waited 2 hours for inedible food. Too few staff (all Asian) and uncomfortable seats. When the food arrived - mine was allegedly cannelloni - the meat was an indistinguishable grey over-peppered paste inside a tasteless pasta tube, covered with what tasted like bulk-bought pizza topping. The whole lot was slathered in stringy cheese which was also underneath the pasta for some reason, and glued it to the plate. I ate about half and, judging by the what was left on the plates of the rest of our party, nobody else had better luck. Avoid at all costs.
Tired to have dinner there tonight and they wouldn't let me in. I got there at 9:30 pm, and they close at 10:00 pm. After walking 3 miles in a blizzard storm here in buffalo, NY. They had people still at tables with menus in there hands that must have arrived no more than 5 mins before me. As I knocked a short fat man with a blue Buffalo bills hoody said they were closed. My reply was I have just walked 3 miles in this storm to try you wings that I have heard about from all the locals. Can I come in for a second to get warm, and was told no, and with a shit-eating grin on his face said sorry and then turned around to go sit his fat ass down at the bar. Never have a met a more rude, and non-compassionate person. I am here in town on business and only have a few days to see the town. Where I'm from small business go the extra mile to help out those in similar predicaments. So the way they treated me, was not of a customer minded mentality. But, of a company that has become out of touch with the people and has gotten to big for there britches in the claim that they invented "Chicken Wings." There management is terrible at best if they employee people, and practice business such as these. I hope that if your in Buffalo, NY you don't waste your time on going there. I hope that they read this, and have the gumption to contact me. So they may make this right, if not they are truly deserving of this review.
Absolutely RIDICULOUS. I have never dealt with such a HORRIBLE business. The Store Manager is rude, ignorant, and only cares about money. I got a phone through them and not even a month later had to get the screen repaired which cost me almost 200.00. I returned the phone and still having issues with them. STAY CLEAR!! I am not one to write reviews but this place is a RIP-OFF.
bad reviews dont lie!! the OWNER of this place came to my house to fix water damage after a flood. they ended up doing a total reno on my master bathroom. the job isn't finished, all the tile has to be torn down and rebuilt. and they missed 3 deadlines and want extra money or else they are putting a lien on my house. i wish i saw these reviews before i hired them, all this could have been avoided. if these people come to your house, LOCK YOUR DOORS and call someone else.
I made a reservation because I value my time. When I arrived I was told it was going to 1hour and 45 min wait because it had gotten busy. All I needed was a rotation, which I could do in 20 minutes with a lift and a tire plug which would take them no longer than 5 minutes. What is the point of making a reservation if you have to wait the normal amount of time? Terrible customer service.
Non existence
So I gave my new Amazon card to the gym guy and asked him to start charging my fees to Amazon. He did. Found today that I've been billed on the old card and also on the Amazon card. A 98.00 overcharge. Double charge started on the day I gave him the new card. Gym manager says it's my fault for renewing on the computer website. They will not reimburse.
None
Aunque el nombre no le pertenece ya a cambiado a el presidente diria k no es ni la mitad de cuando era el caridad. Ademas es uno de los pocos restaurant que le cobran tax y propina obligatoria a la comida?
Har ikke åbent kl 2 om natten..
In all accounts of history the teaching of Jesus Christ say that he believed in helping thy neighbor love and caring for not only those who followed him but also those who didn't. He showed in many ways that people should help one another. At Timberlake Christian Schools they teach "traditional" Christian values set forth in the Bible like hate those who are different, Love thy neighbor as long as they believe what you believe, Throw those who are different into the streets, Love those who have deep wallets and large bank accounts. These all must be traditional and in the Bible since they claim it and act in this way. All Christians and non Christians should be insulted by this institution. And they wonder whay people are walking away from churches.
None
None
If you want to be harassed and treated like crap this is the place to go. Stay away from preditory salesman. I had the worst experience here. I was actually sexually harassed and sexually taken advantage of! Yes I was abused by the salesman in the back lot, where my vehicle was parked. I have filed charges against the salesperson and am suing the dealership in civil court. Please if your female, DO NOT GO HERE ALONE! They are sleezy men, The only two people who were professional were RUDY and BJ. In my communcations with the owner, he was unwilling to help me and did not return my calls. I Hope that after the law sit we can get these creeps out of Burien FOR EVER!!
This place is terrible. I've been there a few times. The last time I went I ordered a drink, and was standing next to the wall minding my own business. Some girl who worked there walked up to me and hit my drink out of my hand spilling it all over me. She did it on purpose, and then I was escorted out. I had no idea who she was, and I wasn't causing any problems whatsoever. To say the least...I was very surprised and disappointed by their service. Hopefully Logan opens more bars in the future so that people aren't forced to go to crappy places like this.
This company changed owners and is now awful. Took 4 weeks to get catalogs for ordering, the order was way delayed, then the shirts came in printed crooked and they didn't care. No customer service. Don't waste your time.
New Owners = Poor Quality. It used to be my favorite Sunday brunch establishment. My wife and I stopped going for about three months when she had our son. When he was old enough for us to go out, it was the first place we wanted to go, as we were craving some California Eggs Benedict. Something was amidst when we showed up and there was no wait. The place was practically empty. Then I noticed the bakery counter was gone. Regardless, we stayed and ordered. I got my usual-- cappuccino and California Eggs Benedict. The cappuccino came in a cup that was half the normal size. Additionally, my Eggs Benedict was overcooked. The egg yoke was completely cooked through. Lastly, the breakfast potatoes was unseasoned. Hate to say it, but we will not be going back. What a shame!!!
Wait! What? You want me to _pay_ to get into the casino?! As if casino don't make enough money off their customers.
Not specificed on the sherwood park cabs website, but they only charge 10 dollars flat rate for anything to sherwood park mall or near by. The use the meter (if they have one, otherwise) . Be forwarned!
There were about 8 other customers in the restaurant yet it took 10 minutes for a waitress to even acknowledge us. They were out of the first 2 beers I ordered, we waited at least 40 minutes for our food, and then it was mediocre at best. I thought for sure given the inconviences (we were pretty vocal about the food taking so long) there'd be some sort of a discount, even it was a coupon for a free appetizer, but no effort was made. The decor has been the same since this location opening (15 years ago?). The Bloomington location closed a few years ago and I'm guessing this one will soon as well.
Very rude, & horrible customer service. They're changing workers every 3 months, and the quality of work they do is less than commendable. I had to request a guy to re-file my nails several times to TRY to get them to a normal-looking shape. My nails came out in several different shapes! Then, when I complained, they started gossipping in their native language, and several of the other workers looked my way laughing. They may be fast, but their quality of work, and customer service is horrible. Never again!
my so called postal delivery person takes no pride in his work. He jammed my mailbox with my mail and now I cannot open it to get the mail out. I will have to wait until Monday to try to catch him while he is here to get my mail out. No one answers the phone at the post office when you call. I can't even go to the location to talk to the postmaster because he never comes out and his lackeys are no help at all, besides they closed at 12 noon on Saturdays so I am stuck until Monday if I can catch the delivery person when he is here…fat chance.
None
This company wastes money on lawyers for problems that could be solved if they were anywhere near the properties they managed. Or even had the efficiency to call and make arrangements. This company has no issue suing people without question. If you can avoid them, please do. I fall under Mayfair Station Condo Association, and I am not satisfied. I grew up in a town house, and the association was run by local people who could be communicated with. This association is practically impossible to communicate with. The only way I know that this property management runs my association is because I am being sued.
Hardly any lanes open at night. Annoying atmosphere. If they didn't sell so much stuff, there wouldn't be as much business. Open some more damn lanes, we don't want to wait an hour.
Bed bugs!!!
Ordered delivery, and paid $10 for a pizza about 7 inches in diameter. Pizza arrived luke warm (being generous) and aweful. When I returned it, there was no attempt at customer service; just handed me my money and I walked out.
Very disappointing. You ask for a price, and they use the customers rebate as their commission without disclosing it. Not honest and upfront, and the process takes too long because their so busy jacking up their numbers.
None
90% of the time there are only a couple of registers open and they are all on one end of the store. When I asked the manager about it he said he does that so the floor manager doesn't have to walk from one end of the store to the other. Last week I was in the same store. there were 2 registers open with no less than 20 people in line waiting to be checked out. I had to get out of line and go to the service desk to get another register open.
Completely unprofessional!
Terrible I have been trying to get someone on the phone for over 2 hours and god forbid another post office have access to this locations information.Horrible.
One of the worst experiences I have ever had at a fast food restaurant. Not a single aspect of my order was correct, every single table was filthy, and when I complained to the manager and asked him to make it right, all I got was a pat on the back. I would starve before eating here again.
Worst location EVER! The lady on the speaker screamed at me stating "I can't hear you, uggghh whatever. Just pull up and order." Then we waited 15 mins at the convenient (NOT) 2-lane window. Ridiculous and GHETTO!
They do not service the south side of Chicago which is not a coincidence that the majority of the population is Black in those areas. It is not based on distance as this company is located in Chicago and they service areas in Dupage county which are 30-40 miles away. I guess all the great service that was spoken of in the reviews are for Caucasian neighborhoods only.
This place was nowhere near the reviews posted. The food was warm, not much flavor, and not enough to fill me up. I expected more especially for the price I paid
I just had the worst customer service I have ever received at this branch. The staff were rude and sarcastic and very unhelpful. I previously waited for half an hour to hand someone my 'change of address' form and 3 months later it hasn't been changed so I am assuming they lost it.
I felt dirtier after taking a shower in this room. No coffee maker, microwave, fridge and a TV over 20 years old that had the worst reception possible. The bed was way overdue for a new box spring and mattress. They had absolutely nothing that was positive. My wife and I came all the way from South Dakota and brought some friends of ours with us. They had to pay $90.00 a room and their room was worse than ours! I would NOT recommend this place to ANYONE! You can get a cleaner place to sleep under a bridge off I-70!!!
Are you looking for a gym with great management that cares about its customers? Keep looking. Are you looking for a gym that takes care of their equipment and keeps their steam room, jacuzzi, and sauna working? Keep looking. Do you want a gym that's a good value for the money? Keep looking. This isn't the place for you. It's not crowded. (I wonder why) There is nothing spectacular about this place other than the high prices. Go elsewhere.
About 20 minutes after hailing a cab and there was still nothing, I called the company and explained that I had to get to the greyhound bus station to get back home in time for my classes back in Arizona. The lady on the phone spoke english as a second language and did not understand a good amount of what I was saying and told me that the cab would be there in 30-45 minutes which is about 10 minutes too late of me getting to the greyhound. I missed my bus because of them and they cost me a lot of money just to get home. If you use this company, call them two hours ahead and expect them to be late.
We were completely disappointed to learn the character of the actual owners of this restaurant. The food was wonderful and our waitress was great at first, but the evening fell apart as we were ready to get our bill. It appeared management made a decision to pull the other waitress from the floor and left ours scrambling with three new tables to seat. We waited over 35 minutes post meal to get a check and personally had to chase it down. Not blaming the waitress, as she was great during our meal, but I addressed the issue kindly with the owner herself and what I received was blatant disregard for the experience. Her integrity was lacking in her indifference as well as her desire to throw her staff under the bus. She made no effort to acknowledge or apologize for the wait and dismissively turned her back on us. Unfortunately, as great as the food was, I don’t want to support a business who so carelessly esteems their patrons
I would give it a negative 1 if possible. Got treated like a number, not a person. No personal touch, no diagnostic test before asking you to leave it for service. Just what's wrong, you have to leave it for 3 days, and if you have anything important, you may want to take it home and back it up because it may get lost. Then at that moment, you have to make another appointment to bring it in, because you have to take it home and back it up. And the appointment isn't the next day, its a few days away, maybe a week away. Doesn't matter that your mac had smoke come out of it, doesn't matter that its on fire, your just a number, not a person to them, get back in line basically. Terrible store.
We had a terrible meal here. Someone brought our dinners out on a tray and put it on a stand next to our table, and then disappeared. We watched our food get cold for a bit and then just served ourselves. No one came to the table for at least 15 minutes after the food was delivered. The waiter was rude and sarcastic. Our service was so bad that the manager agreed to remove the automatic gratuity, but then didn't. Some of the food was good but the gnocchi looked like cat food. This was one of the worst dining experiences we have ever had, and we eat in restaurants a lot.
These are my friends. I will NEVER eat there again until this issue is addressed: Hire at will, fired over a cookie? Pat yourself on the back for living on food stamps for a week Panera CEO. Your company is one of the causes of poverty. My step daughter loyally covered shifts, arrived promptly and did her job well. For months. Never reprimanded for anything. Then......a customer comes in, orders a cookie. Shelby gets her a cookie. Customer returns to counter and complains its broken. Shelby kindly apologizes and gets her another cookie. Then, the customer writes a letter and complains that Shelby didn't give her a HOT cookie. I return home from work (I'm disabled after breaking my back) to find my child crying. Fired over a cookie. Priceless. How does a 17 year old child find another job after being fired for a cookie? How can your "manager" sleep at night knowing she screwed a child saving for college over a cookie? This letter will get me no where. I don't care. I just wanted someone from your corporation to read how disgusting one of your managers treats their employees. SHAME ON YOU!!!!
I scheduled a physical 2 months in advance because of my travel schedule. I filled out and printed my forms online to save time, showed up early... only to be told the Doctor is running over 1 hour behind. I asked if I could leave and come back in 1 hour (knowing it'd be 90 minutes before I'd be seen by anyone) and receptionist said they can't do that. I need to stay in waiting room or they will cross my name out. Typical "Dr.'s Time is more important that yours" attitude. Clientele is at the lower end of economic scale. Reception room smelled like stale cigarettes. Not exactly the best environment. I left without being seen.
Awful produce and awful customer service, the managers here should be fired
When the iphone 4 came out i lined up for hours, they opened late, and after they system went down they put it aside and said that they would activate it and that it was in stone that it would be mine and they wouldn't sell it. the sales rep malcolm sold it and lied outright to me. I should have known something was up, the sales rep beside was trying to sell an iphone case to a lady saying that if you don't buy the case your phone won't work. (word for word) I thought it was a pretty sleezy place. i wrote a big letter to the manager, who didn't do anything, and rogers. Thanks Google! now at least i can share my horrible experience.
Bad bad bad. So bad I had to blog about & take a photo. Will be contacting corporate office to let them know how bad this place was. I'm from California, and while traveling before this incident = "Oh, Subway; let's grab lunch." After Incident: = "Remember that Subway in Moses Lake, and how cheap and condescending they were... let's skip Subway all together." - Totally disgusted by the Subway in Moses Lake, WA who seem to take pride in providing the very least to their customers. "Sir, that's how we're told to do it," seem to be the oft repeated phrase when I complained that there was practically no lettuce, and when I mentioned the pathetic amount of olives, I was told I was only supposed to get 3 olive slices on each half of a foot long. That is about 1/2 an olive per side. Want more, pay 40 cents more. Jared should be ashamed that the corporate value of least is alive and well at Subway. The manager was kind enough to point out that because I had more than three olive bits, I was getting free extra olives. Wow, am I not McLovin' the Subway generosity. Also on the rant, they can't even make an italian BMT look like the photo on the menu bar. They don't show iceberg lettuce on the menu photo, but that's all they have in the store. L*A*M*E.
Stayed there for two days during the Oceanology International 2014. First impression seemed good enough although there was dirt and trash under the couch but the bathroom and bed was clean. However in the bathroom they only had this squeezable soap at both the sink and in the shower. So no shampoo or body wash or any other types of lotion. So a very basic set up. I also tried having the aircondition running over the night but the noise from the AC was so loud that I had to turn it off. This just revealed some other generator/engine that kept me awake for most of the night. In the morning the included breakfast was so sad I just ended up eating cereal. The hot section consisted of poorly looking eggs, sad sausages and no bacon amongst other things. A proper disappointment and especially considering it costed £200 per night.
This school is one of the worse schools in Toledo.They don't teach the kids manners,condone bullying,and when you try to reach the principle it's a run around. I wish I would have kept my kids in public school.
Entrance policy is ridiculous. Allowing people based on color and language. Completely discriminating. Surprised this happens in Dubai where we are completely multi-cultured.
I am a Marriott Rewards Gold member and booked a reservation for this hotel from my mobile app. I did not notice that the rate was a pre-paid non refundable rate. When my travel plans changed at the last minute I called the hotel to change the reservation and that is when I was informed it was a pre-paid non refundable room. The very nice girl that took my room change information told me to call the accounting department of the hotel and they could work with me to refund the fee. I placed 3 calls to the accounting department, all of which went to voicemail. None of the 3 calls were returned. I then called the hotel and asked to speak to a manager and again, was told they would take my name and number and have someone return my call. Guess what, no return call. I travel to NJ twice a month. On one visit I stay at the Courtyard property in Jersey City and for the 2nd visit I had been staying at the Hilton Iselin. Due to my Gold status, I thought I would give the Renaissance a try. Based on this experience, it is back to Hilton for me.
This company has none. They will tell you they are honest but beware. Be sure to have any vehicle they have inspected. You will probably find problems with them.
I went there with 4 kids and usually they eat non stop...Everything they put on their plate was dried out from sitting on the bar, cold, bland, or just plain inedible. Then had to pay $50.00...never again
Horrible experience... I purchased bagels for a corporate meeting, and all of them were stale and rock hard.I cannot believe they would sell this kind product to the public,I was thoroughly embarrassed. I tried to call the store numerous times and nobody would pick up.Terrible customer service!
None
None
Hope you like batter because that's about all you'll get. Store bought egg rolls, even the rice was sub par.
I've dined here on several occasions, only because its my only option using public transportation. The first couple of times, the service was excellent. Lately, the wait staff have invited more of their friends and become a lot more attentive to their friends and not the PAYING customers. Management seems entry level. To have a pleasant experience, you need more experienced management. This place is going down hill fast. Who has ever heard of an established dining environment with a $2 Tuesday special? TERRIBLE and rapidly declining service.
**WARNING** My wife and 8year old son and I have lived here for about a year and feel like the rules/management here at the Crossing Apartment are very similar to collage dorm rules. Here are a list of bullet points of reasons below. 1st. The staff comes in to our apartment without us home to inspect our living space. It makes us very uncomfortable because of the valuables that we own. As some of the staff here look very sketchy! Staff should not be allowed in a tenants rented living space without permission form tenant each and every time. And an appointment would be good as well. The last time they came in my wife was asleep when they opened our bedroom door. Good thing she was decent. 2nd. There are no BBQ's allowed on the patio. We where not aware of this when we moved in so we had to rent a storage unit to store it away. 3rd. If you receive a package via UPS or FedEx or a package that does not fit in your mail box you must pick it up with in 4 day or they will return to sender. What if you are on vacation??? 4th. They fixed the ceiling on the patio when we where not home...and left a huge mess for us to clean up. There was debris everywhere! SEE PICTURES BELOW! 5th. Once you sign the lease you will be treated very second class. Almost like oh they are "locked in to the lease" so we don't have to treat them like valued residents any longer. Word to the wise don't bite the hand that feeds you! Or you will loose it.
This store was pretty good when it opened, however the range of bikes and equipment has been watered down to low-quality chinese made brands selling at prices that are way too high. In my opinion they are cashing in on the uninformed buyers out there who just want to stroke their ego by buying at a shop that gives that "extreme" image. Honestly? Forget the "extreme", most of the bikes they sell (dwindling numbers of top-end Jamis bikes excluded) would fall apart after a few weeks of mild road use.
If you eat Thai food often, you'll hate Opart. They barely put any vegetables in their curries, there's no redeeming menu items, they're pricier than normal; just extremely sub-par. It's right down the street from me so I've given it way too many chances, but each time I say never again - this time I'm serious. Ma and I in the South Loop is just as bad.
This place only has one good thing about it, it has its own fridge n stove in each room (don't get excited, I NEVER said either was even nice or much less acceptable, think along the lines of it'd be cozy, if inside a room for a meth head with maybe even a couple of roaches he thought of as friends) The lady that's runs the place is somewhere around middle aged and Indian, or Pakistani, not sure exactly but she is rude, controlling, inconsiderate, and the list goes on (id be willing to bet everything I own that she really doesn't care about ANY customer to the point where im sure if you stayed the night youd be very lucky and one of the few if your got clean bedding, got your room swept and mopped and disinfected along with your fridge and all being cleaned) Im not a mean or vengeful person, I just felt almost the most disrespected I have ever been. I had just returned from my deployment to Iraq for 13 months witth the army had been havin really hard time dealing with being homeless off n on but getting rooms when finances allowed. On top of everything ive said, immediately after paying and receiving my key she told me " your not to have any company while your here, nobody at all, not even to stop by" hahaha, I hadn't even thought about that but that's besides the point. im a paying customer, who is she to tell me thisd? well at around 8:15-8:30 I had a friend from the church I had begun to go to once and a while but becam good friends with outside. well at around 10 minutes to 9 she calls my room demanding my friend leave or shell mae me leave and not refund my money ($69.99 for a night in this dump plus I had been there MAYBE 3 hours) Well im pretty much done ranting, bust one last thing, she had (what if you asked me to do the math id conclude was either friends or family) staying in 2 separate rooms downstairs. One was a indian man and the other room indian man n woman. who she had been cooking for when I initially checked in in her mnake shift kitchen behind the front desk then got together with the other 3 I saw her exit the rooms 3 separate times just by itself the 4 MAYBE AT VERY MOST 5 times I stepped out to smoke a ciggerette, n the third was after 100 at night when I smoked my last ciggerette before bed. I could hear them watching t.v. through the floor underneath me!!! I felt as if she was (at least at first) telling me I was not welcome or something, but after really looking at it after, she was (from the very beginning) taking as much as possible advantage of the fact that I was turning to my last and only choice at the time and I also felt she was trying to make it in my view to see that hewr friends (or family, whatever they were) received her acting n treating them like people, but that I didn't deserve that because (and im not being over dramatic) I PLAIN N SIMPLE WASNT LIKE THEM, I WAS WHITE. It wouldn't surprise me if my nightly rate was different then the select invidiuals she chose. Either that's the straight up truth, or she miscalculated American total for those rooms that resembled what youd expect to see in a bathroom in the deep backwoods of the luisianna swamps. Save yourself the the rage youll feel when trying to hold back from letting her get back what shes built up in you the whole time all in one act. plus a man room at the motel 6 up throad is the dsame price and its actually nice. or the (itseither best western or heritage inn) is like $15 more but its rteally nice plus pool, hot tub, n complimentary breakfeast
Been shopping and eating there for a while and tonight was the last straw. 8 o'clock and they are cleaning up everything while people are ordering food. Sweeping all around my feet leaving the swept garbage for us to stand on in front of the register. I was served a quesadilla with al pastor meat. when I went for my first bite the meat I encountered was hard and tough that their useless plastic forks could not even separate. It was gross. I gave it back to them at the counter and let them know in good spanish what a pig pen they were serving food to people. Not shopping there anymore on that account.
WOULD NEVER BUY FROM THESE GUYS EVER. I HAD TO CHASE THEM DOWN TO FIX THE THINGS THAT THEY WERE GOING TO FIX WHEN I BOUGHT THE SUV. REALLY BAD BUSINESS DEALINGS..... STAY FAR AWAY
Awful experience. Some of them are uncommunicative, and if those that are happen to be out sick, you're SOL unless YOU call THEM multiple times. Took 5 days for a timing belt and water pump replacement that should've taken 2 at most. To top it off, my car was tossed and my GPS is missing.
Came in today to have lunch with my brother and a few of his friends to celebrate his birthday. I was quite disappointed to have Chris your Manager be arrogant and rude in his dealings with us, there was no need for his lack of customer service and rudeness. I will not be recommending this establishment to anyone, the service he showed was terrible, he needs to start thinking about the customer and stop trying to push his own importance around. It ruined the day and we left early because of it. NOT RECOMMENED
Drive-thru. Ordered the filet of fish combo. Fries were soggy with oil--not cooked. The tiny piece of cheese was half off the bun. Called manager. Said they'd mail me a refund. Nothing.
I had appointment at this store, went in describe the problem to the genius agent. I had a bad battery where usage and stand by time was same. The diagnostics said battery was good so I asked why I was having this problem then? He agreed to to change battery for FREE. He comes back after 15 minutes with sad news that they cant change it because there is liquid damage. WHAT? I told him I am the only owner of this phone and there has been no water damage to the phone. He acted like I was lying and I was crappy college student. I told him so many times there cant be damage because I am VERY CAREFUL about my gadgets he said his same thing that they cant service it because he found LIQUID damage inside which was STICKY. I went outside and called APPLE toll free they told me to talk to store manager who was JAMES and he explained the same thing and wanted me to buy new phone for 199$ I walked out pissed. Couple days later I went to Apple store in Kansas city, MO (Country Club Plaza) I told them what happend at Leawood store they checked the phone and IT WAS LEAK FROM BATTERY WHICH WAS STICKY!! The country club plaza store replaced the whole phone and gave me new one. The LEAWOOD store failed to identify problem and did not treat me like a customer because the cloths i was wearing and the way i went into store.
my suggestion is based on ten years of using this hotel formerly a best western property new management, mr. nick patel has created a best value inn hotel mr. patel has his own view of customer service in the last 90 days, my car was vandalized at this location, $ 9000. damage mr. patel then personally threatened me and ordered me off the premise in writing after filing a claim against his insurance carrier claim and potential lawsuit currently pending best to try and find a better hotel hotel has old world charm but hotel has mold history and is not ADA compliant please contact the best value corporate office in florida if you have complaints about this best value inn hotel
I went for lunch once. It was cool. Tonight.... Man that place was dirty and obviously understaffed. The only thing good was the cook. I hoped the bartender knew a little something. So wrong. Tonight pretty much sealed it's fate with me. I won't be going back and I will travel to the one on I-10 from now on. Cooks.... Great job. The rest..... Pish!!!!!
A real dump. Should be bulldozed.
Do NOT use this cleaning company. After showing up four hours late, the cleaner declared our flat 'Schmelchy' and, as per David's review below, also tried to charge more than the agreed price. However, it gets worse. They cleaned the fridge and threw out pretty much everything in it, including my dinner for that evening, which I'd only made the evening before. This was frustrating, but what was most shocking was discovering their random acts of vandalism/theft in the bathroom and kitchen. I discovered a treasured ceramic bowl from the bathroom broken to pieces in the black bin liners the cleaners had left outside, along with a MAC eyeshadow. I've still not been able to find the lipstick that was in the bowl, so can only assume it was thrown away/stolen. In addition, I found that some chocolates had also been taken from a tin in the kitchen. I was absolutely incensed that the cleaners had caused around £40 worth of theft/damage, particularly as we had paid £90 for the privilege. Emails of complaint have - unsurprisingly - resulted in nothing but a 'We're sorry, we're looking into this' email. DO NOT use this company. Not unless you don't value any of your belongings.
everything!
How can I have an experience there is they don't bother to post a menu, do I even want to drive an hour to go there? Learn from the Europeans, POST A MENU.
I brought my car in and told them "I have a TRASNMISSION problem. They said it will cost $130 for a diagnosis of the problem. Get a call back later and said it's your transmission we are going to need to charge you $250 for a diagnosis. Uhm, read the paperwork IT SAID TRANSMISSION issue. You knew good and well what it was when I told you and you ripped me off. Plus you quoted me worst case scenario $4,200 for a replacement and I have received quotes for $1,600 for the same thing. Really consider wasting your money here. Total rip off!
Educators this frighteningly ignorant is disturbing. Someone up the food chain should straighten them out. I'll say what everyone is thinking. Is it a coincidence the mom name sounds Mexican. Does the principal have a problem with what he perceives as 'smelly mexicans'? Did the adults that complained know of her medical problems. Low grade for this Tierra Antigua, low grade.
They did it: they pulled to total lie (because I'm a woman who came in alone, i guess). They told me a story about how I needed $690 of work because "both sides need to be replaced" and "if we do that, we gotta do this too". I took it to Mark at The Car Doc in Mundelein, and (even though he knew the story) fixed it for $64. For all I know, what he fixed, Duxler broke so they could have a way to feed my their bull.
The room was horrible - the bathroom and shower were in separate rooms across the hall. Even worse, the hotel double charged our payment and did not actively respond after we proposed this issue. Poor service! I strongly not recommend this place.
drinks are good
I've been a customer of Efax for about 10 years. I recently learned they have been ripping me off for years. Last month I was charged an additional $10 so when I "inquired" to American Express about a $10 charge Efax canceled my service. Apparently when they get an INQUIRY they just cancel your service. I called right away and I was told I can re-activate it, and guess what for a better rate! a better rate of $169/yr (meanwhile, were charging me $220 for YEARS!) Then a few days later I was charged $220 AGAIN. I called once again (and had to hold for 25 minutes before I got to speak to someone AGAIN) and was told they would credit my EFAX account (not my credit card) $36. What am I going to do with a STORE CREDIT at EFAX? I would never ever exceed the 200 page limits -- I rarely use the fax. I then asked to speak to a supervisor because the customer service agent was not authorized to do anything else. The "supervisor" spoke to me in a condescending tone the entire time and pretty much told me "too bad" and thats all he's going to do for me according to the contract. Let me just say, as a business owner, that this is a disgusting way of doing business. If my account wasn't accidentally canceled I would have never known that I was being charged MUCH MORE than the rest of the world for a better service package. I find this to be almost criminal! I am disgusted and appalled that a company the size of EFAX treats its customers this way. I will be spending the rest of my day warning others not to get in bed with these people and then contacting my lawyer to get all of my money back.
We arrived legoland at 1030am and the return coach was planned at 5PM, initially were worrying the return bus might be too early however later found us absolutely wrong about that: we finished all the rides before 12 noon and craving to go home, end up we took a 2 hour nap in Burger King. Pros: cheap, not crowded. Cons: weather too hot and no shelter, park very small not many rides, photos are too expensive (50rm each). This park is meant for kids.
This location lists things as delivered even when it isn't. I paid for two day shipping and they don't even bother to try to deliver it after 4 days of it being listed as 'delivered.' Called the main FedEx and they were completely unhelpful. Use UPS.
No hot water to wash hands in bathroom. Paint peeling off crumbling walls, bathtub peeling as well. Room stinks....how do they not see these things? Even Super 8 has a fridge/ microwave....and this is a resort? San Diego should be embarrassed to allow this establishment to have such low standards and high prices. 
Came in and asked for a simple part. Was told that they would need to know what it fits. Then pointed me to something completely different from what I asked for. I had to search the store for what I was looking for and asked to see it. While I was there, I saw them misdiagnose a customer's computer. I don't recommend this place like I once did.
Sucks
I use to be a loyal customer of there's but there quality has dropped in the last 6 months .The last straw was when I ordered at 7:56 and the food didn't arrive till 930.. they wrote down the wrong address and called at 8:50 to confirm the correct address and said it would be leaving out the door in 2 min.. it took them 40 min to drive 6 blocks!! I called the owner Jay the following day and he insults me and takes there side and has no customer support.. His drivers said they called 5 times and I wanted to take my phone down to him to show him I got one call... NEVER AGAIN !!! dont waste your time!!
I just recently moved and thought I would try Banfield because it is in a convenient location for me. Worst mistake ever. The customer service of the staff is horrible besides the front desk. They are rude and try to belittle you. From how they act it is clear that they do not care about the pets or their owners. They tried to talk me into getting a bunch of services and tests done that weren't needed, and getting all this medication for my cat "just in case this is what he has." Also, the services that I did agree to that I knew were actually needed, were about twice the price of my previous veterinary clinic. Not to mention the exam fees and the "hospital charges," which were also overpriced. They also said I have to come back and do all the same tests in 15 days, then a month, then every three months. No way am I spending a few hundred dollars with them that often. Time to move on to a clinic that has staff who aren't rude and actually care about the well being of their patients rather than trying to sell you everything.
BE VERY CAREFUL ABOUT BUYING USED CARS HERE! My daughter bought a car last year from them. One year later, she returned to their service department for a checkup (they wanted $100 for this) and was told she'd need to spend 3k on 4 new tires, an alignment and a new rack and pinion steering gear box. She was told that the car was unsafe to drive. The car had been driven only 13k over the last 12 months and was sold with "new tires." She walked out and got a 2nd opinion, whereupon she was told that the car needed only 2 new tires, it was safe to drive, and the total repair cost would be $1300, and no new rack/pinion needed. Clearly this was a case of Braman Honda taking advantage of a young 20-something woman, where they thought they could make a buck (or 3k in this case) and get away with it. CAR BUYER BEWARE.
FALSE ADVERTISING AND UNFAIR BUSINESS PRACTICES I was very disappointed to discover this dealership advertising three 2012 model Kia Optima SX models as new with no miles and then find out they were demos with over 5000 miles each. Moreover, one of them was even damaged in the left front quarter panel and there was substantial wheel damage. I also was angered by the bait and switch pricing practice of advertising $8,000 off retail on select new models including the model I was interested in A20346 Kia Optima SX and discovered they wanted to provide pricing that was $2700 higher than it should be. Buyer beware of this store.
Their phone hangs up on you when you call.
This place has horrible service, it does not even deserve a 1 star rating. their products are old and they still act like they are of great value. If you are selling something, the employees will try to undermine the value of your goods so they can make as much profit as they can by trying to fool you. this is definitely not a good business and any smart spender or investor will stay away from this place.
I stayed there a year an I had a flood. Then riverchase had to take out my bathroom. They have change management she is so rude don't spend your money there not a nice place to live,
peel airports will not drop the prices to let ryain air or easy jet land because it wants to sell it for housing
None
I have been paying good money for my son to live in the Scott Brown properties. Turns out there was suppose to be a permit on his car to park there. Now he has been towed along with the rest of his room mates and they will have to pay 220.00 to get their car back. Plus there is no one in the off site office on the weekends. THIS JUST BLOWS
This place is horrible!! The internet pictures has it looking glamorous!!! The price was good but the rooms were nothing AT ALL like they looked on the internet!! I will never, ever stay here again!!
Worst bank in the history of banking.
Do not stay at this hotel. While the water outage wasn't the hotel's fault, the manager refused to give us any money back for our horrible night without water. He was rude, and so meant to his employees two of them were in tears. He was one of the most uncaring people I've ever met. What makes me sick is that the hotel will no doubt file an insurance claim, therefore will be paid twice for their horrible service - once by the guests who went without water, and again by the insurance company.
When I found a live cockroach on my salad, not only did the manager not come over apologize but they didn't take my lunch off the bill till I asked them too. Then they charged me for extra pita bread to eat to wait while the made me a new salad.
First let me say the folks I dealt with personelly were great. That was Kyle, Eva and Shelly. They were great. And then there was underwriting. they were a pain in the ass from start to finish. It took way too long for this loan to close.That is really the only bad thing I had but it drug down the whole process untill I was ready to change companies. Kyle went to bat and finnaly got the loan closed. I would never finance a house with or recomend Quicken because of the slow underwriters.
The staff was very impatient and arrogant. They acted like I was privileged just to consider buying an iPhone. Additionally, their trade in value was $100 less than Apple would have given me.
Leider kann ich für meinen ersten (und mit Sicherheit letzten!!!) Besuch im Sausalitos in Stuttgart nicht mehr als einen Stern vergeben. Angefangen mit dem schlechten Service war der gesamte Abend ein ziemlicher Reinfall. Zunächst wurden für unsere Geburtstagsgesellschaft trotz vorheriger Reservierung zu wenige Plätze bereitgestellt. Dem jungen Mann, der uns an diesem Abend bedient hat, stand die fehlende Motivation förmlich ins Gesicht geschrieben. Er war überdies sehr unfreundlich und hat als Krönung zwei der Geburtstagsgäste mit 6 Schnäpsen übergossen. Leider mussten wir an diesem Abend nicht nur die fehlenden Plätze reklamieren, sondern auch mehrfach nach unseren bestellten Getränken fragen. Als Antwort erhielten wir nur lapidare Rechtfertigungen - der Kellner meinte, er könnte ja nichts dafür, da die Reservierungen anscheinend zentral über eine Agentur abgewickelt werden und der Barkeeper "mal wieder schläft" (wörtlich!). Leider hat sich das teilweise sehr lange Warten auf die Getränke keineswegs gelohnt, sogar die Cola hat fast nur nach purem Wasser geschmeckt. Im Laufe des Abends wurde leider auch noch die äußerst monotone Musik extrem laut aufgedreht, so dass man sich am Tisch nicht mehr in einer halbwegs normalen Lautstärke unterhalten konnte. Der absolute Abschuss kam dann allerdings zum Schluss: Bevor wir den Heimweg antraten, gingen wir noch kurz zur Toilette. Wenn ich gewusst hätte, was mich dort erwartet, hätte ich mir das sicherlich verkniffen ... Zumindest in der Damentoilette gab es in keiner der Kabinen Toilettenpapier und es hat ERBÄRMLICH gestunken! Da ich mich von Berufswegen her oft in Werkstätten aufhalte, bin ich wirklich viel Elend gewöhnt, was schmutzige Toiletten angeht, aber DAS war wirklich heftig! Der Gestank war so abartig, dass dies bei mir fast schon Brechreiz ausgelöst hat. Ich hatte ein paar Stunden nach dem Lokalbesuch Magenkrämpfe, die nun schon einen Tag lang anhalten, ob hier evtl. ein Zusammenhang besteht, kann ich nicht sagen. Fazit: Ich habe definitiv kein Verlangen, meinen Besuch im Sausalitos zu wiederholen. Einmal und nie wieder!
I highly recommend that you do NOT bring your car to this shop .They "fixed" my Subaru, but after driving it for less than 10 miles the Service Engine Light stared blinking, When I called them they told me to bring it back in, They didn't listen to what I was telling them, they jumped the gun & went for a $1,700 head job instead of a manning up & saying they did the job wrong in the first place. And on top of that, they told me it was driving fine... Ummm no it's not, I know it's my car.
We were looking forward to going to Bella Famiglia for the first time having heard they have a fairly nice menu. Unfortunately, after calling a few times over several hours the phone just kept ringing. We were not able to contact anyone at the restaurant nor get any information on hours or available reservations. With no one answering, we decided to go to Sprigs at 5 Strawberry Hill in Acton. As usual, Sprigs provided a wonderful dining experience. Maybe next year at Bella Famiglia should they make themselves more accessible.
Horrible. Every time I come in there is a 15 to 20 minute wait because they only have 1 or 2 tellers working. I have a business account and personal. Because of my bad experience here, I will be switching these accounts to another bank. Set your bank account somewhere else, you will not be happy in this branch.
Amazing incompetent employees here, I have no idea what's going on with this location, but I advise others to avoid it and just go to another.
I was happy when I visited this temple first time around 5 years back. Now I dont call it a temple. It is business. it is only money money money
Found a hair in my ice cream. They refunded my money but ewwww. Hair nets ladies hair nets.
Juste sale, faudrait voir à éduquer vos consommateurs, je sais pas moi, mettez des poubelles, ils savent peut être ce que sait?
The place is a mess. We were the only ones in the place and every table was dirty. They messed up our order. We will not go back!
I go here because my wife likes it. It's ok but some things I order just plain suck. I'd rather go to Ho Toys on State College and South.
I don't usually write reviews but our experience here was so awful I just couldn't bite my tongue. This place is 2 blocks from my apt and after reading the great reviews on here I decided to buy a Groupon they were offering and give it a try (I cannot for the life of me understand how business owners don't understand the point of Groupons is getting new customers in and impressing them so they come back and pay full price...but i digress). I met my boyfriend there at 7pm last Saturday and he was sitting in one of the tables (which was cracked down the middle) on the patio. He told me that he didn't think there was a waitress because he had been sitting there for 10 minutes and nobody came by (this was confirmed when he went to the bar to order drinks). For a place that calls itself a Restaurant in its name and on the large sign out front I found this a little odd to not have a single waitress on a Saturday evening. Strike one. We decided on 4 items from the limited menu items (Arancini - which being spelled incorrectly on the menu should have been a warning (foul tip), Arugula and Beet salad, Chicken Quesadilla, and Tuna Tartar. When my bf went to the bar to order he was told that they didn't have the Arancini and that they were out of Arugula so the Beet salad would be served with another kind of lettuce. ALSO that the kitchen was behind because everyone there had a Groupon and was ordering food so it might be a little bit of a wait (there was not more than 10 people in the entire place). Strike 2. We order more drinks and about 20 minutes later our friends happen to walk in (they also had bought the Groupon). They order some food (Beet minus Arugula salad, Burger and Chicken Wings). We order more drinks and wait...now 50 minutes after we ordered the bartender brings the salad to the table (in case you were wondering it was served with romaine to replace the arugula). The beets were raw, completely inedible. After another 5 minutes a guy come from the sidewalk and into the restuarant and to our table with a burger and wings. I say to the guy "I'm sorry, we ordered our food half an hour before them, do you happen to know when it will be coming out". His response "oh, i'm sorry I don't work here, this food was ordered from Pedones" THEY ORDERED FOOD FROM THE PIZZA PLACE NEXT DOOR AND HAD IT DELIVERED TO THEIR RESTAURANT!!!!!!!!!!! STRIKE 3 After speaking with the bartender (who apparently is also the manager) about the unacceptable wait time (her excuse was that regular chef was out sick and it was this chef's first day.... remember there were no more than 10 people there when we ordered and only 1 item we ordered actually required cooking). Finally about 10 minutes later our quesadilla comes out. To be fair it was pretty good but honestly I was starving by this point and anything would have tasted good. Another 5 minutes and our Tuna Tartar finally arrives...The odor coming off the fish wasn't worth risking the food poisoning. ...how many strikes is that now? I don't know how this place is still in business.
This is not about a particular visit. It is about the general management of this location. I frequent a lot of McDonald's. I've been to McDonald's in more states than I'd like to admit and also to locations in other countries. This particular location is not a very busy one. Actually, it is on the slow side. I happen to live down the road and therefore frequent it a lot. On average at least once a day. Orders are wrong more often than not. Delays happen at all times of the day and night. Having to wait unusually long periods of time in the drive-thru is the rule instead of the exception. At times when I have gone inside I see more employees than customers and they still seem to take forever to fill an order and when filled chances are pretty good that it is wrong. The first few times this happened I just chalked it up to chance but I now realize that this is an every day occurrence. The one thing I can always count on with McDonald's is consistency in service and products wherever I stop. Please review this location and find out why they don't meet McDonald's standards.
Parked at 13th & Glisan - called in about the penalty notice I received, Talked to a young man that could give a c**p about my issue I advised him that I tried to pay at the meter. He told me that if the meter is having issues I need to call. Advised him I was reading the BIG sign that says public parking after 5pm and weekends, he was very kind to inform me that that just means that the public can park there nights and weekends for a fee. I said well after the meter would not take my payment if figured it was just like the street meters that it was a free time to park. He advised me that no that is not what it means and that I need to pay the $44 charge. Paid my fine and was still upset so I called back to see about maybe getting the fine reduced or any kind of consideration and the answer was "NO" we are not empowered to do anything for you. I then asked if I could send in a letter to express my frustration at the situation was advised that I could send it in to the address on the notice but no one is going to change it. I work in customer service, that nice thing would have been to say something like we love feed back please feel free to send in your comments and we will review them or something. You have a notice saying your call might be recorded and after this experience that feels like a total CYA issue and you "as a company" could give a flying &*&^ about your customers.
This dfac sucks
I contacted this company for information on garden pond services on 06/19/2010, asked if I could speak with someone regarding installing a garden pond, which they advertise on their website. The lady who answered the phone told me she has customers in front who are waiting to be rung up and they are looking at her as to why she is talking on the phone instead of helping them. Was I NOT a customer too? After of waiting on hold for close to 7 minutes, I decided that customers calling this establishment are not treated as walk in customers. I have since gotten some very good information calling other landscape companies and stone companies to start my project. Green Mama's - I have shopped at your store many times as a walk in customer. It is too bad you do not afford the same type of service to your call in type customer. Adios!!!
I cancelled my membership with them, after I was out of contract, and after 2 months of wrangling, they finally cancelled my membership, but then proceeded to bill me 3 months after. Thank God for American Express. They reversed the charges and blocked Golds from charging my account. Then, about 2 months after Amex blocked them, they continued billing under a different merchant account. Amex again reversed the charges and blocked the other merchant account and cancelled my card and reissued for me. This is an awful company. Even if you wanted to pay cash for the year, they won't do it. They require a credit card or checking account with monthly billing. In other words, they want the opportunity to bend you over at some point in the relationship. This isn't how you do business. This is not Joe Gold's gym of back in the day. This is a BS corporation and I hope they go down in flames.
I brought my laptop in for repairs. I waited over 15 minutes fand one of the 4 men I I could see there in the department ever looked up and even acknowledged my existence. I finally went up to one of them and said, 'Excuse me, am I waiting in the right place for service and repairs?" He did not look up, he just mumbled, "yes." Another 5 minutes and someone came to help me. That's PATHETIC. Customer Service 101 says, acknowledge the customer and say, "We'll be right with you." And then acutally be right with them. Boo Frys.
Poor service. Workers r rude. Expensive. Not going back.
Les was very nice, unfortunately he did not report the correct information to the transporter and therefore my vehicle was refused transport. This company is quick to charge a broker fee and even quicker to not answer the phone because they unrightfully charged me 150$ for nothing. No transport, no service, no secondary transport or offers to still deliver my vehicle, just took my money and refused to deal with me after that... Poor business!!! All I wanted is my 150$ back for them doing nothing, I guess ripping people off and taking their money is how this business stays in business
Ok, where to start! The people are nice, staff is great. Rooms are terrible, bed is totaly uncomfortable, and appears to be like 20 years old. Then matresses have plastic on them, as if a 6 year old is going to pee the bed! Not good. The shower is terrible and mine leaked so as soon as I turned the bath water on, my head got wet. The shower curtin moves and you have no room to move around. They hold a charge on your credit card for incidentals, but they have none! Well ok, a bag of chips $1.00 Soda $1.25 and Bottle Water $1.50 WAY over priced. Breakfast was terrible, but it was free. The paint job was terrible and I can keep going. The best part was the price, cheep and I got what I paid for a TERRIBLE hotel room.
We are a small business (established and trading for 20 years) that called the Able Group to re-glaze a broken window. Work was actually OK and they issued us with an invoice. All still fine. Like any regular business we logged the invoice and scheduled a payment on standard 30 day terms. 10 days later they chased - quite aggressively. Then they emailed, again, in quite stong terms. I replied to say that a payment was already scheduled and what seemed to be the problem. The claimed the job had been "cash on completion", which I pointed out was simply a lie and re-iterated that the payment was actually already set up and scheduled. A few days later I got a "notification of intent" (to commence proceedings)! What sort of business treats what was a happy customer like this. We had no intention of not paying, had informed them that our terms were 30 days and without even waiting to see if we were good to our word, they issue silly (and meaningless) threats. The real joke is that the "notification of intent" was that they would take us to court in 7 days - by which time the payment would already be have been made!! Avoid these people at all costs! What a pathetic bunch -and I can see from various reviews here and there that they don't exactly have a great record for their work! You'd have though that when the rare occasion happens that they actually have a satisfied customer, they would not do their very best to convert that customer into one who is most unhappy.
I had made an appointment almost 2 months ahead of time for a manicure that was included in a wagjag. I arrived on time for my appointment. they were not even open. There was me and another lady waiting out in the cold for over an hour and no one showed up. paid for something that i never received. Avoid this place at all costs.
Went in for IPhone screen (was cracked) repair. Was told it would take a day and it would be fixed, 2 month later and I finally got my IPhone back. Was quoted £40, ended up costing me £160. Terrible service, everything seems dodgy and underhand. Would never user them again or allow any of my friends or family to use them.
Their I'd no half star otherwise would hv been given poor service..
None
I just moved near a price "smart" and I'm disturbed by their prices. a package of Bologna is $6. I regularly find items at 3x the price of other grocery stores. Their labeling is also deciving. I can't imagine how much food expires on their shelves. If you want to triple your grocery bill, shop here!
copy machines broke half time, no room to move, not enough clerks to service customers, expect to wait 20min in line for any help. no rubber bands, paperclips etc. on work tables. and DON"T even try to ship ANYTHING, the most restrictive enforcment of every little shipping rule of any fedex in metro area. dot ALL I's cross ALL T's. CAN I GIVE NEGITIVE STARS?
None
The Barns and Noble book store is a given for the lpn materials. I went to get a Tabe Level A. Since I have to take the math level three again. Extremely helpful!
It does not matter what time of day the service is bad. When I go to the drive thru I have to repeat my order over and over it is a simple order med lite no sugar and med cream one sugar and they always screw it up and put sugar in the coffee that I order no sugar. I have gone into to complain they say the manager or owner are not there and they dont have a phone number for them. I have left my name and number for the owner to call me I never get a call.I give up and I know alot of people who have the same complaint. So we just give our business to Braintree DD. So be aware if you go here you will get so agravated before your morning nd coffee and drive away and take a sip a of coffee and find out they screwed up your order again grrr!!!77
I send the receivers back to At & t and never reached their destination now have a charge over 600 dlls.
Watch the check amount. I ordered a foot long, and then saw $10 displayed on the register. So I asked for a receipt the guy gave me one with the right amount. Later I found out that my credit card was charged $10. I am having the dispute department of my bank dealing with this. Ah, and the sub did not taste right.
Friendly waitstaff clearly not supported by its kitchen. We waited over 40 minutes for lunch to be served, and the end product was not worth any wait at all. After that wait, my Cobb salad arrived at the table undressed, made of bagged shredded lettuce, diced tomatoes, and chopped processed turkey. The waiter and manager were apologetic, but claimed that they deal with these delays every day. There are far too many good places to go in Redmond... Don't waste your time and money here!
None
I am not one to normally leave negative reviews, but considering what this office has done.. I would NEVER recommend this place for orthodontic treatment. After over a year of my daughter wearing braces, we went to her scheduled monthly visit last week just to be told they will NO longer treat her because they have decided to "not" accept her insurance from this point on. No advance warning.. NOTHING! I kept my daughter home from school, drove 45 minutes & sat in the lobby almost 2 hours waiting, before they even told me! Not to mention, they would not even tighten her braces while we were there. When I asked Jen (office manager) about this, her response was that it's ok to go up to 12 weeks without treatment. REALLY??? So it's OK to put metal in a child's mouth & then decide you no longer want to finish the job, therefore leaving the parents to find a resolution. The excuse is they are not happy with the insurance company, so they decided to throw in the towel, per Jen.. This office took NO blame on their part whatsoever.... nor could/would recommend what to do from this point other tell each parent effected to contact the insurance company for answers. Even the insurance company has been shocked by this. They have documentation of payments paid up to date.. I posted a comment regarding this situation on Suncoast Braces Facebook page, which by that evening was deleted. I guess they only want the positive comments to be seen. They have been unprofessional is so many ways! I could never trust them after this.
Very unwelcoming experience, rude and couldn't care less staff. It is not to the standards of Sheraton. This is the only hotel in SPG that I found which does not identify guest as spg member and does not care to know. Being an international visitor to Sydney, this hotel refused to accept corporate international currency card which even small corner shops accepted all over Australia and I was left with no option but to foot the huge advance on my personal card. The staff had absolutely no sense of responsibility, and did not hesitate from arguing and staying on with their rehearsed unhelpful statements. I would not advice any international folks to visit this. To top it all, the room service menu had 1 Indian item, room service charge of $7+tax in addition to bill, and food was not good (taste, presentation, freshness,.. on all counts).
Truly a horrible experience. I walked in with the plan on buying a car THAT DAY. I dealt with a salesman, gave him the models I was interested in and my price range. They found a car they thought I would like, took me to a satellite lot, and the car wasn't there. So I perused and found a car that I truly wanted to buy. After being told that I was being "rigid" about pricing and options, despite the full disclosure about my interests and limitations in the purchase, I chose to take a night to consider it. Came back the next day with the decision to buy the car EVEN ABOVE what I had planned on spending, and have been going through hoops ever since. After 3 days worth of 3-5 hours sitting in the dealership and empty promises about actually getting the car in my possession, I am now sitting stranded at work, without the car being delivered as-promised. Strike 3, you're out. I would NOT recommend ANYONE using this dealership, unless you are a glutton for punishment.
Didn't even get in to see the Dr. Called for a general checkup and they insisted I see a Physician's Assistant instead of a Doctor. I waited 10 days for the appt. The Friday before my Monday appt they called around 11 am and left a message saying I was required to call them back within 4 hours to confirm or they'd give away my appt. I couldn't - I work full time and wasn't able to make a personal call within their prescribed 4 hour window. Wasn't my initial calling to schedule the appointment enough of a confirmation? Not sure why I'm forced to call again. Was a total inconvenience and a waste of time so I'm on the look out for a better Dr.
None
I BECAME RUDE AND LOUD AFTER SHE LARCENED MY MONEY FROM ME AND I HAVE WITNESSES THAT WILL STATE SHE STOLE MY MONEY! This establishment s owner needs to grow some testicular fortitude and stand up to the wait-staff and bartenders! He allows a bunch of Femi-Nazi women to manage the place that have no sense of customer service abilities. On three separate accounts and especially the last one makes this place intolerable. The first time the bartender came into work the bar but all she would do was gab with the wait-staff crying about something that happened that day and 7 or 8 patrons were waiting to be serviced but after 20-25 minutes of waiting we all decided to leave and go to a different establishment. Keep your personal life at home; if you ve had something that bad in your life then take the day off of work. A second time; I hit keno for $410 on a Saturday and I tipped the bartender very handsomely that day and then came in again on that Sunday; had lunch, left a tip near my plate and moved from one seat at the bar to another to where a friend was sitting. About an hour later that same bartender made a comment loud enough for everyone to hear WHERE S MY TIP she says to me. I told her I left one near the plate earlier and that you don t demand a tip from your patrons; YOU EARN YOUR TIPS! That next week she wouldn t serve me and told me to not sit at the bar. But she would allow me to drink at tables; therefore, I kept giving the waitress nice size tips which would have gone to the bartender if she had any intelligence to her. The third and final blast at me was this past week before Thanksgiving: I bought the people at the bar near me a round of drinks. I paid the bartender for that round and a tip. About a half hour later I requested another round for myself and gave the bartender a $10 for that round, and I m waiting, and waiting and waiting; finally I ask her where were my drinks that I just gave you money for. She comes back and says I never gave her money and I said B.S I did too. I had three witnesses that verified to her that I gave her the money. She then has the nerve to tell me I m cut off and tells me to leave and never bother come back. And I told her that she s the one that should never bother coming back when you cannot perform your duties as a bartender and stealing my money. Therefore; I will not come back until I get an apology from this establishment. And my $10 that she stole from me.
One of the worst experiences ever. Waiter Hong was terrible, poor service. Food was cold. No utensils, bibs, butter till we asked twice. No refills of water. No acknowledgement of birthday boy and they were told upon entering and while waiting for dinner, which took 45 minutes. Manager Lexi gave so so apology. No offer of free hush puppies as they were cold and a new order did not arrive until we were almost through with dinner. No offer of free dessert because of problems. DO NOT GO HERE! Corporate will hear from me.
Horrible first time Midas experience - Went to get a belt replaced .. Told me it would cost $150 with belt and labor, then once they removed the belt, they start to tell me more parts that I HAVE TO HAVE in order for my belt to get replaced properly. Which was BS.... Bill ended up being $300 !! Plus when I checked my car in, the report said all my lights were working fine, then when it was pulled out, left front headlight was not working. I was very upset, asked to speak with the manager, and he offered to look at the headlight and if it was a bulb, that he would replace it at there cost. So he checked the headlight, pulled the bulb out, SHOWED THE BULB to me, and said "Nope, not the bulb, looks like we need some labor time to figure it out" I said YA RIGHT, come to find out, took it to a mechanical back home, IT WAS THE BULB!! LIED, OVERPRICED and just not right !!
They prefer to make you stand instead of preparing available tables. Be ready to wait 40 mins for no reason. Good location though.
LADRI... Aspettavo un pacco, e dopo un po' trovo scritto che il pacco è stato consegnato. Mi reco alla filiale più vicina (si fa per dire) e faccio un lunga coda; tutti con problemi analoghi: pacchi persi, rubati, manomessi, o mai spediti. Al mio turno la svogliata signora chiama il corriere che ha consegnato il pacco, che afferma di averlo messo nella buca (contro ogni legge della fisica, siccome il pacco è grande e nella buca non può entrare). Ovvio che è stato rubato dallo stesso corriere. Ma dico, se le società statali funzionano così, prendono soldi e danneggiano gli altri, ha senso che siano aperte? Ora aspetto che i venga consegnata la copia della firma che avrei dovuto apporre alla consegna, ma non mi aspetto nulla di buono... Certo che la denuncia ai carabinieri non la toglie nessuno.
I went into the Florida iDoctor on Tampa Road in Oldsmar to have my iphone glass repaired. Their website said 15 minutes to fix your iPhone. I went in to learn the repair person was out for an hour. I left the phone and paid the bill of $130 dollars. I then went back an hour and a half later, and the repairman stated they did you not stock the iPhone 5 S glass cover and a return my money and sent me on my way. If you want to waste an hour of your life and not have your phone fixed, go to the Florida iDoctor. They call themselves doctors yet the woman did not diagnosis the needed cover correctly and the company couldn't fix the phone--not much of a doctor!
The food is amazing! The service spoils everything. The waiter was rude and the food was served incorrectly so that most of the table had finished their main course before others were served. In the end, we had to wait so long that that the delay meant that the place closed before they served dessert! When we asked for the dessert menu we were told that we had run out of time and we had to leave. What a shame because the food was really good.
I've received 2 letters now from Mark and his business associate, under two business names - We Buy Houses being the other at the same business address. Both letters are in regards to offering to help settle my mother's estate and/or buy her home. Personally, I've received several of these letters over the last 7 months since my mother's passing, but Mark's have come well after the house was already sold, and now a month past the settling of her estate. Very late to the game and obviously no research done. I think this tactic of trying to liquidate the estate of the deceased by trying to gain trust of the surviving family is disturbing and distasteful. Further, to do it so blindly that they don't even realize that the lead is beyond cold (no death pun intended), shows a lack in professionalism and moral terpitude, that I would steer away from doing business with them even I were in need. Mark, if you read this, and the other reviews I've been posting, please cease sending me any further correspondence. Call me if you have any questions since you have my info.
Dont get caught without cash to park, no credit cards for parking. Closest ATM is in a sketchy little store if the one at the double tree inn is broke.
ALSO POST CARS THEY DON'T HAVE JUST TO GET YOU TO CALL. TRY IT MAKE AN CASH OFFER ON A CAR THEY ARE FALSELY ADVERTISING AND THEY WILL TELL YOU ITS SOLD OR IT DIDN'T PASS INSPECTION. WOULDN'T YOU INSPECT A CAR BEFORE YOU POST IT. THAT'S CALLED FALSE ADVERTISING.
Before I begin, please look back at the several fake reviews posted by themselves I assume (hence the unrealistic 3.5 stars). OK, so if every single eating spot is packed except the one right on the pier, DO NOT attribute that to luck or timing, there is a reason. Anglins has the perfect spot, yet the first time we went there we waited over 45 minutes for a burger so we left even before we received the food. We thought, OK maybe the word "cafe" is not accurate and this is more of a seat down restaurant, so my wife and I gave it a second chance. Here is where it gets interesting: Receiving a menu: 15 minutes Receiving two glasses of water: 12 minutes (warm water that is) Receiving one chicken sandwich and one chicken fried dish: 1 hour 7 minutes During this time, there was only one other table occupied with an elderly couple. Three groups sat down, never received their drinks and left. Michael the waiter (maybe manager?) was very nice but simply stood there completely oblivious of our long wait or the fact that every other restaurant was completely packed on a Saturday afternoon but Anglins. The food was mediocre and fairly expensive, and the only reason we did not pay to walk on the pier is because we had a receipt from the cafe proving we spent money there. Please stay away from their bathroom. And if anyone at Anglins reads this, Lauderdale by the Sea had an amazing renovation of the area, perhaps you missed the memo but it's not too late to clean up a little bit. Would love to go back just for the amazing view you guys got. But for now, readers you have been warned.
None
I have very bad experience. They can not take word and very poor customer service.the staff are so rude. i have painful experience so sugest nobody come here.
Worst ihop i've ever been too..they take forever to serve you.
Terrible Staff, Poor Gear, Way Overprice, Bad Lighting, Field is not maintained. I have been there too many times times over the past 10 years and every time I get dragged there by friends we run into horrible staff, the disgusting paint caked playing conditions, and watch round after round of owners vs young kid renters end badly.
Antonio, what do I need to do get you to respond to my phone calls, emails and/or text messages? I paid for a service (not a particularly difficult one at that) and I can't get you to follow through or even acknowledge my inquiries. Tell me what I need to do. Please.
This is a shady establishment ran be even shadier people! They are rude inconsiderate and rip of their "customers" and the bands that play their venue! Its time for springfield to stand up and rid our city of shady local buisnesses like this! If you are a band and you play there Do So At Your Own Risk! If you are a customer there be prepared to be abused, degraded and over charged! Do not go to Nathan P Murphys there are planty of other great local venues such as Outland, Outland Ballroom and High Life, etc.
NOT PET FRIENDLY I called the hotel to confirm pets were allowed/permitted. The hotel receptionist said, 'yes, we allow pets'. At that point, I proceeded to make my reservation through Orbitz.com. When I arrived at the hotel to check-in, I was informed the hotel only allows 1 pet per room and the pet cannot weigh more than 15lbs. I was traveling with two dogs - one of which was over 15lbs. I explained to the receptionist that I had called the hotel the day before and was not informed of the hotel pet policy - only that pets were allowed. Despite this, I was still told I would not be permitted to stay at the hotel with my two dogs.
Wow!!! I have not been to a place like this in a long time. Everything was poor very nasty food. It tasted like it had been reheated a few times. I would never recommend this place. We refused to pay for this meal and the waiter said okay. He also said that it happens alot with people asking to leave.
Beware the automatic up-sale on meals. They won't ask if you want to upgrade to a 'Large', they just charge you for it like they did to me today.
Pas vraiment un belle endroit
Worst place ever...very rude and got complete BS when i caught them in lies....complete waste of money
None
Do NOT move here, as of OCT 1 you can;t have ANY weapons in your OWN home.
They don't care for the stones
Haben ein paar Mal dort bestellt, aber das letzte mal probierte ich die "8-Schätze" und Ergebnis war: Durchfall, Fieber ... Zufall? Aber auch ohne diese Erfahrung waren die 8-Schätze "komisch" bzw. vollkommen anders als bei anderen China-Restaurants ...
Terrible customer service. They have a clear problem of communication within branches. You are directed to a call center that promise you that somebody will call you back, but nobody ever do so. I paid for contact lenses 3 months ago and still haven't receive anything (they sent them to my previous address then sent me the wrong prescription!). Seriously, just hire a receptionist per branch. I am sure you can afford it and you will stop losing customers for organisational reasons.
Pathetic Service..: ( Wasted 4 hours just for getting a fresh number as earlier made us fool by issuing a used number. Beware ....!!!
None
Marking one of the lowest points of our humanity, the Westboro Church should be universally abhorred.
Ordered at 8 and they said it would be here by 9 at latest. Phoned them at 9.15 and then they say it will be another 45 minutes. They hadn't bothered to call and let us know. I don't like eating my dinner at 10 o'clock at night and they seemed surprised by this
Horrible customer service!
Call for assistance rang for about 20 minutes unanswered. Employees usually clustered away from customers or predatory in seeking commissions. Avoid it if you can.
Se ve perron en view street
horrible service, slow moving employees, phone calls not returned, no one knows anything about permit approval. This entire staff (of inspectors) needs to be replaced or have their pay changed to commission based on performance because it is ridiculous and a waste of gov. money.
many kids there are really rude and distracting and try and litter or spit on the campous but most of the teachers are nice and fun.
Nach zwei Stunden in der Warteschleife der Hotline ist die Verbindung einfach beendet worden.
In the matter of a half hour while waiting for a cab, I called the dispatch on a timeframe update at 15, 25, and 30 minutes, each time the dispatch said they were pulling up any moment. Here j am still waiting on the cab, 32 minutes later. Get a different cab, these guys suck. I'm hungover, my car is in on South Howard, and I want Chipotle.
Food was horrible, I don't recommend this restaurant !!! Never again, this visit just left me a bad taste of Asian food.
orası burası değil, aman dikkat.
Absolute scam! My brand new car needed to be towed there for a clutch problem. They charged me $110 just to tell me it wasn't covered under warranty. When I disputed the claim with Hyundai Motors America the dealership continued to be completely unhelpful. Wouldn't tell me the problem with the clutch, just that it was operator error. Gave me an estimate for $1400 when every other repair shop quoted around $850. After lying to Hyundai Motors America about the condition of the car, they then charged $35 a day for the car being on the lot while the claim was processed. Terrible experience. Creating a complaint with the Better Business Bureau against them.
Ordered a pizza and was told $18. They wanted $38 at my door. I refused to pay that for 2 pizzas. They called the police on me .
Just moved out! THANK GOD! 3yrs in that rat hole. One of the worst places I've ever lived, and for the money it makes it 10X worse! Seriously, $950 for a regular one bedroom apartment with CHEAP selections all over! About me: I have an Engineering Degree and work in a near by oil field office, but previous to this position I worked for 4 years as a residential construction manager. Basically I built houses and know what CHEAP CRAP they put in these apartments. For the prices they are charging, they could upgrade everything to top in material and STILL make a killing on these apartments. Features: Cheapest carpet and carpet pad on the market, Vinyl floors in kitchen and bath, cheapest flat paint on the market, extremely cheap cabinets with NO Pantry or STORAGE! Appliances... HA A JOKE! Last was the cheap garden tub that they made into a shower and it makes noises every time you step or adjust your weight! AC units are aged and take more energy to run then newer ones, which means you pay more for electric then usual. $150month was an average for us and we were bottom unit. Parking sucks... Smallest parking spots I've ever parked in. Get ready for some serious door dings and if you have a truck, don't even think about it. THE MANAGEMENT IS THE WORST!!! I own 3 cars, and they broke the law by tagging my car to be towed in 24hrs. The law says they must notify the owner 10days prior to towing. I was parked in the rear of the complex away from everyone and had been clean and parked there for a few weeks without movement. I broke no contract or legal rules, yet they harassed me and threatened me about this. After I informed them of the Texas Renters Laws they backed off. THE BEST WAS when we finally left, we were sent a bill for $65 to "clean" appliances, AND $202 for carpet repairs and stains.... Let me shorten this ----- session by saying they are trying to steal from us! The carpet was over 6 years old coming appart from normal wear, BUT they think we should have to pay. The appliances were NOT NEW and from normal wear, they wanted to charge us some arbitrary number of $65 NOT stated in our contract anywhere! This is all AFTER we had a leak in our ceiling that was NEVER FIXED and created MOLD GROWING OFF THE CEILING IN OUR BATHROOM!!! We told them 4 times in a 4 month period and NOTHING WAS FIXED! DO NOT GO HERE. The office and pool look awesome. The Trees are cool, BUT YOU WILL PAY TOO MUCH FOR CRAP!
Apart from a 'nice' view the hotel room was tiny, the furniture looked 10 years old, was dirty and worn. The window was dirty, the room was drab, the service was virtually none existent and if there was some interchange with staff it was less then friendly. The Harbour View room cost over 300.- per night, did not include parking, or breakfast. The Pool, what a joke. It was filled with leaves, the towels were lying all over the pool area, there was no obvious place to get a fresh, clean towel from and there was no pool attendant... The Hotel has a 4.5 Star rating - REALLY! DON'T STAY THERE
Incredibly shady mortgage company. My mortgage was sent over here by Bank of America and it's been 2 months of failure. They are 0 for 2. I was double charged my mortgage on the first month, overdrew my account. So I should be good for next month right? Two payments for the first month, so I'm good right? Nope, got charged again. So that's 3 payments in 2 months. I sent multiple emails, don't expect them to reply. These emails are being sent to some sort of void where people aren't seeing them. So when I called them, they admitted to the double payment but do they take care of it? Nope. I have to send in all this paperwork from my bank for some crap reason. It's obviously a ploy to get people to not reverse the payment. I'm immediately looking at other lenders. This one sucks.
It only gets one star because the general staff were great and all my issues have to do with facilities and management. Where to start. Ok I stayed here this past weekend for the San Japan Anime Convention, and yes this is HUGE so I can let some of my issues slide, BUT since this is not this events first year in this hotel I'm not giving them too much slack because they should have been better prepared this year. Let me begin with my hotel room. It was disgusting. It was so humid and muggy in this room you could have cut the air with a knife. I spent time in many rooms this weekend and only my room felt this way. We had to keep the air in the low 60's to even make the room sleepable. Everything in the room felt damp and moist due to the humidity. I complained several times and nothing was done, I even asked for a dehumidifier (because surely they knew this was an issue) and they brought me a HUMIDIFIER, needless to say I gave up after that. Also I had a large group so we had about 3 rooms under my name and when I checked in they gave me this slip of paper to fill out that basically asked if I wanted room service or not. I choose yes because we had so many people I knew we would at LEAST need clean towels. Welp 2 of my 3 days there we had no clean towels. Why even give me the paper to fill out if you were just going to disregard it???? I also ran an event where we would need urns of hot water. 3 of the erns I got were still dirty with coffee in them and my water was brown!! I had to rush replacements but that was disgusting. One of my companions went to the bar at one point to get a drink, when she paid they ran her card for over $100!!! Then the bar had the audacity to blame the bank and not offer to reverse the charge!!! (side note: I work for a bank thats total BS). We had a huge issue with theft as well this weekend. When we were trying to check out of the hotel my boyfriend and I were the last one in our room to make sure everything was cleared out. When I called for assistance to get my stuff out of the room we waited for over an HOUR for a bell hop to come up to our room. Well, he never came. We went down to the concierge to ask where he was and they said "oh he already came." NO!! We called twice during that hour for assistance, then they tried to feed us a line "well you have to be in the room." We never left the room. And then lastly they said "well we only have one bell hop on duty" Thats where I lost it. When a hotel has an event that attracts THOUSANDS of people and basically sells out their whole hotel, don't you think it would be a good idea to maybe hire EXTRA bell hops on check out day??? This is where the concierge guy just looked at me and said "take it up with management." So I did. While I was trying to talk to the manager about all my issues I kid you not, HE WALKED AWAY FROM ME!!! Not even a word, just walked away. That is unacceptable, I work very heavily in customer service and I have never been treated that way by management. I'm so appalled after this weekend. If it wasnt for the fact that I work for the event that was going on I would NEVER EVER go back to this hotel or any hotel affiliated with them. One of my companions has already tried to submit feedback by phone and got the run around and transferred to many different departments and when she asked for a written confirmation that her complaints were heard and addressed by someone of management they told her no. So now we are just going to take it to corporate.
None
DO NOT USE this company. I booked this company through work earlier this summer. They were coming to meet me at a storage locker at 10:00 am. They showed up an hour and half late for the job. When I called the office the guy who answered the phone was extremely rude. He said they never guaranteed the 10 am time and that it was my responsibility to call in that morning. Apparently they had booked the truck on another job at the same time. The drivers were really great. When they dropped off the boxes they said that they company would likely give us a discount on the move. When I called back the guy on the phone gave me tons of attitude, said they wouldn't give me any discount and then slammed the phone down in the middle of one of my questions. I've had several friends with similar terrible experiences since sharing mine. DO NOT USE this company.
the worst. was given the wrong pick up at sfo by main office. the driver was given the wrong terminal. the van was full of tobacco smoke and the driver would not open the windows and wouldn't talk to passengers. when asked to open the windows turn down the heater, he turned up the air conditioner full blast.
These people have no idea how cars actually work. I'm from NC and my boyfriend has been a mechanic for the last 4 years. In attempt to register my car in Colorado I was told to go through this process. My 97 Jeep didn't pass because of slightly high NOx (.5 over "limit") which after consulting my boyfriend as well other mechanics, is an issue that can literally not be fixed by anything other than buying a new car that doesn't have 203,000 miles on it. The folks at this location speak literally no english so there's no way to have an intelligent conversation about the cause of this issue. Not only is there a language barrier but the guys doing the actual test do nothing but read a computer screen and have no knowledge about engine mechanics. In NC we had required state inspections like every other state which my have been slightly more expensive but at least made logical sense. In the 12 years I lived there my Jeep never failed because the NC system is based on the car's computer which governs the cars pollution before it can even leave the tailpipe. More simply put, the computer installed by the car's manufacturer will govern that cars chemical output for the entire life of the car. If the computer, any part of the exhaust system, or any part on that car even begins to fail the check engine light will come on. (Now might me a good time to mention my check engine light has not been on for years...mainly because like I said, my boyfriend is a mechanic) Despite the age of the car I keep it in great condition both cosmetically and under the hood. There is nothing wrong with my Jeep. But does Air Care Colorado care about logic? No. No they do not. Another interesting thing to note is in order to get a waiver if your car continues to fail, you have to prove $715.00 of relevant repairs. Soo... in order to get around this and get my car registered I have to drop 700 bucks to fix a problem that doesn't exist. This process is a lot more messed up then just refusing to accept credit cards. That is sadly only the tip of the ice burg.
Food was cold and undercooked. A little worried about food poisoning, not looking forward to waiting it out.
pathetic attempt at customer service!!! I WILL NEVER PATRON THEM AGAIN!!! Seriously two thumbs down!!!
Food was good enough, service was terrible! We waited long enough to look at the menus and decide on dinner before anyone even said hello. When a waitress finally came to our table she took our drink order and zipped off before we could even tell her we were ready to order dinner. She did not make conversation at all, and let our drinks get empty before she checked on us again, and forgot the refills we asked for. The burgers were hot and good enough for bar food but service ruined the experience.
I was shown an amazing Washer and Dryer set. Paid for it, and the delivery. Was delivered 3 times, yes 3 times different washer/dryer set than in the store over a two week period. It totally sucked. Ended up going to Sears and getting the same thing same price, but with a 3 year warranty included.
Horrible service!!! Went in three hours before close and was informed a party of 5 would be unable to be sat at all that night. Called the manager and was told it would have been a one hour wait and she was very unapolegetic and rude. I have been a loyal customer since they opened and will never go back again
On Friday evening, November 29, 2013, I stopped at a BK in Grand Junction and had very poor service. I had ordered a chicken sandwich meal, and never received it. After a lengthy wait, I asked for a refund but got nothing but poor service from the manager on duty who not only asked was I sure I didn't get my order to saying that she couldn't give me a refund without a receipt (I didn't receive a receipt). She did not do anything or offer to help facilitate the problem, which the only worker on duty did as he went through the garbage (and he offered to get the order done). After the coworker found the receipt, the manager gave me the wrong change (supposed to be $6.66.. gave back $6.51), when I pointed this out, she gave me another nickle, and had to open the register another 2 times a nickel each time. on the last time, after I pointed out that yet again, she did not give me the correct amount, she emphatically yelled "Really??", in which at that time I really was upset with her lack of customer skills and counting skills. She is a poor manager and overall, that store portrays a very poor customer service attitude (was in there a week before, and one of the back line employees was acting very immature (repeatedly yelling out "Anthony"?). I will never visit this BK again, and probably not another BK in the immediate future.
Food sucks
Poor service
I used to love Wicked Weed Brewing great brews and decent atmosphere but that was all ruined tonight. Horrible service, unfriendly staff, bouncers making inappropriate gestures and kissey sounds at my girlfriend, and lets not forget the little red headed manager we made aware of the situation who did nothing! This is crap!!! Asheville is better than this over-hyped hipster joint! Want GREAT beer, service, and atmosphere visit Lexington Avenue Brewery or basically anywhere else in town!
DO NOT buy a vehicle from these horrible people. First off, their cars are pieces of crap. I was scammed into buying what looked like a decent car on the outside, but what turned out to be a lemon (had to invest in many repairs costing a couple thousand dollars when all was said and done). THEN when I had just over $700 left on the loan, I ran into some financial problems (I was laid off). I spoke to them when I made a payment earlier this month and told them I expected my tax refund by the 20th and I would pay off the loan at that time not being able to make any further payments until then (seriously they couldn't wait 20 days for the entire balance on the loan!!??). They chose instead to continue to harass me (over $200!) and then repo'ed the vehicle. NOW they want me to pay not just the $700+ left on the loan, but an additional $400+ for towing/storage. EVEN though they do the towing themselves and I live 3 minutes from them. They are heartless, unforgiving and will NOT work with you under any circumstances. NOT worth the heartache and stress...and their cars are CRAP!!!
I'd been ordering delivery online from Galla's for over a year. I always had good food but never dealt with anyone directly. Today, there was a mistake with my $52.00 order. I called to tell them that my chef salad had only lettuce and cheese. Before we even talked about corrective actions (refund or a new salad) I was told TOLD by THE OWNER that he saw the chef make the salad and it was made correctly. (But that's not the deal breaker.) I explained to him that I too am looking at the salad in front of me with no meat and no other toppings. He went on to say he'd rather lose my business the correct the problem. I'm totally stunned and will NEVER EVER order from them again. And of course, I will be telling everyone I know about this. DON'T ORDER FROM GALLA'S... they just want your money and do not value their customers.
To long waiting
3td class... font go there ever.....
Possibly the worst restaurant that I've ever been to! Service was terrible, food was worse and wine was the pits! I wouldn't go back in if they paid for my dinner! Avoid!
They won't serve tap water during the comedy shows even after the two item minimum. Super cramped seating and terrible service during the shows.
Waste of money
Same as the previous review - they NEVER showed up at 5:30 pm and repeated phone calls and messages until 6:10 were never answered or returned. This was for my inlaws to get to the airport fortunately to a hotel prior to their 6 am flight or my FIL would have probably had a heart attack. Needless to say, I was thoroughly embarrassed and had to then schlep my 4 kids (including my 2-week old) into the minivan and drive my inlaws to their hotel (husband out of town). I will NEVER use this company again, hear that Radio Cab is better.
I had a membership with Cardinal Fitness for about a year. I had a credit card switched at a bar one night and had to get a new one. Cardinal Fitness failed to call me for 4 months and notify me my monthly charge was being declined. However they had no problem charging me an additional $15 per month for failed credit card transaction. They also failed to notify me that when I canceled that I was going to be billed for an additional months membership. This gym is shady. Don't go here!
Rude service.
Eugene made an appointment with us today to fix our Danby wine fridge between 11am and 1pm. Around 2:30 he called to say he was running late and that he would head over. I asked him specifically what time he would make it. And he said around 4:30pm. So my wife waited for him, and again no call no show. She wasted her entire day waiting for this guy. Would recommend you go with someone else for your service needs.
We stayed here 2 weeks ago and to say it was the worst service and the worst meal we have ever had is an understatement, we moved out after 3 nights, and when we complained they said "you can have a free night".......still waiting to here when????, not happy as it was our honeymoon and had to pay to stay in another hotel.
I LOVE olive garden. But at this one i have repeatedly had the worst & and slowest service, 5 out of the 6 times I've been to this particular one. I will now drive an extra 20 min out of my way to go to another one.
I should have read the google reviews before going to Twisted Taco. Disappointing lunch. Service was not good. No refill on water or chips. Guacamole was too salty. Tacos were pathetic. Salad had only lettuce. Ordered $2 guacamole side and got charged $6.99. After paying the bill, I asked the server Schmitz why he charged more for guacomole. He was sarcastic and said that side order guacamole is not enough for 3 people. I told him that it is our choice because not all of us in the group like guacamole. He also asked me if I left a low tip. (I regret now that I had paid 22% tip which is way too much for the way he behaved).
This location has been closed. Sign on the door says for non payment of lease.
I purchased an I Taste SVD From Vapure in clairmont the guy there sold me the unit and informed me that the wick and coil system may be purchased at there stores but they sell out quick. I used it for two weeks and it stoped working. So i went to the corprate offices in Mission Valley and explained to them that I was going on vacation and my unit was not funtioning properly and I need it fixed before I go. She told me after a half hour of trouble shooting that it was the wick and coil that failed and that they did not carry them and to go back to clairmont store to get more wicks and coils. luckly enough I had three extra wicks that came with the unit. So I installled the first one in the unit and it failed after two tokes. So I tried it again and then again. Thinking that they were all defective I went back to the clairmont store and the manager there explained that my voltage was up to hi and it vapurized my coils. That would have been a good warning of what not to do when I purchased the modle right? Anyways I started to think about how that could have happened and I relized that the girl at mission turned the settings to hi voltage when she was trouble shooting the unit. You would think that she knew this valuable piece of information on how not to burn you wick and coil with two tokes. but no! this was not the case. So longer story short clairmont says they don't sell the wick and coils, but to purchase them on the internet. what a hassle! So he tells me that I can buy a different tank like the protank for $18 dollars. with two wicks and coils that they do sell at there stores. within two days my liquid is darkened it taste like I am vapuring the wick and so I look on line for the I taste SVD wick and coil systems and I can not find them without buying the whole atomizer kit. I am sorry that I ever visited Vapure of San Diego it does not matter what store you go to, because they hire people and do not instruct them of the facts of the most popular items that they sell.
Scott will not return phone calls or market your property in effective ways, we just wanted to rent our house to someone descent we had no one see the house in over 2 months. My nieghbor even attempted to contact this office to hire them and no one returned his call.
None
Bought a car and the next day the check engine light came on and we took it to a mechanic and nine different codes popped up in the diagnostic, and they had said if anything came up within three days and we weren't satisfied we could get our money back (we paid cash) and we took it and couldn't even get them to cover repair cost.... Worst experience, wouldn't recommend this place to anyone but scam artist who could rip them off
Overcharged. Charged close to $100 to rotate my tires. Fountain tire charged 30% the price. Never using them again. Rip off.
Wife was taken in by ambulance after collapsing and after a cursory examination was sent home when she was barely able to weight bare never mind walk.
I applied for financing Friday morning was approved called Saturday to go to the dealership thinking I was going to pick up the vehicle I applied for only to get 2 minutes from the dealership to get a call that they sold this to some one else after 4 hard credit inquiries and an approval for that vehicle. This dealership is full of your typical slimy lying salesman. Buyer beware, would not go back if they offered a free car.
No Wi Fi - not professionalism
I urge anyone considering renting a car from this company to reconsider. We rented from them over Christmas -- booking MONTHS in advance. We arrived within an hour after our flight landed with our confirmed reservations and they had GIVEN OUR CARS AWAY! No apology at all...no explanation. After keeping us waiting in the parking lot for over 3 hours, they managed to come up with a 15-passenger van, for which they charged us 3 times the fare quoted on line! Their attitude was simply "take it or leave it". We had no choice at that point, but I certainly hope no one else makes the same mistake. At least 5 other people in the office were in the same boat we were, so this is obviously a common ploy with Economy...
These guys think it is okay to charge $1 per shipment to drop your package off to FedEx. I understand they are a small business, but I'm already spending money on shipping labels but these guys are okay with taking additional money on top of that to take my packages. Go elsewhere!
I just had the worst meal I've ever had at a waffle house. The beef was over cooked while everything else was undercooked, nearly raw onions, soggy hashbrowns, wrong bread. If Serji is cooking you should just walk back out the door and go elsewhere, he is in too much of a hurry to worry about cooking the food right, even at a slow time.
got food poisoning on new years day. also, staff was SLOW and unfriendly.
Drive thru window employee named "Heidi" (heavy set with glasses) cannot get orders correct ever or make a decent coffee. Makes mistakes then shuts the Window in your face! Awful service. Luckily there are more Dinkins in close Proximity.
Twice I've been to the ER and both times I waited over 8 hours. Both times I was given the wrong diagnosis. I don't trust this hospital at all.
We started off great with both Larry Jr. and Sr. They said all the right things and made every effort to assist us. Over time, they continually broke promises and caused problems. We purchased a very expensive oven that they severely damaged during delivery (not to mention the damage they did to our place), offering no assistance in fixing it. Despite the oven being purchased by us in "good working condition" they did not deliver us the screw set required to assemble the oven (as promised) and further, did not deliver a $3,000 part required to make the oven operational. All in all this was supposed to be purchasing an oven, assembling it, and turning it on. It ended up being an oven that required us to fabricate multiple parts that they damaged during delivery, fabricate a $3,000 part they simply lost or never had, and 3 weeks waiting for a screw set from the manufacturer. In contacting them to help rectify these problems, they dodged our calls, promised calls back with information and never followed up, etc but never made good on anything. Dealing with Larry's Equipment has single handedly delayed us more than 3 weeks in opening our business. They sold us on being a family business that's been doing this for years, but at the first sign of problems left us hanging. They also attempted to change the price terms of our contract on the scheduled date of delivery and attempted to withhold delivery in an effort to procure more money from us. After several heated exchanges, those issues were settled, but in hindsight I would've gladly paid double to work with a more professional company that made good on promises and didn't outright break the equipment during delivery. I'm not recommending anyone else, I just would personally never purchase equipment from Larry's Equipment again. Again, this is just my opinion based on my own personal experience.
None
More like a 1 star......Chicken Tikka Masala was not good at all. The chicken was big pieces and just simmered into curry, tasted like it was boiled and put into the curry. And the pistachio kulfi was awful too!!! I didn't finish either of the two things! I don't know how old it was....I guess they cant make it fresher once its frozen! Big mistake of $26 expense.
They lack customer service and some of the service reps are RUDE.
None
Go somewhere else.... anywhere else.....There are lots of great pen shops in the world. This isn't one of them. The staff are disinterested to the point of argumentative. Customer care is non-existent. Bearing in mind the price of the product on offer. This kind of behaviour is just unacceptable today.
incompetencia, pero sobre todo arrogancia, mala educación y gente sin ganas de trabajar.
Simple mobile, Terrible service two hours and nothing. The previous guy was helpful these are like kids that don't know what to do.
They have been eroding the members facilities at this place for years only to launch more lucrative ventures.... Get rid of the swimming pool, open a Gym, make members pay as an example. there is nothing left here except water and seating... then if you are lucky a coffee... But I think this will be next to go if they open the new Alfresco area and coffee shop. I will be cutting up my membership at the end of this month and will never return... There are more and cheaper facilities and clubs at my local pub. Might turn my snooker que into a fishing rod and join the raby tavern fishing club.
Awful, terrible and inconsiderate servers. Most of which do not understand English.
There was nothing good about this restaurant. Awful awful service; very rude and unprofessional. The food was no good either. Actually I left the place and rushed to the Wendy's across the street, and suddenly it looked like a luxurious diner! Never ever recommend!
Not good chose ,the food an the service ,horrible .
Hmmm?? Where would I even start? Worst customer service and it's been that way for years! Wish AT&T u-verse would hurry it up and get over to my neighborhood liked promised..
Horrible place to buy a car. My car went to s*** after 4 months. I let the car go because it was so bad. DO NOT GO THERE!!!
THIS STORES PHARMACY IS AWFUL THEY ARE UNDER STAFFED AND ARE BARELY OPEN. AND THE CLOSE AT LUNCH
None
The above poster paid $.30 above other prices. When I was there 7/26/13 and paid $4.59/gal when every other station was charging about $3.60/gal. Half the pumps were broken, I had to pre-pay with a CREDIT CARD, the bathroom was disgusting, and the service was rude and dismissive. I assume this guy jacked up the prices during vacation season because he's the only game in town. AVOID this rip-off. AVOID AVOID AVOID.
Nice atmosphere, decent food. Awful service. When we arrived, we were pleasantly greeted and taken to our table. We are all looking through our menu, and decided what we wanted. My friend wanted his turkey wrap without cabbage, but the waitress very rudely informed us that everything on the menu comes as is, and that we were not allowed to order changes. This should not be how a restaurant works. At all. Anyways, he decides it won't be a big deal, and we all order. My pesto pizza is quite delicious, and $9 (a bit pricey, but not surprising with a "specialty" pizza). I do not have cash on me, and my friends only have enough to cover their meals, so I ask the waitress to put my meal on my card and then take the rest from the cash. She states she can't do that because there is a $10 minimum charge, so I suggest she put $10 on my card and give my friends more change back. She ARGUED with me that I would "lose a dollar to the house" for a solid minute before she realized what I was saying, and when she finally did, she did not apologize. Our change should have been $1 (everything on the menu is at a flat dollar amount, no change, no tax listed on the bill either) and she returned with $0.50. I think you can figure out what her tip was. I'm a local, and I will never pay to eat here again.
None
I don't know how a company with such terrible customer support can still manage to turn a profit. This is the worst taxi service I've ever experienced. Long wait times and unreliable drivers are hallmarks of the company.
*THIS IS NOT THE BLACKJACK POCKET CLUB, THIS IS A PRIVATE HUNTING AND FISHING CLUB* Two toilets in one room with no partition walls... JUST TO START! Not to mention the draft, exposed particle board 'interior wall covering' and the fact that there are 20 twin sized beds in one large room with not a single queen or king in sight! The chorus of snores that cranks up around 8:00 is almost deafening and if you're not ahead of that crowd you can count yourself OUT of getting a good night's rest. The only redemptive factor of this place is the hunting/fishing and the bucket. I would not recommend this location to a friend.
NEVER AGAIN!!! The skiers at Hunter are reckless (even the better ones), and it appears that the goal for skiers there is to race to bottom regardless of one’s ability and others on mountain. After being almost clipped by multiple skiers, my 6 year old son and I left Hunter never to return. He is a good strong skier and I generally ski in front of him however I had to ski behind him to protect him from the reckless skiers, this was at his request. It is time for the mountain to enforce the Skiers Responsibility Code, the first code is always stay in control and the second one is people ahead of you have the right of way. This is no place for kids………
Food was pretty good. But also expensive for family's on a budget. Games were 4 or more tokens each. Getting 48 tokens for $10.00 X two kids = $20.00 which gives you about 15-20 minutes of gaming. The tickets you earn don't buy you anything??? You would have to spend triple the above to keep a kid happy! My kids went home unhappy and empty handed. :( Will not return (PS I rate this place a ZERO star experience!)
Pessimo chi ci ha lavorato sconsiglia al 100% questo locale
Wasted a lot of time during an emergency since this is the wrong location. Can this location be deleted ?
None
None
I received their card from Walmart when I asked about local ranges for shooting, when I called to ask questions about pricing they were pretty rude. But thought hey 10$ per person to shoot, maybe still worth it. Then while attempting to call someone else a few days later I accidently dialed their number. The rep on their end was extremely rude, when I said sorry I meant to dial someone else, they even hung up in the middle of my apology. By that point I was was irritated for being treated so poorly so I called back for a manager/owner. Same rep, told me there was no manager or owner then hung up on me again. I won't be going here, especially after reading some of the reviews, and being treated the way I was while asking about pricing, and services available.
If you rent a place that these guys manage, expect to NOT get your full deposit back no matter what. The place I rented had things wrong with it all over (really bad stained rugs, cracked tile, etc) Before my lease was up I painted, had the rugs professionally cleaned, and I spent 6 hours cleaning to make the place spotless after I got all my things out. They kept half of my deposit to PAINT and get the RUGS CLEANED!!!! I have never ONCE in my life lost any portion of any deposit I have ever left on a place. They wouldn't even do a final walk through with me there and go over the checklist we made when I moved in. If they had, I could of pointed out all the repairs I made with my OWN money. Gee, I wonder why? Fair warning on these guys, they are not honest.
The WORST Brighton has to offer! I met my now boyfriend there on a Saturday in 2012 for our first date. It was NCAA Basketball time so I gave the horrible service and overcooked food a free pass that night because the place was so busy. Well, for our 1.5 year anniversary in August of 2013 we decided to give it another try. The place was pretty empty and we were still overlooked by our waitress. We ordered cheese sticks as an appetizer and received them without silverware, plates or napkins. I tried making eye contact with her...no avail. I even sat sideways in our booth trying to get her attention...nothing! I finally went up to the bar and asked if it was self serve for the items needed. To my surprise the waitress says "yeah, go ahead". I had to go BEHIND the bar to get what we needed and they couldn't of cared less! That's really bad service...and no one was in the place. BUT...there were 2 groups of "regulars" who got everything they wanted easily. I actually found my waitress sitting with them at one point. Dinner came and my broasted chicken was dry...but there was no returning it because the waitress never came back! We had to go to the bar to get more beer, too. Boyfriends chicken fingers were something from McDonald's...except they were $9.99! We will never go back.
Worst food I ever had.
Stay away. This is not the place for you
I'm placing an official red stamp at this location. I am not going to "chance it" anymore. This location has permanently lost my business! Reasons for negative review: 1. No warm welcome, greeting, or smiles from staff. 2. Staff got my order wrong. How can you get a Number 1 with cheese wrong? I got a hamburger without cheese and extra onions. 3. No apologizes from staff. 4. Long wait to get first order. Long wait for second order. 5. After the extra long wait to get my order, I asked them to make it "to go" and they didn't. I had to ask again. 6. Cheeseburger and fountain drink (regular Coke) had an unusual taste. (Praying to God they didn't poison me.)
I GOT MY TRUCK TOWED .. THIS PLACE IS A JOKE ... THAY RAN MY BATTERY DOWN ON MY TRUCK AND MISPLACED MY KEYS..ALSO THE KEY WERE IN THE TRUCK TRUNED ON AND IN DRIVE ... AND THE CHARGE ME 50 BUCK TO GIVE ME A JUMP ...AFTER PAYING 380.00.. TO GET MY CAR BACK AFTER ONE DAY .. STORAGE ...IT TOOK THEM 3 HOURS TO GET MY TRUCK AND GET A JUMP ....AND IF YOU SAY ANYTHING THE LADY WILL SAY SHE WILL CALL THE COPS ON... TRYING TO SCARE YOU ....
The waitress ignored us for about 30 minutes. Awful service
I now travel to Southampton or London for flights to avoid starting my holiday in a foul mood!! This airport is an embarrassment to local people when overseas travellers use it and are subject to the extortionate and compulsory carparking fees, a petty penny pinching charge for security plastic bags to put your makeup in, disgusting and extortionately priced food in a restaurant that's as inspiring as a transport cafe! Get your act together - please!
The sign reads "Sculpted Nails," and that's what I wanted. I wanted gel nails, sculpted on with a form. When I walked in I asked how much this was. After calling the manager several times, I was quoted $70. I knew this was a fair price, so I agreed. When I sat down, the woman brought over a box of white nail tips. I clarified that I wanted sculpted gel nails, painted with a color, not French Tips. The woman kept insisting that the French would look better and I could come back and get them painted over when I was bored with the French. She also kept saying this was only going to be $45. I reluctantly agreed. She seemed friendly and meticulous at the time, but cut me on several fingers with the Dremel (which my blood got on and she did not sanitize except with the wipe of a dirty towel), clipped a piece of my skin with the nail cutter and applied the gel unevenly. My nails did not look great leaving the salon. When I got home, in better lighting, they looked even worse. In less than 24 hours, my nails started popping off. With the stress of a busy work week, my boyfriend did me the favor of taking the receipt, pictures of my cuts and the nail that fell off of my finger the next day in the hopes of receiving a refund. Long story short, the woman that cut my fingers ended up being more professional than the owner, himself. Pretty pathetic. After saying he would refund the money and then changing his mind, along with threatening his lawyer to call us, my boyfriend left without a refund. Worst. Nail. "Salon." Ever. AVOID!
Had to walk in personally to get an update after waiting a few days. Never returned my calls. They only had to install a hard drive. It was too much for them, apparently. They lied about waiving the deposit/ diagnostic fee. Very underhanded. Very unprofessional. Would have given them zero stars, but Google forced me to give them at least a one star review.
Overbooked on Saturday. Unfortunately the staff here does not realize you can't book a group every 4 minutes. We stopped at hole 5 because we didn't want to spend the whole day there, it had already been an hour and a half. We asked for a refund or at least to just pay for the 5 holes we played. They said they couldn't help us in any way. They ended up giving us $8 of our $52 back and said "thats all we can do." Why would you offer tee times you can't accomodate to? Obviously so you can load up the course and not allow refunds for people who don't want to spend 5 hours playing A PAR 3 COURSE. They lost a few customers.
Horrible service. Margarita got there after I was done eating. Margarita is tiny and a cheap mix. Food just average when it finally got there. Avoid avoid avoid!!!
I would give them no stars if possible. I bought a 2010 Mazda 3S from them on October 12th. The finance department messed up our paperwork, so after having had the car for a month, we still didn't have financing. We tried to return the car, but were told we had had it too long. I called my credit union, which was what I wanted to do at the beginning and they talked me out of it, and got my own financing. It has now been 2.5 months and I still do not have a permanent tag and my second temporary tag expires today. I was promised that my tag would be here yesterday, called this morning and they told me it's at the tag office which is closed until Monday, meaning I can't drive to work Monday or to the tag office. They say they can't give me another temp tag because the real tag is available. Really!? And I agree with the other reviewer regarding Adrian. He's a rude, arrogant bully. They need to replace him with someone who has some people skills.
It appears they foster a culture of lies, lies and more lies by sales people (not just one). I was in the market for a 2014 Tundra CrewMax TRD and they were committed to selling a new, 2013 version. Perhaps there were incentives to push old inventory. However, to facilitate their objectives they tried every trick in the book except being professional about it. In fact, if they knew their products even marginally, they could have made the sale as there was a huge value proposition for the 2013 version, at the time. Darcars is a textbook example of why Auto Sales people get a bad rap. Further, they made my information available to all their sales people resulting in as many as 8 calls in one day, weeks after I had already purchased my truck. I will never again consider Darcars. Costco Auto Purchase program should be ashamed of being associated with an organization such as Darcars. If it was an isolated incident with one Sales Person, I would not have left this review.
it is not the actual location of FAME HILAND PARK in the MAP
The worse Mexican food ever
Had a problem with my 2002 chevy truck. It sounded like the brakes were going bad, the brake pedal had some inconsistency to it, and the brakes wanted to stop the truck without me touching them. So I bought the parts to do the front brakes. Brakes are done, but now I have a problem where the front calipers are sticking real bad. Making a bad smell and just burning from not releasing. So we decided to go to a Pro to fix them because I don’t have the money for guess work at this point. When I was doing the brakes I noticed my fluid was not correct, it was green. Went to Just Brakes and told them what I have done as far as the brake job and told them there might be something wrong with the fluid being contaminated and that needs to be checked. The manager or something told us that the fluid was green and that it could be another type of brake fluid, and that the calipers were bad and needed to be rebuilt along with back parking brake needed to be done. So 500.00 and a week later the problem is back, the truck wants to stop itself. We bring the truck in this morning and they test drive and check it out, they tell me there is something in the fluid and that the whole system needs to be redone at a tune of a $2000.00 dollars give or take. This check only took no more than 3 minutes after test drive. Why did they not find this the first time after I told them the fluid might be bad? Simple they wanted the first 500 and knew I would come back with the problem they didn't fix. Then another manager told me the other guy was on vacation and he doesn't have a answer why it was not caught the first time or that it’s possible that it would not show bad on certain days (Which Makes No Sense) being there was probably more bad fluid in the system the first time. I couldn’t imagine how much bad fluid was in there after they flushed it the first time for them to find the problem under 3 minutes the second time and not the first. Do not bring your car here unless you got $3000.00 to just let them rip you of the first time. This is my first reaction to this wrong doing. I will take this as far as I have to go with just brakes to get my money back, so I can put it towards the real fix for my problem.
This place has the worst customer service ever, 'It's unfortunate because people In the medical field should be the most caring and generous people. I hope hiring managers make better decisions about the staff they hire in the future and also to better there service and so they can stop losing patients. No one there is professional. Its sad, I hope this review helps everyone.
Went in for an oil change, it took about an hour and a half. They spilled oil on the engine and didn't tell me, I found out because of the smoke coming out of the hood. That's when I noticed the low coolant light had come on. Fluid top off is supposed to be part of the service, although the coolant was fine before getting the oil change.
Absolutely horrible service every time! Planes always delayed/canceled for one reason or another. I'm always treated like a second class citizen when problems arise(every time). The employees at (American Airlines) are very hard to deal with and never have any information to help with assisting me. Bags are lost constantly as well. Will do my best to avoid this airport at all costs!
Not happy...pharmacy person was rude and unwilling to help...left without my medicine because doctor failed to write dob on my prescription...
Mentira
Poor selection, poor customer service, no management available on Saturday. All around waste of time.
AWFUL! WORST EXPERIENCE WITH A ONLINE ORDER EVER! I ordered 3 items on a Wednesday, 1 item on Friday and 1 on Saturday! I received Friday and Saturdays order on Monday with NO PROBLEM! A scarf and shorts. Well shortly after getting my black lace shorts they ripped! Then I emailed them regarding my other shopment and NO RESPONSE! This went on several days! I FINALLY opened my mailbox and saw a package. I was so excited.. THEN realized it had ONE item in it EVEN thought It stated on the package there were 3 items, a dress, shorts and a scarf. All I got was shorts. I IMMEDIATLY emailed the company about my package and ripped shorts! She didn't email me back till I finally posted a picture of the ONE item and the package on their FB! She then told me it wasn't their fault it took so long to get package and that I understand. But what i didn't understand was she said she "emailed" about my dress being out of stock on the 9th *number 1 I didn't order till 10th, never got that email* she also never mentioned the scarf! When I responded to the email I informed her that I never recieved her email and that I would like a different dress in return of the one they didn't have and to please mail my scarve as it was not to me yet either. She did tell me I could replace my shorts or return them as to they had NEVER had a problem before.. This all occured on the 17th! I still have recieved NO reply regarding dress or scarf I have already paid for! I DEF DO NOT RECOMMEND UNLESS YOU WANT THE RUN AROUND AND FOR THEM TO TAKE MONEY WITH NO PRODUCT IN RETURN!
It seemed nice at first but being forced to take only one internet and cable provider is not right they never get bills right and often the connection speed are slower than dial up and bill is always wrong. Pool and gym hours are not user friendly. Can't wait til lease is up so I can move.
My bf got his bike there and he noticed a defect after he bought it and rode it once. They wouldn't refund his money and brought it in for repairs which took well over a month. I give Canadian tire one star cause that's the minimum and its an okay place to buy bagged soil.
Vorsicht beim Kauf von Gleitsichtkontaktlinsen ! Völlig überteuert! 150% teurer als durchschnittlicher Internetpreis! (zB für 2x6 Linsen statt online 80€ , hier 198€)! Bei der Bestellung wurden noch 99€ angekündigt, später hieß es dies sei pro Auge gemeint! Linsen werden in umgelabelter Verpackung ohne Hersteller und Werteangaben geliefert! Man muß schon aufpassen um eventl. den Hersteller und seine Werte herauszufinden (Originallabel klebt in der Kundenkartei). Wenn man vom Kauf zurücktreten möchte wird man des Ladens verwiesen!
Good
Good luck doing business like a little child, Hank.
Has been demolished to make way for apartments. Google needs to update its street view to reflect this.
I've ordered from this place a few times, pizza is great but the service just keeps getting worse. There has never been a time that I have gotten my pie in under an hour. Giordano's famous 45 min stuffed pizza honestly takes less time than their thin crust. I'm over it now, I've gotten my last cold pizza.
Bútórlapot szerettem volna vágatni, hogy csináljak egy szekrényt. Én éreztem magam kellemetlenül, hogy zavarni mertem őket, Még visszaköszönést se kaptam, Mondom milyen szín kell, olyan nincs, színkódot mondjak, mondom akkor adjon lisátát, olyan nincs, nézzem ki a neten. Közben persze fel se nézett. Ha ingyen dolgoznának se kéne tőlük semmi
I believe this company is run by a bunch of unsavory people who are out to take advantage of unsuspecting customers. I also believe used car companies purposely reset emission codes in the auto to kill the check engine light during the sales process. I went to this dealership to buy a car from my daughter and was mortified at how in the end I was duped. I directly asked John who is unethical and operates in pathological dishonesty in my opinion. if I would have any trouble passing the emissions test. He gave this long song and dance about how the company doesn't operate like that and they have been in business 17years blah blah blah. Two days after my daughter had the auto the check engine light comes on. What used car dealerships do is simply disconnect the battery cable and this will erase the codes in turn the check engine light will go off only to come back on after an extensive drive cycle has been completed and the illuminated light will not be seen during the test drive. John told me to my face that this would not happen. I have never in my life felt so lied to and taken advantage of. I would advise anyone to stand clear of this place. Unsuspecting to John prior to coming In I spoke financial crimes and they are very interested in the unsavory operations of dealerships like this. With all the power in me I will bring this practice to an end. Also State Senator Nina Turner is very interested in companys who prey on the community with underhanded tactics.
Garbage web site. Does not show current items, prices, etc., The basic items that you might want to see on a business's site: Items they offer? Price for items? Basics???
Great atmosphere and decoration, waterfront is nice. Food was not great especially for the price. Service was absolutely terrible. Would not recommend. I give them one star for building a nice restaurant.
Sehr unarganisiert extrem lange Wartezeit Küche unterer durchschnitt. Für ein Mittagessen sollten sie sich mindestens 2,5 Stunden Zeit nehmen. Preis Leistung in keinen Verhältnis. Habe es probiert wie viele andere. Danke neuer.
So, customer service has always been terrible here. But today, we got a kids pizza for my 3 year old daughter...and we discovered this metal rivet right on top of the pizza in the container. We called and let them know we'd be returning to show them and get the meal erased. But when we arrived we got the run around for half an hour and were forced to call the owner ourselves because the crew claimed they couldn't refund for anything more than the pizza. The owner, Ryan Morrison, belatedly accepted my call tonight and promised to make it right tomorrow. This should have been an easy fix. Nobody charges you after almost choking your child.
10 años en España, no he comido tan malo y tan caro como aquí
I did not go to this theater because everytime I try to call with the number provided it rings once and goes silent. Highly irritating when I've been trying to call all day so me and my husband can watch a movie. I guess I'll just be making the ride to Jax.
None
Well, it's closes at noon on Wednesdays. Something pretty important to list I'd say.
I would rather be violated by a bear than deal with their customer service. The internet they provide is comparable to trying to transmit information via carrier pigeon.
These people need to be put out of business! We called them to let them know that we were going to be a few days late on our rent. We were paying $1400 per month and we have to pay an extra $220.00 on top of that for a late fee. We NEVER missed a payment and NEVER been late! I asked them for one more day to get the money to them. They told me I would have to pay $750.00 extra on top of the late fee and rent. Needless to say we couldn't afford it. We begged and pleaded with them. They filed an eviction on us and our 5 children and now we are faced with being homeless. These people are heartless and they don't care!! Now our credit is ruined and we don't know how we are going to find another place to stay. RUNNN!!! Go the other way!!! Not only did they mess us up but the home owner too, because they wanted to be greedy. We paid $2800 for deposit plus first month rent to move in here. This was not worth it and now our life is turned upside down because of it. I wish more people would come forward about them. They need to be stopped.
Worst Strip Club I have ever been to in Chicago. Bouncer at the door tried to be high and mighty and tell us that if you have a party of 10 or more you have to pay $55 per person just to get in the door. We get in and the place is dead and there are two girls working at 9 pm. After a while more girls came on shift but they would sit and the bar as if they were bored and waiting to go on stage. A couple of the girls were actually rude to our guest of honor and pretty damn ugly. Lap dances are a joke as they dont even touch you or dance on you. Please choose a different spot for your special occasion
stay away! took my money and didn't fix the problem
They kicked a two year old out of the restaurant for being too loud. If they closed down yesterday, it would be too soon.
No hay agua caliente y el baño esta lleno de cucarachas...
I can't tell you I had their food, but I am leaving a review because I never received the food I ordered. First they said they would be 15 minutes later than they initially stated. Then when that time had passed (by another 15 minutes) the delivery driver called and left a message stating he was lost and to call the main store and they will make me a new order since ours was cold. I should add that he was lost because you couldn't tell the difference between Way and Place. At this point we had waited 35-40 minutes AFTER the pizza was to arrive to I called and canceled the order and asked for my money back. The person taking the call was clearly confused by the entire issue and apologized several times. When I asked for my money back he said that he could have another order out in "maybe" 25 minutes, that would be when the food would be done. It would take another 15 to get to our home. After the first batch of issues I couldn't trust this at all. It was the restaurant that was at fault for being late, I assume the driver was flustered and just took a quick glance at the address which is why he was lost. Word of advice...don't order delivery from here. You may not end up getting it.
Drove an hour to try out the restaurant - twice. The first time, there was a party the night before so the chef wasn't going to be in until an hour late. Second time was today. Restaurant was supposed to open at 11:30; door was still locked at 11:45. There won't be a third time.
Horrible management. They always got orders wrong. The facilities were permanently occupied by the homeless.
Horrible customer service-Paid close to $70 for dinner and the portion size was smaller than lunch portions. When the bartender asked if we wanted a drink, the owner said no, they takeout only. I wanted a drink because I had already waited over an hour and i'm pregnant. They were under staffed and the bartender told me herself that they get their food 40% off and she still doesn't eat the food. The man sitting next to me at the bar got free booze and when I complained I got nothing, not even an apology. I ordered my food to go and also my friend too.We ordered 4 of the same entrees and our food was incorrect. The "shrimp" roll was actually "imitation crab ". I will never go back and don't recommend this place at all .
I had the exact same experience as the other reviews. I don't want to go into detail about how horrible it was to live at 1025 Sherman, but I will never recommend it or live there again!
We had a terrible experience at this unprofessional club. It was waste of money and time at this club. We are writing our story for all the parents who are considering to send their children to this unethical club. After all, ethics and discipline are among the most important characters that most of us want our children to develop. I hope our bitter experience at this club would help you to make a more informed decision about your child. We have recently moved to BC , Univercity area, from Alberta. We were looking for a martial art club that is close to home to send our two sons. Our first one is five year and half and our second one is about four year old. We came across this club through a search we did on Google map. I wish we had paid more attention to a negative comment from a year ago about their unethical behavior or trusted our instinct after our first visit. I called the phone number listed on Google to talk to them about their schedule and their system. Like most martial arts classes, they offered free first sessions. We took our sons to the club to give it a try. The first coach at the club was Sia. When we were about to leave, the coach called us to tell that we had to pay $ 25 per child for the first session. I explained my phone conversation with the owner, Arash (called Arelo), but the coach’s reasoning was that we cannot go around to try out classes for free. We paid $ 50 but left the club with a bad first impression. I received a call from Sia, the coach, a few days after asking if we were considering to send our kids to the club. I told him about our ambivalence. The classes were about $ 150 per child per month without any discount for the second child. He said that he is willing to give a significant discount if we were going to consider. He offered $ 2,200 annual pass for both kids including the supplies. Considering the saving to a young family's budget, we decided to go for it. After making the payment, he told us that the amount does not cover the shirts or any other supply. So he charged us an additional $ 275 for supplies that took three months to receive. Despite the occasional delay in starting the classes, the training was ok for the first month. The coach had to leave the club after a month after an evident conflict with Arash (Arleo). Arash brought in another coach, Nick. He was a nice guy but we did not really see any progress after two months. Occasionally, the owner/manager (Arash) was mad at him for his inexperience. He was shouting at him to do a better job while all the parents and kids were watching Arleo’s disgusting behavior. They kept trying new coaches including George and another guy that I cannot remember his name. One time, Arash got in to train his coaches by training the kids. He was very arrogant both with the kids and his coaches. This was not certainly a behavior that we wanted our children to watch. Our children are both well behaved and we were afraid that they may pick up some of Arleo’s arrogance in class as they could not occasionally distinguish between his behavior and his training. I am among several parents who are disgusted by Arleo’s behaviour towards kids, coaches and parents and we are all considering to send our children to an alternative club. A few of us were smarter by not getting misled by the annual discount. They could easily walk out. For us with annual discount, there is no contract issued. I called them today to see how we get refunded as no contract was signed. I was told by Arash that he does not issue any refund, stealing close to $ 1500 from a young family. He also told me that he does not want to see our kids anymore because I have been complaining about their behavior recently. We are certainly planning to pursue the issue through legal channels. On the positive side, we are very happy to walk out to stop our kids from watching this misbehavior. I hope the comments above help you to make a more informed decision.
Horrible. Do not waste your time. The sales associate set up a time for me to come see the vehicle. I took the day off of work and drove 1.5 hours all the way to see the vehicle and it was not there. And they tried to show me a different vehicle- it had coffee spilled all over the steering wheel and the door speakers. The console had crumbs in it. Totally unprofessional and just a horrible experience. DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME!
None
They sold me a car battery with a three year warranty that started going bad after a year or so. I brought it in to be replaced and they said there was nothing wrong with it. Said there must be something wrong with my car (which I know it's not my car). They weren't willing to work with me at all about getting a replacement. I'm not going there again.
Very bad customer service
I went there with my girlfriend to celebrate our one year anniversary. I look at the menu and I was in shock over the prices but if she was happy, was worth it. however when we receive our food it looked bad and tasted it terrible. My girlfriend did not eat the fish and she is bringing it home to her dog. I have to work in the sun 1 1/2 days for this meal. I want to forget it and I will never go back. I am also going to share the story with everybody. :(
This has been the worst experience of my life. The service department is an absolute nightmare! Bought an RV 7 weeks ago and the RV has been in the service department for 6 weeks. WHAT A DISASTER...I can go on and on!
Wast services I have seen ever! Lack of Experience :(
This company uses images of bound and gagged women to sell products. Calls people who make objections to such products "butt hurt bitches". I will not recommend this company OR use a company that I know uses the services of this company.
None
Terrible, Terrible, Terrible. We went through the drive thru at 8:15 pm and our order was incorrect. We had not noticed it until we arrived home in Winter Haven. When I called in to speak with the manager, the phone rang multiple times until a fax picked up. When I called back in and spoke with a person calling themselves a manager, and I say that because a real manager would have enough sense to listen to a customer complaint, we were disconnected. When I attempted to call back in they no longer picked up the phone, they allowed it to roll over to the fax machine. So I faxed over a brief letter stating that I would be calling during the day when the General Manager would be available. AVOID this place, the food does not meet Taco Bell standards and the service doesn't meet anyone's standards from my experience.
1h30 pour acheter un téléphone alors que le dossier était déjà prêt par un agent Telus la veille. Les employés (jeune recrue et la directrice), bien que gentils, sont complètement à la ramasse. J'ai littéralement dû leur expliquer leur travail et si je ne m'étais pas renseigné aupréalable ils m'auraient vendu le téléphone le double du prix plus des options inutiles (rachat de micro sim alors que non nécessaire). Quand il faut se battre pour acheter un produit et qu'en plus la directrice vous tient tête et fini par avoir tord, c'est qu'il y a un problème. Si ce point de vente n'était pas le seul à avoir le téléphone recherché en stock je me serais bien passé de faire affaire avec eux.
This has to be the worst resort I have ever been to. The sheets are at least 10 years old and really rough on the skin and caused my gf to get rashes. The taxi driver they arranged to take us around the island threatened us. The food is barely edible, the prices are outrageous. I could go on and on about how bad this resort is, do not go. You will regret it
L'unica cosa positiva l' asporto, veloce, cordiale, gentile. Le pizze buttate: pasta gommosa, qualità degli ingredienti pessima, patatine fritte nere ( olio di settimane), se volete una pizza questa non lo è!!
They are racial against black people. The food toppings are below what u r supposed to give you. The pizza only cost $1.50 to make but they charge $12. Don't eat here fucked up owners.
Where do I begin? Well let's start with the drive through service, after ringing back "I'm sorry sir, I wasn't listening to your order" I proceeded to reiterate me and my brothers orders, his food was fine but mine was made incorrectly. I went into the dining room and asked for my correct order but instead of getting on it the cook began to argue that they were indeed the way I ordered. There is a distinct difference in receiving 1 meat patty instead of the 2 I had ordered. After explaining to 2 "staff" members and 1 manager that 1 was not the same as 2, I was promptly handed 2 cheeseburgers wrappers and was told that there were somehow by some beautiful force of nature 2 McDoubles in the cheeseburger wrappers. Low and behold I received 2 cheeseburgers not McDoubles. In my fit of frustration I vowed never to return to this particular establishment again. At least they didn't give me food poisoning,... I think...
